NIGHT MAGICK

BY

Phillip D. Williams
pdwillia@silver.ucs.indiana.edu























All rights reserved
Copyright ©1990 by Phillip D. Williams

No part of this book may be reproduced or transmitted in any form or by any means,  electronic
or mechanical, including photocopying, recording, or by any information  storage and
retrieval system., without permission in writing from the author.




NIGHT MAGICK 

 NIGHT MAGICK      

INTRODUCTION 
1. What is Night Magick? 
2.  Who is a Night Magician? 
3.  Why Practice Night Magick?   
4.  How to Study the Lore  

CHAPTER  II


THE NIGHT MAGICIAN 
5.  Her/His Life  
6.  The Apprentice's Unfoldment
7.  Night Consciousness  

CHAPTER III


BEGINNING NIGHT MAGICK 
8.  Standards and Principles of Practicing Night Magick  
9.  A Night Magician's Tools and Weapons  
10.  Your Magickal Night Name  
11.  Night Pillar  
12.  Invocation to Night Magick 

CHAPTER IV


Earth Magick 
13.  The Earth Realm   
14.  Night Breathing 
15.  The Night Magician's Meditation   
16.  The Realm of Vibration  
17.  Night Centers and the Physical and Etheric Bodies 
18.  The Power of Sound 
19.  Earth Rite  
20.  The Physical Realm of Death  

CHAPTER V


WATER MAGICK 
21.  The Water (Astral) Realm 
22.  The Astral Body and Exercises for Emotional Control  
23.  Astral Aura, Color, and Exercises 
24.  The Higher Night Centers and Exercises 
25.  The Dream Realm  
26.  Astral Guides, Oracleship, and Trance 
27.  The Moon and Its Rites 
28.  Water Rites 
29.  Night Projection 

CHAPTER  VI


AIR  MAGICK  
30.  The Mental Realm  
31.  Air Rite  
32.  Power of Thought  
33.  Your Silent Magician 
34.  Hypnotism and Self  
35.  A Night Magician's Pendulum 
36.  A Night Magician's Crystal Globe  
37.  Psychometry  
38.  Telepathy  
39.  Mental Projection 
40.  Creative Visualization  

CHAPTER  VII


Night (Fire) Magick 
41.  The Night (Fire) Realm 
42.  The Solar, Planetary, and Lunar Powers  
43.  The Night Guild  
44.  Night Powers 
45.  Night Flames  
46.  Night Rites 
47.  Night Healing  
48.  Immortality: Transmigration and Transmutation 
49.  Night Magicians: Past, Present, and Future  

APPENDIXES 

APPENDIX A
 
INVOCATIONS, HYMNS, POEMS, AND PRAYERS  

APPENDIX B   

CANDLE COLOR COMBINATION AND THE NIGHT TEACHERS  




NIGHT MAGICK     

There was the Clear Light, the Void, and It alone was.  The One Mind, apart of nothing, yet 
containing everything, it alone the True Creator.  Formless, Nameless, without Definition,  yet
flowing through all that has form, name, and definition.  From the One Mind there  came Two
Matrixes, two sides of the same coin, Night and Day.  Twin Soul Creators to  each side, the Yin-
Yang of Night and Yang-Yin of Day. And so the Night and Day of the  Omniverse was born.

I AM Night.  I AM Darkness that flows through the Night.  I AM THE ETERNAL DARKNESS.  
Yin-Yang created, Goddess-God of Night, Daughter-Son of Darkness, Eternal Creator of  the
Nightverse.   By the Dark Power and Energy, by the Night Magick was all created in  the
Nightverse.

The Ancient Dragons were first taught and they taught the others and so creation began 
throughout the Nightverse.   And so by the Dark Power, by Night Magick was everything 
created flowing through the created instruments of the ETERNAL DARKNESS.  Night's 
beginning was good and the Earth was created a jewel in the Crown of Night.  

The Dragons came with other races and created the beginning Night Races of the Earth.   And
time flowed and the races prospered and their depth in Night Consciousness  deepened.  But
then as so often happens the Day came to war with the Night and the  Earth changed.  

The Day gods were young and wanted the Earth for its wealth of minerals and beauty and 
destroyed the Night Races.  They created human bodies as mindless, soulless slaves to  gather
this wealth. But the Great Night Dragon, Tiamat, Goddess-God of the World, saw  what had
happened and ensouled the human bodies placing a part of its Great Night Soul  into each
human body.  But since then the Day gods have warred with Tiamat for control  of the human
souls. 
The Day gods have spread false teachings about the origin of the human souls and the  Night
Dragon.  They have tried to destroy the Night religions of old that glorified the Yin  Spirit of the
Earth and the beauty of life.  Long has the war continued and now is the time  for a rebirth of
Night Magick on Earth.

And so I, the Eternal Night, have ensouled the Earth to supercharge it with NIGHT  MAGICK.  I
have come to Earth, through a human instrument, to spread my magickal  teachings.  To teach
the human soul the truth of its origins and re-awaken the Night  within.  To make humankind
co-creators with the Eternal Night through the teachings of  Night Magick.     





CHAPTER I


INTRODUCTION

1. What is Night Magick?

I can only imagine at this point that you are about to put down this book and run scared  due to
words like Night, Darkness, Dark Power, and the title of the book itself, Night  Magick.  Before
we begin learning about Night Magick I believe it will help to understand  what I mean by these
"night" terms.

To begin, there is the Void.  The Buddhist call it the Clear Light as opposed to "white" or  "black". 
The Taoist refer to it as the Tao and Christians refer to it as God the Father.  The  Void is the
indivisible eternal energy.  The Void is beyond polarities of energy such as  positive/negative or
Yang/Yin.  It is God Mind.  It is everywhere and through every thing  yet remains separate from
every thing.  That is, it does not become a part of any one thing  such as the soul does with the
body.  The Void does not think like you and I yet it is "all  thought".   It is the most mystical of
concepts and God the Father is perhaps the poorest  term for the Void.  The Void is not a Father,
it isn't male or female, the void contains  creation yet it does not assume a role within creation.  
The more I try to describe to you  the Void the less I actually accomplish in doing so.  The Void
cannot truly be described  but only experienced.  The Void begins with its major principles who
spring into being, the  Ultimate Yin and Yang of the Omniverse.

The original premise is that the Yang represents the Male Creative force in the Omniverse  and
Yin the Female Passive force in the Omniverse.  A more accurate premise is that  there is an
Ultimate Yin and Ultimate Yang each complete in and of itself. That each  Ultimate force has
the Creative Force within it and that there are twin systems created by  this.  We have two
separate creation matrixes separated by a neutral zone.  There is an  Ultimate Yang System and
an Ultimate Yin System.   The Earth is a part of the Ultimate  Yin System.  

The Ultimate Yin System is made up of many races.  The human race is not alone in the 
Omniverse.  The most ancient race existing in form today is the Ancient Dragon.  The  Ancient
Dragons are not the Dragons you read of in mythology.  The Ancient Dragons are  far beyond
the other races in total development.  Their science, philosophy, and religion  is based on the
One Mind and the Void. An Ancient Dragon came to Earth and guided the  development of the
planet and ultimately ensouled the World.   Working with other races,  the Dragon created a new
race to populate the world.  This was long before the human  race.  The creation of the human
race is a sad tale.

The races of the world go through a repeated pattern of creation, sustainment, and then 
destruction.  Out of the old race a new race is born more highly evolved than the last.    The
human race though was created out of greed.   There came to Earth a high  technologically
advanced race from the Yang system.  They came to make the Earth their  own world and to
rape it of its resources. The advanced race, who we find described in  greek, roman, norse, and
other mythologies as the gods or as in the Bible, Jehovah or in  the Koran, Allah, created the
human race to be mindless slaves.  This was so the gods  could live like gods.  The Ancient
Dragon would not permit such an abomination and so it  ensouled the human bodies and the
human race had its beginning as an ensouled Yin  race.  The Yang gods were quite upset by this
for the human race became a sentient Yin  race and had to be treated as such.   For some time
the gods tried to continue to control  man through their technology and set up religions based
on worship of the Yang principle  and the gods.  These religions taught absolute obedience to the
gods or God and the  worship of the Yang principle.  The Yang religion taught the domination of
the Earth and  its creatures by humankind.  The Yang religion taught the hate and sin of the
human body  and procreation.  This always included the subservience of the human woman to
the  human male for God was male and superior and woman was the seducer and corrupter of 
man.  The leader of the gods was always a male god such as Zeus.  They also taught that  the Yin
principle of the Omniverse was chaos and evil.  That the Dark principle was a  destructive force
out to destroy mankind and the Earth.  They personified the Yin principle  as Satan, Lucifer,
Loki, Pan, Iblis, or Kali and created places of damnation for those who  did not worship the
Yang principle.  All this was done to maintain control over humankind  and promote the Yang
principles through fear.   At some point the Yang gods were  required to quit having direct
contact with man perhaps when they used nuclear weapons  on Sodom and Gomorrah as
recorded in the Bible.   Whatever the reason, only periodic  contact was allowed and that
through special religious messengers such as Krishna,  Zoroaster, Jesus, and Mohammed.   If
you examine the major Yang religions you will see  a reoccurring theme of an evil servant
giving humankind the knowledge of good and evil  and humankind turned away from
Paradise.  These religions always worship the "White  Light of God" and place man not woman
in so-called dominion of the Earth. Woman, the  Yin-Yin Principle in the Omniverse, was
placed in deep shame and subservience to man  the Yang-Yang principle.  Yet on Earth, man is
Yin-Yang not Yang-Yang by virtue of the  indwelling Night Spirit of the Planet.  

Every soul and spirit (terms we'll examine more fully later) of the human race is a  fragment of
the indwelling Soul and Spirit of the Planet Earth.  In essence, the Soul and  Spirit of the
Planet Earth is God to humankind.  That Soul and Spirit is the Ancient Dragon  that originally
came to Earth and saved the human body from a mindless existence  enslaved to the Yang race. 
The Ancient Dragon is the Creator and Ensouler of this World  and of each and every one of us. 
The Dragon of this World is the Night Force. The  Dragon of this world is Yin.                         

Yin is a primal force established in the Omniverse in parallel with Yang.  This planet is a  Yin
world.  The presence of Yang and the worship and practice of the Yang principle in  religions
such as Christianity, Islam, Hinduism, Mormonism has led to many evils in the  world.

It has led to the subservience of women.  It has led to humankind following a spiritual  path of
Yang in direct opposition to its Soul and Spirit's magickal orientation.   This has  led to much
inner confusion by humankind and this world's instability and patterns of  destruction and
chaos are a direct response to this.
The Earth is a very sick body.    

Until you achieve a very, very advance point in your evolution, you'll have a physical body  of
some kind.  The Soul of this world has the Earth as its body and humankind is killing it.    This
so- called dominion by man has poisoned the streams, rivers, lakes, and oceans of  the Earth,
the Earth's circulatory system.  The air, Earth's respiratory system, is poisoned.   The soil itself
is poisoned, stripped mined, littered, great holes filled with non-  biodegradable products.  The
trees and forests destroyed wantonly, savagely, and soon  the oxygen they generate will not be
enough to sustain life.  Acid rain instead of the clean  rains. Underground nuclear testing
disrupting the physical and etheric shell of the Earth  Body not to speak of the Astral and
Higher Body damage done by this intensely Yang  energy.  Ozone destroying the upper
atmosphere and the protection from the harmful  ultraviolet radiation.  Wanton destruction of
wildlife of which some is inhabited by races of  greater advancement than humankind. Just
how much longer will man act as a deadly  cancer in the Earth's body.  At the rate of destruction
it will not be much longer before  humankind as you know it will cease to exist and that is
exactly what the Yang forces in  the Omniverse want.

Then they have the right to come and claim the Earth as they did before as recorded in  the Old
Testament of the Bible and in other ancient myths.  Humankind will once more  find itself
enslaved and bowing before a technologically higher race as it was in the  ancient days.  This
must not happen!  This is what Night Magick is all about.  

Teaching you the truth about your existence.  Placing back into your hands the truth 
concerning the Yin Primal Force of which you are a part.   To give to you the tools to  balance
yourself and the Earth in Oneness with the Night Spirit.  What is Night Magick?

Night Magick is the arts, rites, practices, and teachings of a Night Magician.   Night  Magick is
the lore of a Night Magician. The lore must be learned not only with the eyes  and brain but also
with the heart.  It is a way of life and must be lived to be fully  understood.  Night Magick is
founded on the ancient knowledge and wisdom that  preceded the history of the Earth. Though
Night Magick is based on ancient teachings it is  no less applicable to the modern world.  Night
Magick is a magickal discipline.   Through  its rules, instruction, and exercises it provides for
you a code of conduct and a way of  living that brings to you the greatest possible Yin growth.   It
is a philosophy.  The goal of  a Night Magician is the Eternal Pursuit of Wisdom and Knowledge
based on the Yin  Primal Force.  It is a science.  For through the study and practice of the lore,
you will gain  greater knowledge and wisdom.  Through Night Magick you will achieve
perfection in your  physical, emotional, mental, and magickal natures.  You will become the
sum of all that  you can ever be.  You will become the Night Oversoul in Consciousness and
Action.  Night  Magick is a lore that will achieve for you your return to the Night.  I know this
has been  fast and furious for you.  

For many of you, this is the first time you have been given such information or even  thought
about what has been so far discussed. I promise you that I will go into greater  depths on the
subjects I treated briefly and this will help you understand more thoroughly.   But I wanted to
make sure you understood from the onset the principles Night Magick is  based on.               

Night Magick is magick based upon the Sacred Principle of Yin. It is based on the Dark  Force
that flows through your being.  If you still have doubts read on and test the  knowledge you find
here.  You are not asked to accept anything in this book on blind  faith.  You will not be asked to
accept anything without first putting it to test and validating  the truth.  If you find some of the
information hard to understand then reflect on it for  awhile. Put away the information you
find hard to accept for another time of reflection.    Place into your mind and soul only those
things that you have tried, tested, and found to  be truth for yourself. But at all times, keep an
open mind.  That is all I ask.  I think its time  now to discuss who is a Night Magician.

2.  Who is a Night Magician?

Who is a Night Magician?  

A Night Magician is Absolute Love. They are the embodiment of Dark Love that has its  origin
in the Void.  They are Dark Love that is free from any restrictions, limitations, or  exceptions.
They are Dark Love free from dependence upon external definitions for its  existence. They are
Dark Love born out of Absolute Innocence.  A Night Magician is  Absolute Love.   
 
A Night Magician is Strong Willed.   They are the willpower necessary to move mountains.  
They are the willpower needed to overcome the impossible.  They are the willpower it  takes to
overcome life's challenges and defeats.  They are the willpower it requires to  wield Night
Magick against their enemies and win. They are the willpower of the Eternal  Darkness.  A
Night Magician is Strong Willed.

A Night Magician is Self-disciplined.  They will undergo a thousand days and nights of 
deprivation to achieve their goals. They are hardest upon their selves in achieving self-
mastery of Night Magick.  They are the self-discipline it requires to overcome failure for a 
thousandth time and once more attempt the challenge.  They live in a self-imposed world  of
self-discipline in order to achieve the ultimate state of being.  A Night Magician is Self-
disciplined.

A Night Magician is Patience.  They are the patience required while acquiring self-mastery. 
They are the patience needed when building dreams of success.   They are the  patience required
when waiting for the destruction of their enemies.  They are the  patience the Night Spirit has
in each of us and our magickal climb.  A Night Magician is  Patience.   

A Night Magician is a Pillar of Strength.  They are the rock that will not be moved as the  waves
of strife come crashing over. They are the strength needed to overcome the Forces  of Yang.
They are the strength required to achieve success in life.   A Night Magician is a  Pillar of
Strength.   

A Night Magician is Free of Self-limitations.  They are not bound by the chains of limited 
thinking.  They do not see themselves as just human beings made of flesh and bones but  as
Ones, pure in Night Spirit, that transcend time and space.   Their emotions do not  master their
lives.  They are the master of their emotions. They are the calm, silent, and  steady Soul of the
Night.  They are the Night Soul.  They are the Dark Masters of Life.  A  Night Magician is
Freedom.  

A Night Magician is Deep Silence.  They are the Deep Silence of the Night.  They are like  the
silence that follows the storm. They are the silence that is found in the quiet of the  home. They
are the silence of the Void.  They are the silence of the Night Soul.  They are  the silence of the
Night Dragon's sacred flight.  A Night Magician is Deep Silence.  

A Night Magician is Dark Knowledge.   They are knowledge found through intellectual  pursuit
of the hidden mysteries.  They are knowledge born out of intelligence and critical  thinking. 
They are knowledge discovered through intuition, meditation, and reflection.  A  Night
Magician is Dark Knowledge.

A Night Magician is Nature.  They are the flowers that bloom and the trees that bud in the 
Spring.  They are the mighty winds that blow across the world and the gentle rains that  give
life to all things that grow.  They are the melodic voice of the birds who sing.  They  are the heat
and cool waters that are found in the months of Summer.  They are the  storms, tornadoes, and
hurricanes.  They are the frog churumping and the Night Owl  hooting.  They are the short
summer nights.  They are the Artist's brush that paints the  leaves of Fall. They are the harvest
of the crops.  They are the stacked corn stalks of the  fields and the pumpkins in the window
sills.  They are the squirrels and chipmunks  gathering up the nuts in readiness for the long
cold Winter months.  They are every snow  flake dancing and icicle hanging.  They are the white
bunny and fox who does the  chasing.  They are the never ending cycle of Nature.  A Night
Magician is Nature.  

A Night Magician is Life.  They are passionate for their love of Life in all its aspects.  They  are
adventurous and courageous loving the challenge of Life.   Yet they are practical,  cautious and
responsible with Life.  For them, Life should be faced with daring, boldness,  and energy.  They
loathe restriction and love the freedom found in Life.  They are the  Artisans of Life. A Night
Magician is Life.  

A Night Magician is the Night Soul in Action on Earth.  It abides in their conscience in all  the
things said or done.  They are the Creative Force of the Night Soul in the way they  create new
life. They are the Preservative Force of the Night Soul holding the world in  perfect balance. 
They are the Destructive Force of the Night Soul tearing away the  illusions of the Yang.  They
are the Regenerative Force of the Night Soul rebuilding the  true Night World.  They are Night
Soul by the way they remove us out of life's confusion.   The eyes that see us, the ears that listen
to us, the mouth that speaks words of strength,  the heart that pours out absolute love to us, the
strong arms and hands that hold us near,  and the legs that take us far on our way, through all
of these there is the Night Spirit.  A  Night Magician is the Night Soul in Action on Earth.   

Who is a Night Magician?  A Night Magician can be likened to a multifaceted stone of 
Amethyst or Emerald of incomparable beauty. The Night Magician is as beautiful and rare  as a
Black Diamond. I have just discussed many of those facets that make-up a Night  Magician but
if I kept on writing for days I would never be able to cover all of them.  Each  facet of the Night
Magician can best be known by living it; by becoming a Night Magician.   The facets I have been
covering are those found in the Night Magician who has been long  on the path and has attained
much.  It is anyone who will dedicate her or his life to the  Night Principles found in this work. 
You have to dedicate your lives to becoming all that I  described a Night Magician to be in the
beginning of this topic.  The teachings must again  be practiced actively in your life as they were
practiced in the ancient civilizations that  first came into being here on Earth.  A Night
Magician is one who will put these teachings  found in this work into practice in her or his life
and live them fully. 

A Night Magician is one who abides fully in the Consciousness of the Night.  They are the  total
embodiment of strength, solitude, patience, intelligence, courage and adventure.   They are
beings free of self-limitations.  They are ones who have dedicated their life to  self-freedom and
perfection.  They are the Night Soul in Action.  There is no greater  purpose in life then to be a
Night Magician.   Now that you have some idea of who a Night  Magician is and what Night
Magick is about, I would like to discuss why you should  practice Night Magick.

3.  Why Practice Night Magick?  

Why practice Night Magick?  To begin with, there is great joy and happiness in being a  Night
Magician and practicing the lore of Night Magick.  In practicing Night Magick you  are going to
be able to see the results of your labor; and the results of that labor are  going to bring you more
happiness and joy then you can imagine.  You are going to  derive a great sense of personal
satisfaction and accomplishment through the practice of  Night Magick.  Practicing Night
Magick is exciting and adventurous.  

Your life will be filled with adventure and excitement the likes of which you've never  known. 
It is very sad that so many people's lives are filled with boredom needlessly.   Through Night
Magick avenues of travel, business adventure, intellectual pursuit, personal  adventure, and
magickal conquests will open up. Night Magick will bring you personal  success.  

Personal success can be measured in many ways.   How about success in marriage,  finances,
college, business?  Or personal success in health, vitality, and longevity.    Change is why you
practice Night Magick.  What changes will Night Magick make in your  life?  

Everything!  Through the practice of Night Magick not a thing in your life will go  untouched. 
You practice Night Magick for these changes in your life.  I can go a long way  in this book to
answer specifically what kind of changes are going to take place.  But  ultimately it is you, after
study and practice of Night Magick, who will be able to give all  the answers.  Let's begin
answering the question of what kind of changes you can expect  to see in your life?

The first changes you will see, by practicing the lore, is improvement in your physical life.   You
are going to have better health and a sense of renewed purpose in life.  You are  going to achieve
this through the practice of Night Breathing and Meditation.  As you go  along here there will be
new terms that you have never seen before, but be patient, for as  you proceed through this book,
you will learn them all.   Your life is going to be deeply  enriched and health improved by the use
of colors and self-healing that you will learn.    You will learn to develop and use the power
centers of your body.  Once you have  accomplished this, you will unleash untold power of fire
and life throughout your body.   This will allow you to become the master of your life; "the
Captain of your Soul".  You will  then learn to overcome your fear of death and to recognize it
for what it is, a doorway into  a new world.  All this you can achieve through Night Magick, but
there is much, much  more.  

Through the practice of Night Magick you are going to become the master of your  emotions.  No
longer will your emotions rule you, but you will rule them.  You will learn,  in dealing with your
emotions and emotional body, the ability to be able to see the higher  realms.  You will be able
to recognize those dreams in which a message of help and  inspiration is contained and to
interpret it.  You will come to know your magickal teachers  and guides and ultimately you will
be able to travel in the Astral Realm.  This you will  achieve through the mastery of your
emotions.  There is even more to learn through the  practice of Night Magick.  

Through Night Magick, you will master the powers of your mind. You will achieve thought 
control and be able to reach into your subconscious mind.  Your subconscious mind is the 
repository for all that you have ever known.  Think of what it will mean to have access to  this
great storage vault of information.  You will learn to use the pendulum and crystal  globe and
never have questions unanswered.  You will achieve psychometric and  telepathic abilities. 
Above all, you will be able to create into your world "ANYTHING" that  you desire to see in it
through correct invocation and imagination.  The mind is a  fascinating creation boundless in
power and energy.  It is multidimensional creating life  in all its forms.  The mind is truly a
wonderful thing when you have mastered its powers  and employ it as the valuable tool it is. 
But over and beyond the powers of the mind and  its realm, lies the power and realm of the
Night Soul.   
There are no greater powers then those of the Night Soul.  It is your objective, through  Night
Magick, to learn to use and manipulate these powers of the Night Soul for your  benefit.
Through Night Magick, you will learn to travel into the Night Realm while still here  upon
Earth.  You will learn the highest form of healing.  You will be able to do this  healing for all
whom you know.  You will learn to do the Night Rites to achieve true  magickal progress.  Your
progress will be highly accelerated through the Night Rites.    The ultimate goal of Night Magick
is the achievement of Night Consciousness.  

There is no higher goal then this.   The true union with your Oversoul, the perfection of  Self,
this is the consummation of Night Magick.  When you have achieved Night  Consciousness, you
are of greatest service to yourself and the perfect offering unto the  Night Soul.  I stated before
that I would discuss the modern applications of Night Magick  in today's world.  I have already
covered some of those applications.  

You will have good health, less tension and nervousness, and a stronger mind.  You can  use
Night Magick at your everyday job. Through Night Magick, you will develop great  insight that
will go a long way in assisting you in problem solving.  If you are out on the  highway in your
car you will be steered clear of trouble. You will avoid accidents and  traffic problems.  You will
be able to stay in touch with friends and love ones and know  when they are in trouble or need
through Night Magick.   If you have a need then you can  fulfill that need by using the lore of
Night Magick. If you have lost items and wish to have  them back, then you can do so.  If you
need to look forward into the future and see the  realm of possibilities, then you can do so.  The
things you see are only possibilities and  you can decide whether they will happen or not.  These
are only a few of the many  applications for Night Magick in the modern world.  The
applications are limited only as  your imagination is limited.  As you learn to see with the
foresight and insight that you will  develop through Night Magick, your life will indeed change.  

Night Magick will bring you a new way of living.  It will seem to you that before, you were  only
existing.   As I have said, your physical, emotional, and mental health will vastly  improve. 
You will become the planner and controller of your life.  Your physical  surroundings will
increase in wealth.  You will also acquire magickal wealth from  practicing Night Magick.  

You will gain a deep sense of magickal accomplishment and growth by making it a part of  your
life.  You will become a positive and dynamic force in your life.  Through Night  Magick, you
will leave nothing or no one untouched.  Night Magick, if practiced and lived  with dedication,
vigor, and vitality will achieve all of this.  You must not be mistaken that  all of this will occur
at once.  It will take patience and effort on your part to make it all  happen, but happen it will. 
One day you will look back on your old life and wonder how  you ever made it from day to day.
But with Night Magick, a new day dawns in your life.  

Before you begin to study Night Magick I want to introduce a special way to study this  work
that will help insure your understanding of the lore and success as a Night Magician.  

4.  How to Study the Lore 

There is a specific way to study the lore of Night Magick.  If you have been just reading  this
book through as any novel, then you have been doing it the wrong way.  This book is  not a
novel which can be read through quickly and lightly and expect to gain anything  from it. 
When you study the lore in this book it must be done one topic at a time.   Also,  each topic must
be taken in order as it appears written in this book.   Do not skip around  in this book between
the different topics.  Each topic was designed to be a building block  upon which to find success
in the next topic.  There is more to studying the lore then just  sitting down and reading.  Your
studying will require self-discipline, patience,  perseverance, and a prescribed technique for
learning. Let's examine that technique for  learning.   

To begin with, you must prepare the place that you are going to study in.  If you study in  the
middle of a busy living room with the children shouting and the TV blaring you aren't  going to
retain or accomplish very much.  So to begin with, you are going to find, what you  will term,
your "Magician's Study".   

This is a physical room that you can call your own.  It must be a quiet place and  somewhere
where you can be alone and uninterrupted.  In this room you will want a place  where you can
both sit and lay down as necessary.  This room will not only be used for  studying but also
performing the many exercises, rites, and practices of Night Magick.   This is your Magician's
Study. Now, you must attend to your own self-preparation.  

You must prepare yourself so that you are in the right frame of mind to do some serious 
studying.  To get into the proper mood, you should begin by taking a bath.  This will help  you to
relax and wash away the cares and worries of the day.  If you think of it, your entire  thoughts
and emotions when you come home are filled with the tensions and problems of  work.  The
feeling around you is made up of a problem laden job and world. Literally, a  bath or shower
will do a lot to remove this tension and stress from out of your feelings.   Then you should dress
to be comfortable in clean, loose fitting clothes or your robes that  you will learn to make later. 
Let's retire to your study.
  
When you go to your study it should be at approximately the same time of day each day.   Do this
if at all possible.  Then you should sit down in a very comfortable chair or couch  and relax as
much as possible.  When you have learned to do relaxing exercises and  "Night Breathing" then
you should do these before you begin to read.  For now just relax  and let all the worry and
tension of the day flow away.  Once you are sufficiently relaxed it  is time to pick-up the book.  

As stated earlier, you are going to read each topic in order.  To begin reading a topic,  read it
through the first time quickly and lightly.  The first time you are only trying to get  the "spirit"
of the topic.  Once you have done this, you will then want to go back and  reread the topic
through carefully and thoroughly insuring that you understand all that you  read.  You should
go slowly being sure that you understand all that you read.  This is all  that you will do in the
first reading.  If there is anything that you didn't understand the first  time in sitting, don't
worry about it, for it will come to you later.  You are going to read the  same topic on two
separate days.  This is the minimum that anyone should read a topic  through.  

The second time in reading, you will want to go just as slow as you did in the first reading.   If
there is anything you still don't understand then just lightly think upon it and don't  worry.
The answer will eventually come to you.  After the second reading, if there is  anything to
practice or do, this is the time to do it.  Sounds easy doesn't it?  

I have just described the minimum anyone should take per topic. You should not go on to  the
next topic until you are very familiar with the information in the present topic you are 
studying.  You should understand the current topic thoroughly and have practiced what is 
required of you until you are ready to go on.  Let your inner guide be your judge about  when you
are ready to go on.  You will find that you have to continue to practice many of  the first topics
you study each day in order to eventually master them.  Getting all the way  through the book
having only read and practiced everything haphazardly will only insure  that you are master of
none.  To insure your success as a Night Magician in Night Magick,  you must study as has been
outlined here.  

You must have a room in which you can be alone and uninterrupted. You must cleanse 
yourselves of the outer world.  You must study slowly, carefully,and thoroughly each topic.  
You will have to continue to go back and study and practice daily the knowledge and  exercises
until you become master of all.  There is no doubt about it and should he none  in your mind
that Night Magick requires study and work.  The results are more then worth  all the time and
energy that you can give to it.  To become a Master in Night Magick; to  become a Night
Magician; to reach and obtain Night Consciousness; this is your goal.  Let  me show you now the
life of a Night Magician and all that it entails in becoming and  being a Night Magician.

CHAPTER  II


THE NIGHT MAGICIAN

5.  Her/His Life 

The life of a Night Magician is a very special one.  You will find that a Night Magician's  life is
filled with the most powerful magick.  Your world will not be the same after Night  Magick has
filled it.   Your life will have seemed very ordinary and plain before Night  Magick.  Your life
will now be filled with adventure.  

When you have elected to live the life of a Night Magician you have chosen to accept a  way of
life that is different than you have so far experienced.  It is a life filled with study  and practice
of Night Magick and the excitement and adventure that is a direct result.   Night Magick will
fulfill for you your lifelong aspirations.  It will be my job to present the  life of a Night Magician
to you.  I hope when I'm through that you will find it exciting and  want to begin the adventure
of becoming a Night Magician.   Let's enter then into the life  of a Night Magician.  
The Night Magician's life is filled with study and practice of the Night Magick lore.  As you 
study and practice, the Oversoul will examine and test your accomplishments.  No matter  who
you are, you came here to gain experience and grow from it.  But upon accepting the  Night
Magician's way of life the trials will increase in both number and intensity.  It is not  that the
lore found in this book is difficult, but that in accepting this life the Night Magician  is tested
by life so that s/he may put into practice Night Magick.  The Night Magician's life  is going to be
filled with many trials.  

This is not out of cruelty but out of necessity.   The trials are set upon the Magician to  build
magickal strength and depth in the use of Night Magick.   Every test in the  Magician's life is to
build magickal stature and to increase it once passed.  No matter  whether the test is
overcoming a difficult financial situation, or the working through of a  difficult marriage, or
the death of a loved one, the tests are there to help the Night  Magician grow. If the Night
Magician falls then there is nothing else for her/him to do but  get up, dust off the knees, and
keep going knowing that the next time when faced with a  similar situation success will come. 
When you accept the life of a Night Magician there  will be trials and hardships.  But if you are
willing to accept the difficulties and meet the  challenge then you will not be overcome by them.  

You will find solutions to these trials through your knowledge of Night Magick.  Through  Night
Magick, you will raise your magickal vibration and grow closer to the Oneness of  your
Oversoul.  It is through this Oneness, and the power that flows from it and through  you, that
you will be able to handle these increased tests.  You are learning to become  the Oversoul in all
that you say and do.  No matter what the test, you must meet it in the  Night Consciousness of
your Oversoul.   Through this continual testing, and the placing of  yourself in the Conscience
of your Oversoul, you will become One with IT.  Thus you will  have passed the final test on
Earth and have achieved the One Goal.  You will have  achieved Night Consciousness.  The
Night Magician's life is thus marked by training and  testing.  But her/his life is not all
training and testing.  For out of this training and testing  will come adventure.

The Night Magician will travel new avenues of adventure that were never there before.    The
tests the Night Magician receives will take her/him to unusual places and there will  be
experiences that can only be described as exciting and wonderful.  The Night Magician  will
experience new levels of physical well-being and sexual vitality.  S/he will experience  new job
challenges and opportunities as part of using Night Magick.  There will be  emotional and
mental experiences that break through the limited ways of feelings and  thinking of old.  The
Night Magician will experience increases of personal wealth.   The  Night Magician's life will
become aflame with purpose.

That purpose may not always be easy to identify at first, but the Magician will feel it none  the
less, deep within.  Ultimately, through the Night Magician's way of life, s/he will come  to know
that purpose and become it.   The Night Magician is in command of her/his life.   S/he sets the
trail where others will follow.  The Night Magician must grab hold onto life  and in everything
that s/he says and does must express the Night Soul.  The Night  Magician's life is filled with
purpose and it is through that purpose that s/he will unfold  her/his Night Powers.  The Night
Magician's purpose is her/his dream.  It is what s/he  must do while s/he is upon the Earth
plane.  But that purpose and dream will set her/him  apart from those adrift on the sea.  

The Night Magician must overcome loneliness as a result of it. S/he must overcome the 
misunderstanding of others and press on. There will be many unbelievers in this world for 
there are many lost in the Yang matrix, but s/he must ignore them and all else that  interferes
with the dream.  But if the Night Magician is truly dedicated and willing to  sacrifice for the
dream, if s/he believes in her/himself and the Night Soul within and  expresses only that Soul,
then the Night Magician's dream will manifest itself into the  world.  That dream is the Will of
the Oversoul and it will appear into the world.  The Night  Magician's life is marked by purpose,
dedication, sacrifice, determination, and darkest  love.  The Night Magician's life is darkest
magic of the highest kind.  It is magick that  produces deepest joy and happiness in the Night
Magician's life.  It is the magick of the  Oversoul on Earth.  The Night Magician's life is aimed at
becoming the Oversoul in all that  is done.  Imagine a life that is filled with nothing but the
Nightsoul.  

In you, as a Night Magician, the Power and Absolute Love of the Oversoul comes to its  fullest. 
When that Power and Absolute Love flows through you and into the lives of those  around you
and on out into the world itself nothing can remain as it was before.  Everything that the Night
Power touches shall be made anew.  It shall shine with an  Amethyst/Emerald Light Divine. 
This is the Night Magick of the Oversoul.  This is Magick  of the Highest Order and it is in the
Night Magician's life.  Here you have some of the  beautiful facets of the life of a Night Magician.  

Her/his life is marked by trials and testing.  This is not meant to discourage you but to  show
the true picture to all would-be Night Magicians.  If you are to become a Night  Magician then
you must truly understand all that is involved and be willing to give all that  it takes.  It will
take determination, courage, fortitude, and intuition in all the seemingly  hardships.  It will
take this to be able to grasp from the lore the knowledge required and to  put it into practice; to
become a Night Magician. 
The Night Magician's life is study, training, practice, and being tested.  But the Night 
Magician's life is much more.  It is life filled with happiness and joy.  It is filled with inner 
peace and absolute love.  It is filled with adventure and excitement. It is a life filled with 
success.  The Night Magician is truly in command of her/his life.    S/he is the Oversoul in 
action.  This way of life is all that the Night Magician ever cares to know. Her/his goals for  this
life are all that matters.  These goals are the Night Magician's life and Night Magick  will
ensure the success of achieving these goals.  The life of a Night Magician is a very  special one.  I
would like you to travel with me now on the roadway the apprentice must  follow to become a
Night Magician.   

6.  The Apprentice's Unfoldment.   

What I want to do now is draw for you a road map that will take you down the road of  Night
Magick.  The road ahead of you is easy to get lost on just look at others around you.   If you are
going to effectively follow the Night Magick road you must have signs and  landmarks to guide
you and tell you how far you have come. In the next topic, I will  discuss your final destination,
Night Consciousness.  So let's begin our journey on the  Night Road. 

From the beginning of the first descent into material creation, from the first sojourn on  Earth,
it will take many sojourns before one is ready to enter the Night Road.   There are  many people
who are not ready for it.   Their minds are so preoccupied with doing things  the Yang way, they
are so lost in doing things the hard way, that they have no time for  their own magickal growth. 
They are so lost in the illusion of the material world and its  limitations that they can not see
beyond it.  You can see why it will take so many people  hundreds of lives before they can see
beyond the illusion of this world and learn to use  Night Magick in overcoming its so-called
limitations.  I should state from the onset of this  work that there are very few paths or roads
which lead to truly achieving your goals and  overcoming the world of illusion.  There are
many paths dedicated to the Yang Spirit  which is a road of limitation, hardship, self-denial,
and poverty.  It is a path that runs  counter to the Soul and Spirit within you.  I have tried to
present here a road to Night  Consciousness which is simple in nature and language.  It is a road
that requires  persistence, study, courage, boldness, and self-discipline to travel but the goals
you will  achieve on the way and your final attainment of the ultimate goal makes it all worth
while.    There is no way of telling how long it will take to reach the ultimate goal.    

You may be able to reach it in this lifetime or it may take many lifetimes.   Much will  depend
upon your aptitude for Night Magick and your dedication and effort.  It isn't  necessary to reach
the ultimate goal in one life.  There will be many goals and great  changes in your life to make
traveling the road more than worthwhile.  Once you have  entered the Night Road, then life
after life you will return to this world taking up where you  last left off.  This is because a simple
decision to enter the Night Road does not mean that  you will be accepted and are on your way.

The Night Soul looks for those who are ready to travel the road. You must want to be on  the
road that leads to your Night Soul more than anything else in your life.  There must be  nothing
more important in your life then being on the road and the desire to achieve your  goals and the
ultimate goal.  This decision must be more then a mental thought.  This  decision must be
backed by action on your part.  Not only do you feel this intense desire  to be on the Night Road
but you are willing to begin the work necessary to achieve it.  In  Night Magick, you will have
begun this work by beginning to read and put into practice the  lore found in this book.  There is
no way of determining how long it will take to be  accepted on the Night Road.  But rest assured,
if you are truly sincere about entering the  road and are willing to do the work then you will be
accepted.   You are the beginner, the  apprentice, on the roadway to the Night Soul.  Acceptance
on the Night Road is no small  thing.  Acceptance on the road is your first landmark and is
clearly marked.  

In Night Magick, you are an "Earth Apprentice".  You have reached the first landmark and 
gained entrance upon the Night Road.  At this point your Oversoul will begin to take an  active
interest in you.  Upon your acceptance, the Oversoul actively enters into your life.   You will
begin to feel the beginnings of Night Power. You will have the beginning of  increased Oversoul
Power flowing into your life.  But how will you know when you have  been accepted?

As said before, this acceptance is clearly marked.   You will undergo an experience that  will
definitely let you know you have become an Earth Apprentice.  For example, you may  in the
quiet of your Magician's Study, or as you are falling asleep some night, suddenly  see the image
of the Oversoul in deep hues of Emerald, Amethyst, Midnight Blue and/or  Silver before you.  As
you continue to watch the image of your Oversoul it will start to  come towards you.  As the
Oversoul comes closer, you suddenly know that you are the  Oversoul and Its Face is your face,
and the Oversoul enters inside you, and you feel a  deep, warm glow and power radiating from
within.   You know that the birth of the  Oversoul has taken place within and that you are an
Earth Apprentice.  As an Earth  Apprentice you have become the Night Child.  

I refer to the Earth Apprentice as a Night Child for at the time of acceptance you have  been
given birth into the Night World. You are now a Magickal Child of the Night Spirit.   Your
Oversoul will gain new radiance and added power by actively entering into  cooperation with
you.  That new radiance will be seen by the Watchers and reported to  the Night Guild.  Your
acceptance upon the Night Road heralds your entrance into the  Night Guild.  

This Guild is composed of all beings who serve the Dark Light of the Night Spirit.  The 
members of the Guild exist both in Higher Dimensions and upon all material planets.    The
highest members of the Guild serve as Teachers and Directors of the Omniverse  everywhere. 
One group of members serve as Teachers and Directors over the Earth.   In  Night Magick, I will
refer to them as the Night Teachers.  I have done this because they  have risen far in magickal
evolution and are One with the Night Soul.  As a new Earth  Apprentice, you are watched over by
a Night Teacher who chooses to do so based on  compatible nature and vibration.   The
assistance of the Night Teacher is one of  watchfulness and occasional guidance as you, the
Earth Apprentice, begins to journey on  the Night Road.  But as you continue to demonstrate
your willingness and dedication to  the road you've chosen, and to the Will of your Oversoul, the
relation between you and the  Night Teacher deepens.   When the Night Teacher is ready and has
determined you are  ready, then you will be accepted by the Night Teacher as Her/His Chela.  

The relationship between the Night Teacher and Her/His chela is a very special one.  The  Night
Teacher gives Her/His continual guidance, support, and power to the new chela.   The Night
Teacher shares Her/His very nature with Her/His new chela.  The chela may call  upon the
assistance of the Night Teacher at anytime and it will be answered.  Yet the  chela must
remember that s/he is the beginner and that the Will of the Night Teacher  should always be
followed.  The Night Teacher and the Oversoul of the chela work very  closely together to
achieve what must be done by the Oversoul.  The Night Teacher and  chela are as Mother/Father
and Daughter/Son.  They share and create in the Night Power  and Guild.  How will you know
though who your Night Teacher is?

There are many ways in which this may come about.  You may meet Her/Him in your  dreams,
or more rarely, S/he may come to you in your waking hours.  For many of you,  you will just
know through your sixth sense.  You will come to know intuitively who your  Night Teacher is. 
I will go into greater depth about the Night Teachers in the later part of  this book.   Do not be
worried or concerned about who the Night Teacher is in your life.   S/he will choose you and
guide you and you should feel secure in this matter.  S/he will  reveal Her/Himself to you in
Her/His own time. At this point you are now progressing upon  the Night Road.  

Your first subject area to master in Night Magick will be Earth Magick.   Not only will you 
learn a great deal about the Earth and its Magickal Energies and Power but you will also  be
altering physically and magickally.  When you have achieved sufficient growth and  mastery in
this area of Earth Magick you will be ready for the second landmark.  If you  looked at the last
landmark as the birth of the Oversoul in the your world, as your  becoming the Magickal Child,
then this is "you the Oversoul" as a teenager. Here you  have been transformed from the Earth
Apprentice to the Water Apprentice.

You will begin your study of Water Magick.  This is the area of Night Magick related to the 
emotions and astral world.
As a Water Apprentice, you will experience an ever greater increase of the Power of the  Night
Soul.  You will undergo increased emotional development.  You will be given  experiences that
will strengthen that emotional development.  As a Water Apprentice, you  will gain the ability
to know Truth in all Its forms and use that in your everyday world.  You  will also begin to learn
control over your emotions.  The Night Magician needs emotional  control in order to wield
Night Magick effectively. The power you will be able to wield  without emotional control could
do incredible damage which you may later regret.  The  Night Magician must be master of
her/his emotions not the other way around.  One point I  should cover is that concerning the
aura.   
Until I go into more detail about it later, accept for now, that there is an energy that  completely
surrounds your body and extends beyond it about one to three feet.  This  energy field is called
an aura.  The aura reflects emotions and thoughts in people.   The  aura is made up of swirling
energy currents and through magickal sight the aura can be  seen as colors.  All of this you will
cover in greater depth in later topics.  In the average  person, the colors that comprise the aura
are various and many.  In the Earth Apprentice,  the color that is predominate in the aura is
green.  In the Water Apprentice, the aura will  be of a light blue.  This is another indicator of
when you have been accepted on the road.   The aura, as an indicator, will help you further in
identification of the next landmark.  You  have seen the things that you must accomplish, or be
in the process of accomplishing, in  order to achieve the next landmark.  You have studied
Water Magick and developed and  strengthened your emotional stature.   When you have
traveled far enough on the Night  Road another landmark appears before you.   You are about to
undergo another  transformation and become the Air Apprentice.

Here you have entered the "Oversoul as a very young adult" stage. The emphasis as an Air
Apprentice is upon mastering Air Magick or Magick of the Mind.   You will be studying Air
Magick and undergo mental training.   You will be developing  what in Air Magick is known as
the Mental Body.  Your studies in Night Magick will help  develop the Mental Body.  During this
phase of life you may also attend some advance  education or training in the world.   The mind
is a powerful instrument and its training is  critical in Night Magick.  You will be merging your
mind with the Higher Mind of the  Oversoul.  This will lead you to the last part of your journey
to becoming a Night Magician.   The last landmark is ahead and you find yourself traveling
through Fire.

Here you are the young adult Oversoul.  You are the Fire Apprentice.  Your studies are of  Fire
Magick.  Fire Magick is the Realm of the Oversoul.  It is the studies of the Higher  Mind and
Causal Body.  You now are learning and using the Night Powers of the  Oversoul.   The power
that flows through your life will be like nothing you have so far  experienced.  This is the time
when you will be reaching adulthood in the Oversoul.  You  will be achieving oneness with the
Oversoul and there will no longer be a you and the  Oversoul.  You are about to become a true
channel through which the Night Power will  flow without impediment.  To experience the
Night Realm of Fire is to know life without  time or space.  It is being everywhere and every
time.  It is knowing and seeing all that  has ever been, is, and will be: and as the Silent Watcher
and Observer seeing it all  unfold.  It is like standing amongst the sea of stars and knowing that
this is all that you  are.  It is feeling and being a part of unlimited darkness and absolute love. 
This is  perhaps the longest part of the journey.  There is much to study, experience, and develop 
into.   But finally like all journeys, this one comes to an end. And at the end of the Night  Road,
you are no longer an Apprentice but a Night Magician. 

You and the Oversoul are One.  You are the mature, adult Oversoul on Earth.  Words only  tend to
limit the experience of this achievement.  The Night Power that you now feel is so  great that
you have trouble controlling it as it surges through your material being.  This  experience can
never be adequately described by words but must be lived to be known.   This is the point which
hails the complete union of the Higher and lower selves.  The  Oversoul and you are now One to
the greatest possible extent.  The Causal body is now  shared as One by the Oversoul and you.   A
person with magickal sight of sufficient  advancement will see a fully developed Causal Body
with the full and active Presence of  the Oversoul within it.  The aura will glow with an intense
deep amethyst/silver glow.  You  and the Oversoul share Its Powers and capabilities jointly. 
You are One and Inseparable  in Consciousness and Action with the Oversoul.   You have
experienced everything that  you must in life.   You are now free of Karma.  This is the last
material vehicle you will  have to express through on Earth.  You are the master of the lower
worlds.  You know the  cycles of birth and rebirth and know the happiness at having completed
the need to ever  undergo the cycle again.   You are free from life that ends in death.  You have
become all  knowledge, power, wisdom, and control of the Oversoul.  Is your journey really
over?

No, not really.  There will always be a perfecting process going on.  There will always be  new
heights to climb and greater understanding to be achieved.  What is included in this  book as
Night Magick is really only the "tip of the iceberg".  But you will always enjoy  your continued
travels and adventures on the Night Road.  There will always be new  things to discover.  There
will always be new adventures and excitement on the Night  Road. I have done my best to guide
you this far on the Night Road.

I want you to understand that this map is not set in concrete. The general course has been  laid
out for you but the time you take to travel on the road and the tests and experiences  you will
undergo are known only to the Oversoul.  Sometimes you may detour slightly into  another
area of magick and that's ok as long as it is the Will of the Oversoul.  I would like  now to help
you understand the Consciousness of the Oversoul.  I call it Night  Consciousness and it is what
you will ultimately achieve. 


7.  Night Consciousness 

There are countless numbers of Souls in creation.   The Soul, that is your Oversoul, is  unique
throughout the Omniverse.  The consciousness of the Oversoul is separated from  the
consciousness of the human being.  It is possible for the two consciousness to join.   This union
of consciousness I refer to as Night Consciousness.  I am going to explore with  you the inner
depths of Night Consciousness.  You will discover things that you will have  to do in order to
attain it.  You will learn to live and practice it and the changes that will  take place within you
as you start to acquire it.  First though, we are going to examine, in  greater detail, exactly what
Night Consciousness is.  

Night Consciousness, in humankind, is a state of causal, mental, emotional, and physical 
being.  It is becoming the Oversoul in each of these states of being.  It is reaching the  greatest
possible state of perfection while here on Earth.  The Causal body is to the  Overself what the
physical/etheric body is to humankind.  Its lowest vibrational body.  

The Causal Body is the storehouse for the experiences of countless lifetimes in  incarnation. 
The Overself experiences life from its dimension through the Causal Body  just as we experience
physical life through the physical body.  When you have achieved  Night Consciousness you
will be able to consciously use the Causal Body.  You will be  able to directly tap into awareness
of the Oversoul.  This will directly effect your mental  being.

Mentally, you must achieve all that the Oversoul is.  It is your mental development and 
attitude which will carry you into this Magickal Consciousness.  When you have mentally  set
your sights upon your goal and give it all that you possible have, then you will bring it  into
manifestation within you.  Night Consciousness is mentally being aware of all  knowledge and
wisdom of the Oversoul.  You will know, whatever it is that you must know  by simply tapping
into it.  You will have supreme wisdom for all situations knowing just  what and how to do it. 
You may have never studied the subject before but the knowledge  will be there when you need it. 
You will have tremendous willpower and concentration.   This is Night Consciousness in
humankind.  Night Consciousness is more then just a  mental state.  It is also your emotional
state of being.  

It fills your world of feeling and changes it to perfection.  It is having perfect  understanding of
all situations.  It is the giving of perfect, absolute love.  This is love  beyond the human state
that enters you into the absolute state of being.  More on this in a  later topic.  The emotional
state in Night Consciousness is one of silence and profound  solitude.  It is a high state of
reflection and receptivity.   It is also a state of aggression,  boldness, and daring.  Night
Consciousness is an emotional state of passion, courage  and love of pleasure and ease.    

This Consciousness even descends into the physical state of being.  Your bodies become  pure,
Night Energy through Night Consciousness.  The body becomes the perfect channel  through
which the Oversoul may flow out into the world.  Night Consciousness is perfect  control and
mastery of the physical being.  This is Night Consciousness in the four  aspects of humankind. 
Night Consciousness is many things to humankind.

It is a state of bliss and peace that humankind has yet to know. It is a state of perfect 
knowledge, wisdom, absolute love, understanding, innocence, happiness, joy, and  freedom.  It
is a state of awareness that words can not do justice to.  Words only tend to  diminish the real
understanding of the nature of Night Consciousness.   Yet I have made  the attempt to do so in
hopes that you would have a better understanding of what it is.   Night Consciousness is the goal
of life on Earth.  It is a goal worth giving your all in  dedication, devotion, and determination to
in reaching it.  Therefore, let's see exactly  what you will have to do in reaching the Bliss of
Night Consciousness.   

The things necessary to do, to reach Night Consciousness, may at first seem to  overwhelm you. 
There is a great deal to accomplish if you want to reach it.  But you  should not be scared by the
number of things you must accomplish, nor by the feeling that  some of them seem impossible
for you to do.   Nothing that is described here will be  impossible for you to do if you will be
determined and persistent in your efforts.  To begin  you must master the physical body.  

Its alright to indulge the physical body with food, pampering and passion.  At the same  time,
you must also balance this with physical training to maintain physical well-being.   The body
is essential to every Night Magician for it is the channel through which Night  Magick flows
and alters the world.  Take care of it. Much of the knowledge you will gain  will slowly alter the
human body changing its frequency into harmony with the Night  Force. As the body changes
you will be able to increase the flow of the Night Force  through you.  Do everything in balance. 
You must become masters of your emotional life.  

From the onset of studying Night Magick you will experience emotions.  It is alright to 
experience and even use the emotions in Night Magick.  But at all times, you must be in  control
them. You must not be ruled by jealousy, lust, pride, or selfishness. You must  control anger and
hatred.  These things will still try to enter into your feelings but you will  gain instant control
over them.   You must remain in control under all conditions.  No  matter how disturbing the
current challenges in your life you must remain centered.   You  must also maintain a balanced
mind.

Your mind must always be centered in the silence of the Night. There is great power in  the
silence of the Mind.  Your mind should be fixed in self-discipline and strong-willed.   Your
mind must be fixed in intellectual pursuit and critical thinking.  You must maintain  original
and independent thinking at all times. You will be inventive and versatile in your  thinking. 
Your mind set must be one of persistence, patience and persevering.  Your  mind will at times be
required to act in a reserved and cautious manner and at other times  courageous, bold, and
gallant. Flexibility to meet the ever changing challenges is the key  of Night Consciousness. 
You must be temperate, wise, and poised in all things.  These  are just a few of the things
necessary for you to reach Night Consciousness.  

They are not easy to master.   Yet they must be mastered and put actively into your life.   You
must live and practice Night Consciousness from the very beginning.  This topic is  placed early
in the book because it is the first thing which you will have to learn and begin  practicing in
Night Magick.  If you are to have any success at all in Night Magick, you will  have to practice
and master this topic.  In all other subjects you will study and master in  this book, Night
Consciousness is of the most importance.   It will bring you success in all  other things you
attempt in Night Magick.  How then do you practice and live Night  Consciousness? 

To begin, you must live the life of the Oversoul.  You must be consciously aware of the  Night
Power that flows through you from your Oversoul.  Everywhere you go, you must  constantly
remain in the Consciousness of the Oversoul.  You must know that you are the  Oversoul and
radiate Night Power.  You must speak and act as the Oversoul.  You must  gain a very special
attitude towards life.   You must learn to be in the world but not of it.   You must not become lost
in the illusions of limitations.  With the aid of Night Magick you  will want for nothing but at
the same time you must never allow material possessions to  possess you.  Your magickal life
must be balanced by your practical life.  You must give  each part of your life equal time.  Your
practical life should be filled with your magickal  nature.  You must learn to take each day, one
at a time.  It is wrong to worry about  tomorrow for in Night Consciousness your destiny of
success is assured.  You must learn  to obey your Oversoul as you would yourself for in reality
you and the Oversoul are One.   All of your needs will be taken care of through Night
Consciousness. That doesn't mean  you can just sit back and do nothing.  You must give your
full effort to life but without  worry or concern about your future.  If you are following the Night
Road to Night  Consciousness, then the outcome is clear.  There is also one other thing that you
can do  to enhance your attaining Night Consciousness until you become more adept in Night 
Magick.  

In your pursuit of Night Consciousness you will be greatly benefitted if you will get out into  the
outdoors as much as possible.  The beauty, peace, and power of nature will do much  in restoring
and helping to maintain your Oversoul Nature.  The Earth is a storehouse of  Night Energy and
by your visits to those places where the Earth has been relatively  untouched you will be able to
absorb the Night Energy.  If you begin to practice what I just  covered and continue to study and
practice Night Magick then you will eventually reach  Night Consciousness.  But only your
Oversoul knows all the things necessary for you to do  to reach Night Consciousness and the
time required to do so.  So you must be untiring in  your efforts to reach it and know that it will
come.  You must come to know that there is no  separation in Consciousness between you and
your Oversoul.  There are signs which will  indicate to you that you are starting to approach
Night Consciousness.  

There are changes that will take place within you all along the road to your final  destination. 
These changes will help reassure you that you are making progress.  One of  the first significant
changes in your life will be a new powerful inner vibration.  

You will become charged with a new zest for life.  The Oversoul Power will flow through  you
and raise every cell in your body in a glorious fire.  You will find you will need less  sleep and
yet your energy will remain very high.  You will find that your health will be  greatly improved
and that your breathing will come much easier.  Your body will become  the Body of your
Oversoul.  You will find yourselves growing more in the ways of the  Silver Rule.  You may do
anything that you want if you always maintain the Eternal Night  Balance.  You will begin to
hear an Inner Voice who will be your instructor and guardian.   This Inner Voice will be that of
your Oversoul and/or Night Teacher who will guide you and  care for you.  This will cause you to
develop flashes of intuition.  These brief moments of  insight should be carefully listened to
and followed.  If you do, then the help will continue  to come to you.  You will find that your
knowledge seems to increase within you.  You will  gain an understanding of things that you
never seemed to understand before.  You will  instinctively seem to know what to do about a
particular problem. For example, if your car  breaks down you will know almost immediately
what is wrong with it and if possible, how  to repair it.  You will also come to know Truth from
untruth.  It doesn't matter whether that  source originates from a person, reading material, or
whatever, you will know whether  what is said is True or not.  Nothing will be able to hide from
your inner knowing and  vision.  This is also about the time when your lower psychic abilities
and faculties start to  open up.  You will learn a great deal about them later in the book.  They
will give you  abilities and powers beyond that of other people.  Therefore you must be careful in
using  them such that the Eternal Night Balance is always maintained.  Do not worry about
these  centers for now in a later topic you will be given what you need to maintain control. You 
will feel a greater need for solitude and a time away from people.  There are more  indications of
approaching Night Consciousness and you will learn more about them as  you continue your
studies of Night Magick.  Remember, Night Consciousness is a  physical, emotional, mental,
and causal development.
 You know some of the things to concentrate on to help develop this consciousness.  As I  just
said you will learn more of the essentials to help develop this consciousness as you  learn Night
Magick.   You have also learned some of the indicators of your developing  Night Consciousness
and when you finally reach it you will know it.  What is required is  effort, dedication,
persistence, self-discipline and study.  With all this, you will achieve  Night Consciousness. 
Combined with Night Magick there won't be a thing you can't  achieve.  Your imagination and
dreams are the only limits in Night Magick.  From this  point in your study of Night Magick, I
would like to go over the principles upon which a  Night Magician's life is based.  

CHAPTER III


BEGINNING NIGHT MAGICK

8.  Standards and Principles of Practicing Night Magick 

You are about to embark on the Night Road of learning Night Magick and achieving Night 
Consciousness.  There are certain standards and practices which you must include in  your life
while on the Road.  I have covered a few of them already but I will go into greater  depth over
some of them and cover some additional standards and principles to insure  your success.   

The Silver Rule (silver being a precious metal to the Night Force) is "you may do anything  that
you want if you always maintain the Eternal Night Balance".  The Eternal Night  Balance is a
fundamental law of the Night Force.  Balance in the Omniverse is a vital  factor to order within
the Eternal Night. For everything you take from the Eternal Night you  must give back to the
Eternal Night in equal measure.  This does not mean of course that  if through Night Magick,
using the energy of the Night Force, you acquire wealth that you  must give money back to the
Night Force.  It means that the amount of energy used to  accomplish something must be
returned in full.  This keeping of the Eternal Night Balance  is an intuitive matter that is easy
to maintain when working within Night Consciousness.    Therefore, before using Night Magick
to accomplish any event, always work within the  consciousness of the Oversoul to be able to
maintain the Balance.  There also follows  another major principle within which you must
practice Night Magick.  This is the "Law of  Night Magick".
  
The Law of Night Magick is "there is nothing impossible when you are One with the Night 
Force".  I mean absolutely nothing. Always remember this fundamental law and believe it  with
all your might.  Remember that everything you do in life is Night Magick. It should be  done in
Night Consciousness.  Your whole life is now an expression of Night Magick and 
Consciousness.  There is nothing you cannot do.   I'd like to turn for the moment to the 
principles governing the Night Magician and the world as a whole.

You will find the world to be rather hostile to you concerning Night Magick.  The religions  of
the world are predominantly Yang. The majority of people have been conditioned to  respond
in a Yang manner.  Yang and Yin are opposite forces which do not mix well.  From Night
Consciousness's view, each soul is responsible for its own world.  Each soul  determines much
of its life and the quality of that life before coming here.  There is some  predestination in all
lives yet there is much which is not.  If individuals are poor and/or  homeless then this gives
the Oversoul that experience.  If souls are wealthy then that is  another experience.  This world
offers a myriad of different experiences for the Oversoul  to live and experience.   The Oversoul
lives many lives on Earth in order to get a well-rounded education.  The Earth can be a very
rough school and souls here are  experiencing in essence the first grade of life.  When the
Oversoul has experienced all  the lessons it deems necessary then It moves on to a new world
with more advanced  lessons to be learned.   This system is called reincarnation and is very
difficult for much  of the world to except.  

They would rather explain much of the world's problems and their own as the fault of  someone
else.  The Christians blame Satan for the ills of the world.  There are many  people who blame
their government.   Others blame other people and their not caring  about their fellow human. 
The Night Magician blames no one.  

The Night Magician knows that her/his beginnings on this planet are chosen from the  other
side of life.  S/he chooses her/his parents, race, sex, country, and many of the future  events
before arriving to insure that the necessary lessons for this life are achieved.  It  may sound
terrible but a woman may actually chose to be raped in order to gain that  experience and learn
from it.  There are children born bad.  They are souls who  previously raped, murdered, robbed,
etc. and are returning little changed from their  previous lives.  Human souls are not born
innocent regardless of how innocent that baby  looks in her/his cradle. They have lived before
on Earth and are returning little changed  from when they last lived on Earth.  They are a
bundle of possibilities and potentials and  already have the beginnings of personality for this
life.  You arrive the same way but as a  Night Magician you must take charge of your life. 
If you don't like it then change it.  Use Night Magick to alter your world.  Some parts of life  are
predestined but many are not. The free times feel like your adrift on a sea without  much
direction.  This is the time to chose a new direction.  You shouldn't get involved in  changing all
the world's ills.  

I believe someone said before that there will always be the poor and hungry.  This is true 
because this world requires those experiences for a certain group of souls.  There will  always be
crime because there will always be others who want what someone else has.   There are
experiences of hardship, suffering, crime, poverty, hunger, divorce, physical  and sexual abuse,
and a thousand more like it.  There are experiences of wealth, fame,  comfort, peace, happy
marriage, beautiful children, successful career, and a thousand  more like it, too.  The Oversoul
needs all these experience possibilities.  The Night  Magician chooses her/his experiences and
controls them through Night Magick.  The  Night Magician knows that the rest of the world
chooses their experiences too and lives  them the best they can so that the Oversoul may gain
experience.  Help the other soul  when led by your Oversoul to do so.  But have no guilt, nor
interfere in another soul's  existence, when in Night Consciousness you know that what they
are experiencing is  necessary.  The practice of Night Magick requires that the affairs of your
world move with  a steady, even pace. 

There is no set limit as to how fast this pace may be.  Setting limits upon pace is a  relative
matter.  But the pace must be even and steady.  Do not become so embroiled in  the everyday
routines of the hustling, bustling world that your world is conducted without  Night Magick. 
You must have a magickal attitude while in the world.  You must keep your  consciousness
raised above the mire and limitations of the world.  You must approach life  with passion and
zest.

In Night Consciousness, life is an adventure. Life is usually made up of one adventure  after
another.  Everything that has happened to you is a type of adventure that requires  your use of
Night Magick to see it through.   There are adventures which you may feel  have had an unhappy
ending.  Perhaps that ending did not have to occur with the use of  Night Magick.  If you are in
the Night Flow and something bad seems to have happened  perhaps there was a reason.  Use
Night Magick to find out.   Use Night Magick to correct  the situation.  Do all this in Night
Consciousness. There will be times when you must  approach life with courage, boldness, and
energy.    There will be other times when you  must use caution, prudence, and reflection. 
Approach life from Night Consciousness and  you will always know what to do.  In Night
Consciousness, life is art.

You are the Night Magician.  You are the artist.  Create!  Create any kind of life you want.   Your
imagination is the limit.  Fill your life with passion and love.  Fill your life with honor, 
dignity, and pride in the works you create.  As the artist be inventive and imaginative in  what
you create as your life.  If you want wealth that is fine.  If you want pleasure and  ease that is
fine.  Remember, Night Balance in what you create.  The Night Magician  operates from a point
of solitude.

The Night Magician is a solitary worker.  This doesn't mean you won't have friends.  You  may
be a very active person socially with many friends.  You can even practice Night  Magick
collectively in groups.  But ultimately, the Night Magician is a solitary worker.  The  Night
Magician must achieve mastery in Night Magick and Night Consciousness on  her/his own.  No
one else can do this for you.  I can show you how to practice Night  Magick and give you the keys
to obtaining Night Consciousness but I can't bestow upon  you, mastery in Night Magick or
Night Consciousness.  This you must do on your own with  study, self- discipline, effort and
energy.

Night Magick is for those willing to pursue knowledge.  It takes knowledge not faith to  become
a Night Magician.  It takes a lover of independent thinking.  One who is free of  convention and
is not a sheep in the world.  It takes mental precision and intelligence to  master Night Magick. 
It will require will power and perseverance to overcome obstacles  when they show up.  You
must learn control of thoughts.  You will hear this over and over,  "thoughts are things".  I don't
know who first said this but remember it.  If you think  thoughts of poverty then guess what,
you are poor.  If you wish some one dead, even idly,  then they may die.   Through Night Magick,
thoughts become things with purpose.  Learn  control of your thoughts from the onset.
Emotions are also part of this.

Emotions add energy to thoughts.  So you must also learn to control emotions.  Emotions,  like
thoughts, are energy and energy changes the world around you.  I am not limiting any  thoughts
or emotions from your world.  You are free to think and feel anything you want.   But
remember, thoughts and emotions will change the world around you and you are  responsible
for those changes.  Keep the Eternal Night Balance.  Remember the Silver  Rule and you will
have no problems.   You need to take care of your physical body.

Night Magicians come in all shapes and sizes.  There are no requirements in this area.   What is
important is the physical body is the ultimate channel through which the Night  Force flows
out into the world.  You need to keep that channel as in tuned with the Night  Force as possible. 
You will learn techniques to do this shortly.  Try to maintain oneness  with your Oversoul and
the Night Force by keeping them in your thoughts and emotions at  all time.  This will help
maintain the balance.   It is alright to smoke, eat, and provide the  body with physical pleasure. 
But balance is again important to your practicing Night  Magick.  You can't practice Night
Magick if you die of overeating, heart attack, or cancer.   You will learn to control your
thoughts and emotions to help prevent these things.  But if  you go too far one way then all your
knowledge won't help if the body can't act as a  channel for the Night Force.  Balance pleasure
with physical exercise, breathing  exercises with smoking, and right thoughts and emotions
that will control the stress and  pressures in your life.  I want to talk to you about drugs.

Their use is a very popular thing.  In the right hands drugs can be very beneficial to  human
health.  Magickally, drugs have been used to induce certain mental and emotional  states.  In
the case of Night Magick, DON'T USE THEM!  Drugs have more then a physical  effect.  They
alter the etheric, astral, and mental bodies. Drugs can do severe damage to  these bodies that
may take many "lifetimes" to repair.  I assure you that there is nothing  drugs can do for you
that Night Magick can't do for you.  There is no high or altered state  that Night Magick can't
achieve for you.  
Drugs can so alter your many bodies that by using Night Magick you will place yourself in 
danger of losing your physical life. Moreover, you may lose your emotional and mental 
stability that will require hospitalization.   So far, I have not limited you in thought or  action
in this book.  But in this case, be warned.  Do not use drugs.  If you are using  prescription drugs
under a physician's care and they severely alter your state of being  then for that time don't
practice Night Magick.  Wait till you no longer need the drugs.   Under drugs I am also including
alcohol. On occasion you may feel like getting drunk.  As  you progress in Night Consciousness
you will eventually be able to drink and not get  drunk.  For most, that is a long time from now. 
Drinking, to a lesser degree, alters the  physical, etheric, astral, and mental bodies.   The effects
are usually not as damaging  unless you overdose on alcohol.  Drinking in moderation is fine. 
There is nothing wrong  with an occasional drink.  For some though, an occasional drink
becomes overuse of  alcohol which ultimately will have the same effect as non-alcohol drugs. 
Again, do not  practice Night Magick while under the influence of alcohol regardless of the
amount of  alcohol.  It has the same possible effect as non-alcohol drugs.   Let's go on to sex.

In today's world one usually talks about sex after talking about drugs.  Sex is great.  With  Night
Magick, sex is going to become fantastic.  The energy that is going to flow through  you during
orgasm will give you the ultimate orgasms of your life.   There are though  some rules that apply
to this area.  

It should be obvious that you must practice "safe sex".  The male should use a condom  and the
woman should be sure he uses it.  No matter how close you are to your spouse or  circle of friends
unless you're sure of their monogamy, men use condoms.   Women  should also use
contraceptives to prevent pregnancy.  Men should learn how to put on  condoms to insure they
don't break and never use petroleum products that will cause the  latex to break.  Women should
also know how to put a condom on a man to insure the  man does it right.  You may find that as
you increase in Night Consciousness and the flow  of the Night Force increases that the only
time you will achieve those ultimate orgasms is  when the partner is also practicing Night
Magick.

In Night Magick, concerning sex, it doesn't matter whether the couple is heterosexual,  male-
male, female-female.  It doesn't matter if the couple act alone.  It doesn't matter if  there is a
man and more then one woman or a woman and more then one man to the  couple.  It doesn't
matter if there is a group of couples of all polarities.  It doesn't matter if  the group is exclusively
men or women.  What really makes the difference is if everyone  is practicing Night Magick.  

When all are practicing Night Magick then all are in the Night Flow.  Everyone present will 
have some increase of energy flowing through them.  All will feel the bond of Night 
Consciousness.  In Night Magick there is no jealousy or possessiveness.  In Night Magick  there
is no Judeo-Christian, or Moslem, or Mormon, or any oppressive religious hang-ups  about sex. 
Each Night Magician is independent and free.  Marriage under Night Magick  is not one of
possession but of mutual cooperation and love.  

Group marriage is a very real possibility under Night Magick because a Night Magician  honors
independence, freedom, and equality in action among Night Magicians.  There is  no jealousy
or possessiveness among Night Magicians.  Women and Men have equal  rights in Night Magick
and Consciousness and in the world itself.  But marriage between a  Night Magician and non-
practicing human being rarely works out.   
Ultimately, the Night Magician changes so much that the spouse no longer understands  the
Night Magician.  It is very rare to find a spouse who will understand the Night  Magician and
their way of life.   The marriage often ends in divorce.  But it is better to  divorce and remain
friends then to stay in a marriage which creates hostility and  resentment.   There is no balance
in such a marriage.  Many are made to feel guilty if  there are children involved and stay
married although there is hostility and resentment  between them.   I believe it is better for
everyone involved if the couple divorce, and even  if they can't remain friends, to at least
remain cooperative and fair with each other  concerning settlement and visitation.   Balance
and harmony are important in a Night  Magician's life.  It is important to her/his success on
the Night Road.  Also important to  this success and of a more concrete nature are Magickal
Tools.    

Down through the ages the Ancient Night Magicians have used many different types of  tools
and implements in the practice of the Ancient Art.  You too are going to need  Magickal Tools
and in the next topic I will help you attain these tools.

9.  A Night Magician's Tools and Weapons 

These are the Night Tools a Night Magician will need to set the proper atmosphere and  conduct
the basic rites.  You will conduct these rites in the room you have designated as  your Magician's
Study within the Magick Circle which you will define its area with the  Night Cord.    

This cord should be made of silk, cotton, or wool.  The cord needs to be long enough so  that
when it is laid down on the floor it will form a circle that contains the altar and  yourself.  If
there are more people then yourself conducting Night Magick or even possibly  just observing
then you will need a long enough length to make a large enough circle to  contain them.  Within
the Night Circle you will build the Night Altar.  

The Night Altar is symbolic for your physical being in which is focused the Night Spirit.   You
will build an altar upon which you will focus your Powers of Eternal Darkness here on  the
Earth plane.  It is best to keep it simple.  The basic structure can be a small table,  box, or
anything which is sturdy.  The altar should be about three feet wide by six feet  long.  The height
of the Night Altar is your decision.  You can have one which is at waist  height when you are
standing and one for when you are sitting.  It is best to have both in  your magickal inventory.
Place the Night Altar so that when you are standing or sitting  behind it you are facing North.  
Use a compass if necessary so that you can place it  facing North.  Then cover the Night Altar
with a cloth of your choice.  If at all possible  choose a black, red, or silver colored cloth.  It is
best if the cloth has no distinctive pattern  on the surface portion of the altar.  This is your
Night Altar.  You then must place upon it  some very special articles.  

Upon the altar and towards the back left side place a red candle and on the right side  place a
black candle.  On the left side and in front of the red candle place an incense  holder and on the
right place your copy of Night Magick.  You may also place any other  small trinkets that help
build your feeling of Night Magick.  Dragons, wizards, owls, and  so on are fine.  The Night Altar
is a sacred symbol before which you come to release  Night Power.  It is the physical symbol of
your body and heart and serves the same  purpose: an anchor of the Night Force.  You will need
a good supply of incense to fill the  incense holder on your Night Altar.  Through trial and error
you will find the right incense  that fits your personal vibration.  Each incense creates a
vibration in the air and as you  grow more magickal, you will be ever more sensitive to its
vibration.  Incense, which is of  the stick variety and is thick in nature is good or you may have
a small charcoal brazier  and powdered incense.  On the Night Altar you will also need the
following things:  a  silver or crystal dish of sea salt; a vial of patchouli oil;  a crystal bowl of
water; a silver or  crystal chalice; and a silver or crystal bell. Now all these articles sit on a
Pentacle which  is in the center of the Night Altar.

The Pentacle is a symbol of the Earth.  It is a round plate made of wood and inscribed  with
sacred symbols of Night Magick.  The plate is thirteen inches in diameter.  For an  example of
such a plate and the layout of the articles see Figure 1.  Then you will need a  loose leaf notebook
which will become your Night Magician's Grimoire.  

From the very beginning of Night Magick you will have practices, exercises, and rites to 
perform and grow from.   After each practice, exercise, or rite you should develop a  grimoire
which records the date, time, and experiences felt in that session. Record in as  much detail as
possible the successes and difficulties experienced.  Keep a separate  section for each type of
practice, exercise, and rite.  This will allow you to see your  progress in each and to help you see
where your difficulties are and how to possibly solve  them.  Be faithful and accurate in all
entries made and this record will help speed your  progress. These are your Night Tools.  Next
you will need your Night Weapons the first of  which is a Night Amulet.

You need to make for yourself an amulet of black quartz crystal. This is a grounding and  power
stone of Night Force.  If you want, the necklace the stone hangs from can also be  made from
quartz. I recommend though that the necklace be made of silver or amethyst.   This will help
balance the power of the black quartz stone.  The Night Amulet will help  keep your physical
body in tune with the Night Force.  You can tune into the Night Amulet  and by holding it
increase your vibration in the Night Force. You will also need to make a  Night Ring.

This should be a ring made of silver.  You can set the Night Ring with any combination of 
amethyst, black quartz, emerald, ruby, or diamond.   A plain band of silver is fine.  You  may
later want to add Night Runes and Night Magick Symbols to the Night Ring as you  learn them. 
The Night Ring is a symbol of union with the Night Force.   Next you need to  make your Night
Wand.

The wand should be about thirteen inches long.  It should be made of wood or silver. You  may
encrust the wand with a combination of semi-precious and precious jewels.  You may  inscribe
the Night Wand with Night Runes and Symbols.  You will find these in Appendix  C.  You may
place a crystal at either or both ends of the wand.  The Night Wand is a focus  of the Night
Energy that leaves your body to be transmitted to an object or place.  You  now need to make a
Night Staff. 

The Night Staff is a symbol of Night Guidance, Power, and Authority.  The Night Staff is to  be
made of wood.  The kind of wood is left up to you but it should be one which you are in  harmony
with.  The Night Staff should be approximately six feet high.  You should leave  the staff in its
natural state or paint it black, red or silver if you feel its necessary.   As said  earlier, the Night
Staff is a symbol of true Night Power and the Night Spirit's support to  you.  You will need a
Night Athame.

This is a small dagger whose blade and handle is about twelve inches in length.  This is  used for
ceremonial purposes only.  Do not use this knife for cutting.  You may want to  place special
symbols on the handle and/or blade to add magickal importance to your  athame.  Make for
your Night Athame a scabbard  which you can place on a belt on your  person.  You will also
need a Night Sword.

You can use any style of sword.  Japanese samurai, scimitar, cavalry sword, or excalibur  style
sword.  You should also have a scabbard which you keep the sword in and attach it  to your side
under your Night Cape.   Of course, the next item you need is a Night Cape.

There is an easy way to make the Night Cape.  Take enough cloth so that you have a  square
which is twice your height long on each side.  Now go to the center of the cloth,  and using a
string that is half the length of one side of the cloth and on one end has a  chalk stick attached,
draw a circle on the cloth that has the radius of half the length of one  side of the cloth.  Also
draw from the center a circle that has a radius of three inches.    Now cut out the small circle
and the large circle.  Then place a slit from one edge of the  small circle you just cut down the
center of the cloth and through the edge.  Sew ties into  the material on the edge you just cut and
near the top of the cape. You will also need to  make a hood that will cover your entire head and
will go over the head far enough to cover  the face.  You may attach the hood to the cape.  See
figure ___.  The Night Cape serves a  valuable purpose.  

The Night Cape acts as an insulator to the outside forces that surround you.  It will help  block
them out of your inner world and keep them from interfering in your magickal  operations. 
Keep the cape secured in a cloth bag and put it where no one else may touch  or bother it.  Use it
only in the practice of Night Magick. Next you will need to make the  Night Plate.

Actually this is a breast plate.  The basic shape and size of this plate is given in Figure __.   You
may change the size and shape as fits you best.  You may place upon the plate Night  Symbols
and Runes.  You may also want to place stones of black quartz, amethyst,  emerald, ruby, or
diamond on it.  The color of the plate should be black with runes and  symbols in red and silver.  
Finally  you will need to make a Night Shield.  

The Night Shield is patterned after the shields used by knights of chivalry.   Some basic  shapes
and sizes are given in Figure ___.  Again the background should be black and  symbols and
runes should be in red and silver.  The runes and symbols you place on the  shield as with the
Night Plate should help you increase your feeling of strength and  courage in Night Magick.  
These runes and symbols should help place you in Night  Consciousness.  The Night Magician's
Tools and Weapons are very valuable to you.   
They provide for you a means to advance in Night Magick.   They provide the proper 
atmosphere in which to practice the lore of Night Magick.  There are other devices that  will be
needed as you progress in your studies.  As a rule, each will be relatively simple to  acquire. 
They will be brought to your attention as you proceed.  The Night Magician's  Tools and
Weapons given here are those which you will need before you proceed further  in Night Magick. 
Once you have your tools and weapons made it is time to select your  Night Name.  

10.  Your Magickal Night Name 

The true name given to anything is very important.  A true name contains the essence of  that
entity.  It describes the differences and qualities of that entity.  To know the true name  of a
thing is to imply acquisition and knowledge of that essence. To know the true name  gives you
dominion over it.  The name that you as a Night Magician will choose is of great  importance.   

You will select a Night Name which to you contains the very essence of your Inner Nature.   This
name may be the same as a famous personage you wish to emulate or a famous  saying or motto.
For example, you may choose a name such as Merlin, Saint Germain,  Abra-Melin, Mithratar,
or any other name that strikes your imagination and heart.  You  may choose a name from a
saying or motto.  A Night Name will help to build-up your  Night Essence, your feeling of Night
Consciousness and will quicken your magickal  vibration.  This name should be given to no
one else to know.  It is your own Magickal  Name that when used will bring you to Night
Consciousness.  Now, you must choose a  second name.  

This is the name that you will be known outwardly by to fellow Night Magicians.  You  should
pattern this name after something unlike your Night Name.  This name will be  used on all
correspondence with other Night Magicians and any published writings.  The  second name is
your public name and is used in such rites and exercises.  Remember, to  know the name of a
thing is to know its Eternal Essence and to have dominion over it.  

In selecting a magickal name you are defining that Inner Essence. To tell another is to  give
him access to your Inner Nature.   He may reach you and make demands of you  whenever he
chooses by knowing your inner name.  Do not reveal it for any reason.  You  should always use
your second or outer name as Night Magicians. To do so will insure  that you will never be
bothered here or hereafter.  Both names are important and should  be selected to help bring you
into your Night Consciousness.  Your Night Name will bring  you closer into the aura of Night
Magick.  Having selected your Night Name you now must  learn Magickal Protection in order to
conduct Night Magick safe from outside influences.   

11.  Night Pillar 

What you are about to learn is perhaps the most valuable Night Tool you will ever  acquire. 
There are many forces in the world which will attempt to do you harm if you  practice Night
Magick. By harm, I don't necessarily mean physical violence although that  is possible.  I am
talking about the threat of harm to your subtle bodies: Astral, Mental,  and Causal bodies. 
Harm to these bodies could cause serious emotional and mental  sickness.  There is also the
threat of attack to your Etheric which usually translates to  physical harm.   For Night
Magicians there is a serious threat of attack from Yang  followers.   This could be from so-
called White Magicians and their use of magick against  you.  It could come from Christians,
Jews, Muslims and so on. Attacks can come from  collective emotional or mental energy meant
to harm a Night Magician.  A group of Yang  worshipers gathered together in prayer praying for
the demise of all Night Magicians  everywhere could build up enough energy to harm the
unprotected Night Magician.  As  you grow more magickal you will become very sensitive to
subtle energies around you.   Attacks could come from anyone who wishes you harm.  You will
need protection.  You  will need to build the Night Pillar.  The Night Pillar is not just for
protection.

The Night Pillar also acts as an invisible wall which will contain the energy you will be 
creating through Night Magick. This will allow you to build-up the energy to a great  intensity
before you release it to accomplish your will.  This will increase the effectiveness  of the
magickal rites you create.  So how do you build the Night Pillar.

You begin by calming and clearing your mind of extraneous thoughts.  Close your eyes  and
visualize the Night Energy collecting around your form.  See the Night Energy forming  a pillar
of protective force that extends around you about six feet.  See that energy flowing  below your
feet and above your head.  See yourself in a pillar of deep violet and emerald  energies.  See
yourself in a pillar of darkest night.  Know that you cannot be harmed while  contained in the
Night Pillar.  Now say the following invocation:

"I am a Night Magician surrounded in a Pillar of Night Energy that cannot be penetrated.   It
repels all energy that would harm me.  It repels all thoughts and emotional energy of  my
enemies. Through the Power of my Oversoul, I am protected in a Pillar of Night Energy  and
cannot be harmed.  May this Night Pillar remain around me at all times keeping me  out of
harms way.  So be it." 

Say this invocation and visualize the Night Pillar around you until you can feel its  protection.
This energy comes from the Oversoul within.  As you begin the invocation the  Oversoul extends
the Night Energy into your world through the silver cord. The silver cord  is your life line to
your Oversoul and through it all energy passes to you which sustains  your life on Earth.  You
can invoke more of this energy and power into your life when you  work in conscious union
with your Oversoul.  There are many different kinds of energy  which can be invoked into your
world through the Oversoul.  The Night Energy of  Protection is only one of them.  You will
learn about many more types of energy you can  invoke and use towards the end of the book. 
What you want to remember about the Night  Pillar is to use it often.   

Always place the Night Pillar around you before you work Night Magick.  Always place 
yourself in the Night Pillar at the beginning of each day.  The more you use it the stronger  it
will become.  The Pillar will protect you from all physical and psychic harm.  You must  learn
to consciously keep the Night Pillar around you all the time.  You should always  remain in the
Night Pillar.  Everything that you practice in the lore of Night Magick should  begin with the
Night Pillar.  You must always do this whether it's stated so or not.   Through the Night Pillar
you will safely live and learn in Night Magick.  You now have  built a strong foundation upon
which to live and practice Night Magick. You have learned  what it is to be a Night Magician
and to practice the lore of Night Magick.  If you are ready  to begin using Night Magick then let's
consecrate your Night Study and Tools.                         

12.  Invocation to Night Magick  

This is a most sacred time in your life for it marks the beginning of your entry into Night 
Magick.  You are going to perform a very sacred rite to mark your entry.  You will, in this 
solemn rite, dedicate your physical, emotional, mental, and magickal energies to the  practice
of Night Magick.  This rite is meant to convey to you the seriousness and  importance with
which you should view Night Magick.  In this rite, you will learn the basics  which will begin
every ritual you will learn.  In this rite, you will invoke the Night Energy  into your Night Tools
and Weapons and make them yours and yours alone.  The Night  Tools and Weapons will then
be sacred and contain the Power of the Night. To begin, you  must have your Magician's Study
and Night Altar prepared.  

To do this, have all your Night Tools and Weapons laid out on the Night Altar.  Have the  cord
laid on the floor in a circle around the Night Altar.  On the Night Altar you should now  light
the candles and the incense.  Your bowl should be full of water and your chalice  should contain
wine or grape juice.  Be sure and turn off the phones and lock the doors so  you won't be
disturbed. Once you have accomplished this be sure and have your Night  Name selected.  It is
this name you will use in the performance of this rite.  Now for the  actual ritual.

You will begin by invoking the Night Pillar.  Standing before your Night Altar and with your 
eyes closed see the Protective Night Energy pouring down from the Oversoul above you,  through
your head, on into your heart, and out into the study completely surrounding and 
interpenetrating the room.  See the Light continuing through you and on into the Earth.  At 
this point you should repeat the Night Pillar Invocation given earlier.   Feel the Night  Energy
concentrate deeply within the circle boundary outlined by the cord.  

Now pick up the bell and ring it six times in each major direction, that is North, South,  East
and West.  Then repeat the following invocation, "I who am (give your Night Name)  summon
the Presence of all Deities in the Night Force to attend my ritual of Eternal Night.   To witness
my consecration of my Night Tools in the service of the Eternal Darkness.  We  now stand in the
Eternal Night beyond time and space.  Come and witness my Ritual of  the Night".  After this,
pick up the salt container, and repeat the following: "By my sacred  name, (give your Night
Name), through the Presence of my Oversoul and the Eternal Earth  Deities, I invoke the Earth
Night Power into this container of salt and now place the salt  upon the earth to mark the
boundary of my sacred circle."  Visualize the Earth Deities  filling the vessel with their power. 
Pinch a little salt lightly between your fingers dropping  it on the floor over the cord going
completely around the circle.  BE CAREFUL NOT TO  STEP OUTSIDE THE CIRCLE FOR THE
REMAINDER OF THE RITUAL.  Place the salt  container back on the Night Altar and pick up
the crystal bowl of water.   Repeat the following: "May the Presence of my Oversoul and the
Eternal Water Deities fill  this water and container and endow it with the Water Night Power." 
Visualize the Water  Deities of the Earth filling the vessel with the power.  With your left hand
dip it into the  water and sprinkle lightly the boundary you have already marked with the salt. 
Place the  water bowl back on the altar and pick up the incense burner.

Repeat the following: "Let the Presence of the Four Winds of the Earth enter into the  incense
burner filling it with Air Night Power".   Now face each direction, rotating  counterclockwise,
and see the Presence of each Wind Deity enter into the incense burner.   Then circle four times
in a counterclockwise manner around and within the Magick Circle.   Place the incense burner
back on the Night Altar and pick up the candle.

Repeat the following:  "May the Presence of my Oversoul and the Fire Deities of the Earth  place
their sacred flame here within my candles and upon my Night Altar."   See the Fire  Deities
come and dance around the flames and upon your altar.  Place the candle back  where it came
from and pick up the chalice of wine or juice. 

Repeat the following: "Let the Presence of my Oversoul and the Eternal Darkness enter  into the
liquid and fill it with the Power of the Eternal Night.  May this elixir give me  strength, healing,
and courage each day of my life."  Feel the Power flow through you and  into the chalice.  See the
energy collect and concentrate till the chalice glows with Night  Energy.  Then drink the liquid
and your ready to consecrate the other Night Tools.

You will begin with the oil so pick it up and repeat the following: "Let this oil be made  sacred
and filled with the Power of the Night.  Let the Presence of the Oversoul and Night  Spirit touch
it with their might, courage, solitude, and darkness.  For the oil is now sacred  and made for
anointing the Weapons of a Night Magician."   Take a small amount of oil  and touch the
Pentacle and state, "May the Night Force flow into this Pentacle and bless  all things laid on it". 
Now it is time to anoint each weapon in your sacred arsenal.

You will pick up each Night Weapon, one at a time, and while placing a small amount of  oil on
each tool, repeat the following: "Through the Presence of my Oversoul and the  Eternal
Darkness, I (Night Name), consecrate this Night Weapon in the service of Night  Magick and the
Eternal Night."  Do this with the Night Amulet, Ring, Wand, Staff,  Grimoire, Athame, Sword,
Plate, Shield, and Cape.   Now put the Night Amulet, Ring,  Plate, Athame and Sword on your
body.  Place the Grimoire in the front center edge of  your Night Altar.  Put on the Night Cape. 
Place the Night Shield over your left forearm and  in the left hand hold the Night Wand and in
the right hold the Night Staff and state the  following:  "I,(give your Night Name), commit my all
to the Oversoul and the Night Spirit  within, and to the dedication of my Magickal Energies to
the practice of Night Magick.  I  dedicate myself to the Oversoul within and to my union with it
in Night Consciousness.   May these Night Tools and Weapons serve me ever in this cause. So be
it."  Now face  each direction and repeat the following:  "Thank you Night Deities for your
attendance at  this sacred Night Rite.  May we ever serve the Eternal Powers of Darkness here
on Earth  and the Omniverse forever. So be it."  And that's it, you have finished your first night
rite  and all your Night Tools and Weapons are consecrated in Night Magick.  At this point stop 
and re-enforce your Night Pillar and then take off all your Night Weapons and place them  back
upon the Night Altar. Leave the cord in place on the floor.  

Each ritual will begin by your stepping into the Night Circle and putting on your Night 
Weapons and Cape.  It is alright if you wear your Night Amulet and Ring outside the  Circle. 
After this place the Night Pillar around you.  Do not leave the Circle until the end  of the ritual
and be sure and re-enforce the Night Pillar around and through you before  leaving the Night
Circle.  Go through the actions of consecrating the Night Circle with  earth, water, air, and fire
each time.  Fill the chalice, say the invocation, and drink the  wine each time.  Then always
ring the bell and summon the Night Deities.   These are the  basic procedures you will begin each
ritual which takes place within the Night Circle.  I  hope you have had fun and are ready to
begin learning about the first realm you will pass  through on the Night Road.  Let's go then to
the Earth Realm.

CHAPTER IV


Earth Magick

13.  The Earth Realm  

Since time began there has been traditionally four elements which make up the world of  the
Night Magician.  These are the elements of Earth, Water, Air, and Fire.  They are  symbolic for
the basic four worlds of being: that of the physical(Earth), emotional(Water),  mental(Air), and
causal(Fire).  The Oversoul must express through each of these realms  using the appropriate
vehicle or body and ultimately gain mastery over each of them. So, I  have divided Night
Magick into four basic realms with knowledge, exercises, and rituals  appropriate to each
realm. Ultimately, the Oversoul, through you, working in and  mastering each realm will have
learned all that must be learned here upon Earth and  return no more.  The Earth Realm is your
beginning point in becoming a Night Magician.    I want to take you back to the beginning of
time and the origin of the soul.

From an understanding of general cosmology, that is the origin of the Void, 
Monad/Godsoul/Oversoul and the soul of humankind, then this will help you to see the  whys
of a magickal evolution and the reasons for being on the Night Road that follows this  magickal
evolution.  

There is no beginning to the origin of the Void.  The Void has always been, is now, and  ever will
be.  The Void is principle, unmanifest, and exists entirely in itself, from itself, and  by itself. 
The Void is the potential and unmanifest Source of all that exists.  The Void is  the Life present
in all things.  It is omnipresent, omnipotent, and omniscient.  From out of  the Void, the
potential and unmanifest Source, comes the Ultimate Yin and Yang  Creators.   The Spirit of
the Spirits.   The Ultimate Spirits are the first and only creations  by the Void.  The totality of
all that the Void can be is brought into being in the Ultimate  Spirits.  The Ultimate Spirits
derive all potential and essence from the Void, the potential  and unmanifest.  The Ultimate
Yin and Yang then created twin parallel matrixes and so it  began.  What is now referred to here
is also applicable for the Ultimate Yang.  

The Ultimate Yin created beings like unto itself.  Each of these Beings I will refer to as a 
Monad.   Each Monad was created in order to share in the joy of creation with the  Ultimate
Yin.  The Eternal Night gave to each Monad the potential of becoming all that It  is.  The Dark
Goddess-God gave to each Monad the essence and potential for expressing  the Eternal
Darkness.  Each Monad evolves into the Oneness of the Eternal Night by  actualizing its
Eternal Night's potential.  Each Monad grows by bringing into  manifestation the latent
abilities and powers placed within It by the Eternal Night.  Like  the Eternal Night, each Monad
is given the right of free will to determine how it will do  this.  The free will of each Monad
permits it to choose how it will create and what path of  evolvement to follow.  When the Monad
chooses to manifest its Abilities and Powers and  to Create, the way of interest to you as a Night
Magician, is by its descent into matter.  

The material universe is made up of an infinite number of vibrational energies.  The very 
highest of these energies is the substance upon which the Monad first creates.  Through  the
Creative Power of the Monad, acting on the highest vibrational matter, the Monad first  takes
on form.  This is not form as you understand form but something that is beyond your 
understanding. When the Monad first takes on form, it becomes two Godsouls.  

The two Godsouls are true twin souls.  They are the magickal twins who shall evolve and  create
together by the Will and Power of the Monad.  They each have free will and free  choice of their
own.  Yet all creation that proceeds from them is related.  All fragments of  their divine spirit
which are sent forth to be ensouled in the world of spirit and matter are  thus related and united
in purpose.  In all they do the twin souls are united through the  Will of the Monad.   One
Godsoul is predominately Yin with Yang and the other is totally  Yin.  This is a simplification
of the energy systems but basically these twin Godsouls now  have the creative energies ready to
continue downward into material creation.  Each  Godsoul has the full potential and essence of
the Monad and also the free will to use  them.  Because of the power and high vibrational
energies of the Godsoul it cannot  continue its direct descent into matter, thus it created an
extension of itself into the lower  worlds.  This level of presence I have called the Oversoul.  The
Oversoul is a being of lower vibrational levels.  It is very active on its levels in  learning and
creating and using the potential given to it by the Godsoul.  Ultimately, the  Oversoul must
learn to create on the lowest of levels and thus it sends a part of itself into  the lowest worlds of
form and so is born the soul. 

The soul is the instrument through which the Oversoul learns about the lowest worlds of 
creation.  The human soul will return to the Earth many times for the human body does  not
last long. The human soul will return to experience many different lives in order that it  might
gain all the experience the Earth has to teach it.  Once the human soul has gained  all the
experience the Oversoul needs then the human soul will move on to different  worlds and
dimensions in order to gain new experience.  The soul gets its life force and  direction from the
Oversoul.  This Power and Will flows through what is called the Silver  Cord.  This Cord is made
up of high energy particles through which flows energy of  varying frequencies.  The soul
operates through a mental, emotional or astral, etheric,  and physical body.  On Earth this is
the human body.  

The Soul (Oversoul and soul) is very delicate and composed of very high vibrational  energies.  
If the Soul is to grow, develop, and evolve in material creation then it has to  have a material
vehicle through which to work.  You could compare this to a person who  wants to go into outer
space.  

Because outer space is very cold, lacks oxygen, and is a vacuum the human body could  never
withstand going out into space without being protected from it.  So a special suit is  designed
which is heated, pressurized, and contains oxygen with which to breathe. It also  contains
many devices and sensors to work in space and monitor the surroundings.  In  order to protect
the delicate Soul from the dense material surroundings, and for it to be  able to work in and
monitor its surroundings a special suit was devised. This is called the  physical body.   

The physical body is composed of the lowest and densest matter. It is designed to  respond and
interact with its material surroundings.  There are the five senses: sight,  touch, smell, taste,
and hearing; and their respective organs: eyes, skin, nose, mouth, and  ears.  These allow the
soul to react to the world around it.  The hands, arms, legs, feet,  and joints allow the soul to
work with its surroundings with great dexterity and ability.  The  physical body is an excellent
tool through which the soul to operate when it is properly  attuned and under the control of the
Oversoul.  Unfortunately, for the majority of  humankind this is not the case.               

Too many human beings are the human body instead of the soul and Oversoul.  The 
Oversoul/soul is not in charge but it is the human body which is in charge.  The human  body is
basically undisciplined and unruly.  Whatever the human body wants it gets and  half the time
it doesn't really want what it thinks it wants. Without the control of the  Oversoul/soul, the
body is helpless before the elements of life.  The human body has no  control over the world
around it.  Because of this current state, the Oversoul/soul does not  pay attention to the human
body.  It is much like a car out of control.  If you were the  driver of a car that refused to go where
you wanted it to go and was always headed for  destinations unwanted and going past places
uncared about, you would get out and just  let it go till it crashed and burned.   This is pretty
much what the Oversoul/soul does  concerning the human body.  But there is a way to change
this. You must identify, tune  into, and become the Oversoul/soul.  

You must gain mastery over the physical body.  You are the Oversoul/soul and not the  physical
body.  You must remember that you are eternal and only working through the  physical body.  It
is your tool through which to work and experience the material world  around you.  You cannot
allow the passions and desires of the body to rule you.  You  must develop control over the body.
Properly channeled and controlled these forces can  be used to your advantage instead of your
detriment.  You will learn through Night Magick  how to develop this control and mastery.  The
Night Magician must attain through  discipline, diet, exercise, and ritual mastery over her/his
body and the world around  her/him. But in all trials that occur in your life be easy on yourself.  
You will fail many times, but get up, dust off your knees, and go on vowing to try and do  better. 
Never give up for all things are possible to those who follow the Night Magician's  life.   "The
world is but a stage and we are the actors upon it,'' thus it was said by  Shakespeare.  This world
is but an illusion and your attitude should be that of "in it but  not of it".  You must never
become lost in the illusion of the game played by the majority  of humankind.  You must
become the Master of Illusion, the Night Magician.  Let me  discuss with you for a moment the
Stage upon which we experience life.

After many millenniums of experience there is a Soul who is qualified to become a  Planetary
Soul.  The Planetary Soul is the Soul for every person upon that planet.  Think  of a pie sliced
into an incredible number of pieces of pie.  The pie as a whole is the  Planetary Soul and you are
one of those pieces of the pie. The Earth is the physical body  of a very advanced Soul who I have
told you is the Ancient Dragon Tiamat.  Many of  humankind have named this Soul, Gaia/Pan. 
This name representing the fe/male aspect  of the Earth Soul.  Every human being is a part of
the Soul of Earth.  Moreover every part  of our human body, that is causal, mental, emotional,
etheric and physical is directly  effected by the Earth Soul.  Our entire existence is constantly
effected by the Energies of  this Being which plays upon our own energies.  Just as you are
developing and evolving  magickally so is Soul Earth.  Soul Earth's evolution is far greater
then that of yours but all  are aiming towards the One Goal; every greater unfoldment of Night
Consciousness.  You  must take care of the Earth Body.

It is your stage upon which you gain magickally and moreover it is the vehicle through  which
Gaia/Pan gains magickally and has its physical being.   If the body of Tiamat is  killed then the
Soul will leave it just as if your body is killed your soul must leave it.  If  there is continued
pollution and destruction of planetary life and resources then soon  Tiamat will have to rid
itself of the cancer that is causing physical destruction.  I believe  all of humankind should
take this as a warning.  It has happened before and it will happen  again, Tiamat will not allow
the death of its physical body before its proper time.  It will do  what is necessary to stop the
destruction of its body just as you would.   There is also  another type of destruction happening
on Earth and that is with alien races from the Yang  matrix.

I know this subject may be tough for you to deal with but consider it as you have  everything
else, with an open mind.
This planet is a battlefield between Yang races and the Night Soul of this world, Tiamat.   The
opening poem was not just a piece of fiction.   There are still Yang races who desire  to possess
the Earth for its wealth and who enjoy dominion over human beings.  There  are other Yang
races who plan to slowly convert the Yin souls of this world into Yang  souls.  To change the
basic polarity of all souls on this world.  They believe that their  polarity is the only
appropriate polarity and would see the destruction of the Yin matrix of  life.   What evidence is
there of this?

I can point out to you books on the market today that deal with alien visitation and 
kidnapping in which there are biological experiments going on to create a human/alien  yang
body in which they plan on placing Earth yin souls in order to ultimately change the  polarity
of the souls.  Turning back to the pie example given earlier, think of what happens  to the pie if
pieces of it are removed never to be returned.  I believe Soul Death is an  appropriate term.   You
can look at the Yang religions that were introduced by the so-called gods or god and see that
through their magickal practices they slowly change a  soul's vibration from Yin to Yang. 
These of course are the religions that have no  tolerance for other religions and have gone to
great lengths to force conversion on others  such as Christianity.  There is also my own
personal experience.  I will not go further in  discussing my personal experience except to say it
wasn't pleasant and could have led to  my ultimate destruction.  What can you do?

You will learn many things to do in Night Magick.  You will learn to place your body in 
attunement with the Yin Force of this planet.  You are learning to unite with the  consciousness
of the Oversoul which is one in consciousness with the Planetary Oversoul.   If enough human
souls accomplish this the Night Force will become too strong for the  Yang races to deal with. 
You have learned to take care of the Earth.  Go out and help  environmentalists who promote
care of the planet.   When you feel physically well the rest  of you responds in kind and so it is
with the Earth.  If the Earth Body is strong and healthy  the Earth Soul will be strong and its
aura will repel the alien races.  In your meditations  and visualizations, see the Earth and Its
Soul strong in the Night Force.  Use your Night  Pillar and extend its protection around and
through the Earth.  Use your Night Pillar  around every human body and soul to keep them
strong in the Night Force.  If enough of  humankind joins in there will be no destruction of the
Yin life force.  If you think that  aliens are fiction, DON'T.  If you practice Night Magick you will
draw their attention to you.   I have had personal experience with aliens and my battle with
them continues.  I advise  you strongly to wear your Night Amulet and Ring at all times and
keep your Night Pillar  strong through constant use.  I hope you will take my advice and not
have to learn through  experience.  

This is the Earth Realm where you have to live and practice Night Magick.  In Earth  Magick, I
will introduce knowledge, rites, and exercises which will help to improve and  refine your
physical body.   To make your body a more sensitive instrument to the Night  forces around
you.  The more refined the instrument the greater the Night Power that will  be able to be
expressed through it.  These exercises will not only benefit the physical but  overlap into the
development of the higher vehicles too.  Earth Magick will give you  ultimate control over your
physical body and the world around you.  So study with all your  heart, persevere, practice,
have courage and patience and you will attain the Earth.  Your  first subject for study and
practice in the Earth Realm is Night Breathing.     

14.  Night Breathing    

Breathing is an important aspect in life and Night Magick. Breathing is essential to life  and
your well-being.  That may seem like an obvious statement since without air you  could not
live, but actually breathing means more then just taking in air to sustain life.  As  you will see,
breathing correctly and with the knowledge of what it can do for you will  propel you far down
the magickal road.  Incorrect breathing leads to many problems in  your life.  

Does it seem that you run out of energy well before the day is done?  Are you often  nervous and
irritable for no real apparent reason?  Through correct breathing you can  eliminate these
problems from your life.  You will be able to go through each day with  boundless energy. 
Tension, irritability, and nervousness will disappear from your life.   What is wrong with the
way you breathe?  

Stop right now and notice how you are breathing.  Do you find that your breathing is  shallow? 
Almost everyone in the world is a lazy breather.  Deep breathing is a simple  thing to do but in
the beginning it will take some effort on your part for it to become a  regular practice.  Begin by
taking a slow, deep breath and as you inhale, not only expand  your chest to hold more air but
force out your abdomen and feel that air going deep down  into your lungs.  When you have
inhaled as much air as you can, try to take in just a bit  more air.  Really fill up your lungs.  
Now that you have inhaled as much air as possible,  exhale very slowly and steadily.  Bring
your expanded abdomen in and force out the air  till you are completely empty.  At no time
should you strain yourself in doing deep  breathing.  Even though you cannot go around in
public being very obvious about this  exercise you should, no matter where you are, breathe as
deeply, slowly, and  rhythmically as possible.  You will do this consciously at first but soon
this will become a  part of your life without thinking of it.  Do this and you will have a vibrant,
youthful body.   Why would an increase in air intake cause this increased vitality?   

There is an active, vital, life force that energizes the world around you.  In the Eastern 
languages this essence is called Prana.  This Force is active not only on the physical  plane but
on all planes or dimensions of life.  On the physical level, you breathe in the air  which
contains one aspect of this Force and which then is transmitted throughout your  body via the
nerve network.  When you are feeling nervous, irritable, or tense, this can be  due to a lack of
this vital Force.  The Pranic Force is not just for the physical body.  

There are many aspects of the Pranic or what is called in Earth Magick, Earth Force.  To  utilize
the Earth Force, you must learn to draw in this Energy within you.  The technique  outlined is
termed Night Breathing.  
To begin with, retire to your Magician's Study and sit comfortable with spine erect in your 
chair.  For a few minutes practice deep breathing with your feet on the floor and touching.  Your
hands should be resting in your lap, palms down at all times.  The indrawing of the  Earth
Force is through the action of the mind rather then the physical act of breathing.  As  your
attention has been on the physical act of breathing let's now move it to the Earth  Force
surrounding you.  

This Force is the Life of the world.  Through it you have your well-being.  Your mind must 
remain in a state of complete openness to the Earth Force.  Your mind must be  completely
centered in the Earth Force alone.  The mind must be without strain.  You  must not force the
indrawing of the Earth Force.  It is breathed into your being through a  conscious attunement to
it. Feel the Earth Force entering into your body.  See it  penetrating every cell in your body and
causing them to be filled Earth Light.  Know that  as it fills your physical body with Earth Light
and Life that the Earth Force also charges  your higher bodies with this same Emerald Light. 
As you continue to absorb the Earth  Force know that you will achieve a Oneness with it.  You
will lose identity with your  physical body and forget physical limitations for in the Earth
Force there are no limits.   You are the Earth Force, Limitless and Free.  Through Night
Breathing, you will become  filled with the Earth Force.  This Force will keep your body in
Eternal Youth.  You will be  free of sickness. You will have abundant energy.  Not only does the
Earth Force quicken  the physical but also the Emotional Body.  Your outlook on life will
improve.  It will raise  the vibration of your body so that depression, loneliness, and fear will
not have a part in  your world.  The Night Force transforms the Mental Body.  It can give you
perfect memory.   Your mind and all that it can do will be greatly enhanced.  Your memory will
be able to  search back to when it first was.  The Earth Force will help raise your overall Being
into  Night Consciousness.  In addition to the practice of Night Breathing and the use of the 
Earth Force you must also study and practice the art of the Magician's Meditation.         

15.  The Night Magician's Meditation    

The Night Magician's Meditation is the beginning level at which you will begin to awaken  your
Inner Self.  It is an exercise that is essential to your magickal growth.  In the  beginning stages
of meditation, your sense of awareness will take place from your  physical awareness, but as
you grow your conscious awareness will move into your  Oversoul.  There are many benefits
that can be derived from meditation.  

Meditation will greatly benefit your health.  The body will become inwardly calm and 
tranquil.  The practice of Magician's Meditation can help to eliminate ulcers and other 
physical problems due to stress and tension.  What meditation can do for you physically it  can
also do for you emotionally.  

You can achieve a state of emotional tranquility and stability never before thought  possible. 
No matter the confusion going on around you, you will be able remain steady  and firm as a
rock. It will develop your ability to concentrate and to expand the workings  of your mind.

You will be able to achieve true telepathic communication with those of similar magickal 
standing.  Your memory will be vastly enhanced.  Ideas from the Higher Mental Realm  will
come to you. From the Mental Realm, you will be able to contact and obtain  information from
the Akashic Record.  This Record I will speak of later.  You will be able  to know the past,
present, and future probabilities for yourself and for others.  You will be  able to gain a true
understanding of your life and why you are here. There are  preparations and precautions to
take prior to meditating.  

First, you must watch the food you eat.  You must avoid fried foods and spicy foods close  to the
meditation period.  Do not eat just prior to meditating for a full stomach can be  quite
discomforting.  You will then need to set a quiet period aside each day.  This period  should be at
the same time each day if possible.  Early morning or late evening will be  the best time. You
should feel refreshed when you meditate so wash up prior to  commencing.  Now that you have
taken care of your bodily needs it is time to set the  proper atmosphere for meditation.  

Retire to your Magician's Study and be sure that you can not be disturbed for say a half  hour. 
Put on your robe, light your incense, and sit down in a very comfortable chair.  Do  not light
your candle for the flickering will tend to distract you.  Once you have done this  you are ready
to begin the Magician's Meditation.

Close your eyes now and place the Night Pillar around you. Follow this with Night  Breathing. 
Now select the type of meditation.  There are actually two ways of meditating,  and they differ
by your conscious directive.  
The first way of meditating will have you direct your thoughts on a particular subject.  For 
example, the subject can be on strength.  You will want to look at the different types of 
strength.  Try to understand how strength develops and how you can become stronger.   You can
go on to becoming Pure Strength and the qualities needed in your life to be  Strength.  As you
continue to look fully at the subject of strength and understand all that  there is about it your
conscious thoughts will slowly be overshadowed by your Oversoul,  and you will be given true
enlightenment on Strength, or any subject you should choose.  The second way deals with
entering the Silence of your Oversoul.

Here you will not choose a topic but remain in a state of silence and complete Openness  to the
Indwelling Oversoul.  You must remain completely free of thought.  You must not  enter into
this meditation with cares or worries but surrender them into the care of your  Oversoul.  As
you advance into the meditation you will become aware of Its Presence.   You will feel Its
Energy.  Here the Oversoul will choose the subject of importance and  instruct you directly. 
Remember, "to be Silent and Know".  

Having chosen the type of meditation, turn your attention to within yourself and give open 
recognition to the Oversoul within. If you feel a slight sense of shaking or a raising of the  heart
beat do not let it bother you.  It is a good sign that what you want is taking place.   Remain very
relaxed and allow your thoughts to drift on the subject.  Do not overtire  yourself. If at first you
can only do five to ten minutes then that's fine. Do not push for  results.  The results will come
in their own good time.  Meditate only as long as you feel  comfortable with it. After you have
finished don't get up and plunge back into the work-a-day world.  Take it easy and allow
yourself a few minutes or however long is necessary to  adjust to a faster pace of living.  In
Magician's Meditation, you slowed your rate of living  considerably.  Strive to attain but be
patient for the results to happen.  You will not attain  all you can be overnight but someday the
Night will be yours.  There is nothing greater  you can do for your quest on the Night Road then
the sincere practice of Night Magician's  Meditation.  In Night Magician's Meditation you
studied a method of changing your  conscious vibration and attuning it with the Oversoul's
Consciousness.  Now you are going  to explore the very depths and heights of the Realm of
Vibration.  
16.  The Realm of Vibration    

The study of vibration is important to a Night Magician.  The actual magickal progression 
made is a result of increased vibration of the physical, emotional, mental, and causal  bodies.
You must therefore begin with the lowest level of vibration, the physical, and  study its nature.  

Vibration is movement.  In the physical world, vibration is based on molecular motion or 
movement.  The physical world is composed of small particles in motion which are termed 
molecules. Molecules are composed of small particles known as atoms.  Atoms are  composed
of even smaller particles which are protons, neutrons, and electrons.  If you  could become
small enough you would see that the electrons orbit around the nucleus  like the planets around
the Sun.  If you took the analogy farther, you would see that the  human body would be
composed of many solar and galactic systems.  The human body is  in constant molecular
motion which produces something akin to electricity.  There are  machines today which can
measure this very fine electricity.  The combination of this fine  electricity added to the Energy
of the Oversoul causes sentient life.  All forms of matter  produce this fine energy due to
molecular motion.  

Further, all matter, that is the mineral, plant, and animal kingdoms, are guided in 
development, just as you are, by a Higher Power and therefore have Life.  This Life is  perhaps
not as you know Life, but yet it is Life.  As you have seen, all forms of matter have  molecular
activity.  This molecular activity is very active in some forms and slower in  others.  The rock
has a very slow molecular, or vibrational rate, whereas the air has a very  high vibrational
rate.  This rate of vibration is termed frequency.  When the vibrational rate  is high the
frequency is high and the opposite is also true.  You have learned that matter  is in a constant
state of motion.  That all motion has a relative vibrational rate, or  frequency, dependent on
the molecular activity.  An important part of the physical realm of  vibration which goes on to
touch all levels of vibration is light and color.  

Light and colors are dependent on matter and its rate of vibration.  Color is important in  your
physical life.  In a moment, you will discuss how it effects the human body, but some 
background information on light and color will prove beneficial. Light is energy.  Light is 
actually electromagnetic radiation. When light strikes an object the molecules absorb  some of
that energy, and in turn, that which is not absorbed is reflected and radiated out  into the
surrounding space.  This radiation is perceived by the eyes as color.  The  different colors seen
are due to the different frequencies of that radiation.  This frequency  is a slightly different
term than that used to describe molecular activity.  The frequency  used to measure color is
based on the fact that color is a radiation or energy.  Light is  separated into seven basic
frequencies.  These frequencies are seen as the colors red,  orange, yellow, green, blue, indigo,
and violet.  Red is of the lowest frequency and violet  the highest. Here you have looked at the
physical definitions of light and color.  How,  though, can light and color be of benefit to the
well-being of your physical body?  

You are familiar with how colors can effect one's mood.  A blue room for example can  give one
a feeling of peace and relaxation while a red room would tend to make one feel  energetic or
even nervous.  But few of us are aware of how colors can effect the physical  body directly.  The
entire principle behind color healing is vibration.  Every part of your  body vibrates at a
particular frequency.  Disease is the result when any part of the body  develops disharmony or
the wrong frequency.  Color radiation when directed at the  particular area of imbalance,
induces a sympathetic vibration into that organ and corrects  the frequency of the organ back
to its original frequency, and thus, good health.  How can  this be done? 

Before explaining this procedure its best to give this WARNING!!! Do not go out based on  these
teachings and setup a healing practice!  If you are not a doctor, are you really sure  of what is
wrong with the person?  You could be sued if you end up hurting someone.  As  you progress
magickally, you will know through your Oversoul what is wrong with the  person and what
color to use.  Use this science to help only those to whom you are close  to and on yourself.  Be
absolutely sure of what you are doing.  If you have any doubts,  DON'T DO IT!   This is a great
healing science if used wisely.  Be careful.  There are  several methods to induce color healing. 
No discussion will be made here of the use of  color lamps for they will be replaced soon with a
more advanced machine.  What will be  discussed is the use of color meditation and your own
physical instrument, the body.  

You are a channel for the higher energies.  You are a magnet for these energies and by 
concentrating or meditating on the specific color necessary to be applied you will  magnetize
them to you and then be able to apply them to the one needing healing.   Before discussing the
actual procedure you must prepare yourself as you did in  meditation.  Be sure you are in good
health or you could induce your illness into the one  your healing.  When you enter into
meditation it would be good to get a sheet of paper  with the color you wish to magnetize and
gaze on it.  As your meditation proceeds be sure  your ankles and hands are crossed.  This
conserves the energy you are magnetizing.   Visualize this color energy filling your Night Pillar. 
See the Pillar becoming filled with the  color until it can hold no more.  Then you are ready to
pass it to the one in need of  healing.  If you are the one who needs healing see that energy
penetrating the area in  poor health.  See that part of the body becoming whole and perfect. If it
is another person  or anything needing the color energy place your hands on the area that is ill. 
Again see  that energy penetrating into that part and restoring it to perfect harmony and
vibration.   You do not necessarily have to be present to administer the healing energy.  If the
person  is somewhere else see your energy moving to that person.  Visualize that person and the 
area of illness and again see the energy making all whole and perfect.  Be sure when you  are
finished that you wash your hands in cold running water.  It will be necessary to  continue the
number of treatments once every hour until the condition is relieved.  You  should apply the
healing for a period lasting fifteen minutes.  These continuous  treatments are necessary so
that you are working in harmony with the cyclic nature of the  body.  This time period allows
the body adequate time to use the energy being supplied  to it.  Also it allows you to know when
to stop treatment, for sometime in the forty-five  minute period, you can observe the healing
process and its progress.  The last subject to  discuss is the colors themselves and what ailments
they cure.  You will begin with the  lowest frequency of color, red.  

Red is vibrant and alive.  Red is a heating, vitalizing, and stimulating color.  It is directly 
responsible for your physical vitality.  In cases where there is a lack of energy red is an 
exceptional color.  It is effective in the treatment of anemia and cancer.  It vitalizes the  blood
and helps to purify it.  Do not use this color when there is an inflammatory condition  present
or when the person is of excitable temperament.  

The color orange has often been associated with the Sun.  It is necessary for health and 
vitality.  It influences primarily the processes of assimilation and circulation.  The color 
helps to regulate the intake of food and is centered around the spleen. It is good for the 
treatment of asthma, bronchitis, colds, and epilepsy.  It is further useful for the treatment  of
gout, inflammation of the kidneys, gall stones, cessation of menstruation, and mental 
debility.  

The color yellow acts as a tonic on the nerves.  It is an inspiring and mentally stimulating 
color.  It is good for the treatment of dyspepsia, diabetes, flatulence, and constipation.  Clear
golden yellow is one of the most powerful forces against depression and limitations  of every
kind.  Yellow stimulates the brain as well as exerting great therapeutic influence  on the
assimilative organs of the body.  Yellow also stimulates the purifying action in the  body for it
effects the liver, gall bladder, and intestines in stimulating them and aiding in  the
elimination of the body wastes.  Yellow improves the texture of the skin, heals scars,  and heals
other blemishes.  

Green is the color of the Earth.  It is the color of harmony and balance.  It has a soothing  effect
upon the nerves.  It has a very powerful effect on the blood supply and its  distribution
throughout the body.  Green is an excellent tranquilizer and is further  beneficial in the
treatment of heart complaints, blood pressure, and headaches.   Blue is the color of deep peace
and harmony.  It acts upon the body as a powerful  antiseptic.  It is excellent in the treatment of
insomnia.  Blue is good in the treatment of  all throat diseases and in the treatment of gall
bladder attacks, jaundice, skin abrasions,  cuts, burns, and rheumatism.  

Indigo is the Healer for the eyes, ears, and nose.  It is excellent in the treatment of  deafness,
cataract, delirium tremens, and eye inflammation.  It is good in the treatment of  lung
disorders, pneumonia, asthma, bronchitis, and indigestion.  

Violet is the highest vibration of visible light.  Its effect is primarily in the area of the brain.   It
is good in the treatment of mental disorders, cataracts, and paralysis.  Creative artist  and
workers would benefit by surrounding their room with objects of this color and  meditating
and storing this color.  It is excellent in the treatment of insomnia.  

In closing, again use the colors carefully.  Do not use them excessively.  At all times, you  should
seek the guidance of your Oversoul.  Never prescribe treatment to anyone.  And  above all, in the
case of illness Consult your Physician!  You can use this science to aid  your healing and that of
others, but it is not meant to replace the therapeutic care given by  your Physician.  I have made
a small beginning in discussing the realm of vibration.  I  spoke of the vibrating world around
us and how all life is in constant motion.  I discussed  the special world of light and colors and
their relationship to the human body.  In the next  topic you are going to explore some
fascinating information concerning the human body  and how it works.

17.  Night Centers and the Physical and Etheric Bodies    

In the Eastern languages the Night Centers are known as chakras. Night Centers are  located in
each type of body that you have, from the Etheric to the Mental Body.  They are,  in appearance,
small whirlpool-like vortices of concentrated energy.  The Night Centers  are responsible for a
number of functions.  They are conveyors of the Night Force from  higher dimensions to the
lower ones.  They act as step-down transformers taking the  higher energy and lowering it to
meet the requirements of each body. They further  function as message centers.  They connect
each dimension from the higher ones to the  lower with an internal form of communication
keeping your entire system of bodies in  rapport with each other.  They have other functions but
these will be covered in later  topics.  You are presently going to look at two bodies, the physical
and Etheric, and the  role of the Night Centers to each.  Let's look at the physical body first.  

In the physical body there is a corresponding organ and/or gland to each of the Night  Centers. 
The lowest of the centers is at the base of the spine and relates to the gonads.   The second of
these centers is located over the area of the spleen and is associated with  the spleen/pancreas. 
The third Night Center is located over the navel area or the solar  plexus and corresponds to the
adrenal glands.  The fourth is located over the heart region  and relates to the thymus gland. 
The fifth is located in the throat area and relates to the  thyroid gland.  The sixth Night Center
is located in the brow area and relates to the pineal  gland.  The seventh Night Center is located
at the top or crown of the head and is  associated with the pituitary gland. What is interesting
and important to observe is that  the organs make up the  endocrine system.  

These glands produce a substance called hormone which is spilled into the blood stream  to
regulate every cell in the body.  These glands further effect the growth and  development of the
physical body; the way you feel; and even the way you think.  The  endocrine system is regulated
by the nervous system.  Here there is an important parallel.   For every Night Center there is a
nerve center that corresponds to it too.  These nerve  centers are closely related to the glands
they regulate, which are those of the endocrine  system.  This leads us to the Night Centers,
Etheric Body, and their relationship to your  bodily control.  

The Etheric Body is produced by the electromagnetic energy generated by the physical  body. 
The Etheric is an exact counterpart to the physical body.  The Etheric Body  interpenetrates the
physical body and extends from a half inch to four inches around the  physical body and can be
seen by the Night Eye as a whitish blue light.  The Etheric Body  is the lowest body where the
Night Centers can be found.  The Oversoul influences the  body through the transmission of
Night Force through the Higher Night Centers which  continues to be stepped down till the
energies enter the Etheric vortices which in turn  affects the nerve centers, endocrine system,
and the body overall.  They are all  interrelated.  The two Night Centers which directly effect the
well-being of the physical  body are the lowest two.  

The lowest center found at the base of the spine contains the Earth Fire.  In the Eastern 
religions it is called Kundalini.  I will discuss this Energy in a later topic but for now I will 
discuss the intake of Earth Force, a less concentrated form of the Earth Fire.  Those who  have
ever lived in a high-rise apartments and worked in similar offices may recall feeling  very tired
and run down.  This is due to lack of direct contact with the Earth.  It is essential  for humans to
remain in contact with the Earth.  When the body makes direct contact with  the Earth, the base
Night Center is then able to absorb the Earth's energy. Everyone  should take time to get
outdoors in direct contact with Mother Earth and absorb that vital  energy.  In a later topic, I
will present a rite to help keep the Earth energies high in  yourself.  The second Night Center
concerned with your well-being is located over the  spleen/pancreas and absorbs the pranic
force generated by the Sun.   
This is the second energy necessary for the well-being of your physical body.  An  adequate
intake of this energy will give you good health.  It will give you vitality, youth,  and a zest for
life.    As was mentioned earlier, the Etheric extends beyond and around the  outline of the body
approximately a half to four inches.  It is bluish grey to bluish white in  color.  When a person is
in good health the Etheric will be strong in appearance and  extend several inches beyond the
outline of the body.  In poor health or when one is low  in energy the Etheric will be close to the
body and hard to see.  How do you see the  Etheric?

Etheric sight is the best way to begin to see magickally.  Since this energy is of lesser  vibration
then that of auric energy it will be easier to see with the Night Eye.  For a  moment, let's discuss
exactly what is the Night Eye and then the mechanics of how it  operates.  

The Night Eye and its existence have been known since the time of the Ancient Ones.  In  the
Eastern languages it's referred to as the "Third Eye" .  The Night Eye is a magickal  organ that
when activated allows you to see the higher dimensions.  The Night Eye is also  capable of
enlarging microscopic particles till you can see them.  This is very similar to  the microscope
and its function.  For most, the Night Eye is closed and blind to the higher  realm, but through
the techniques and practices in this work you will learn to use and see  through the Night Eye. 
The mechanics of the Night Eye will be discussed in greater depth  in a later topic.  For now, the
Night Eye is related to the sixth Night Center and the pineal  gland.  When they are functioning
under your voluntary control then you are able to see  magickally. Knowledge of the exact
mechanics is not necessary in order for you to see  through the Night Eye.  What is necessary is
knowing the techniques for opening and  using the Night Eye and then plenty of practice. 
Therefore, let's perform some exercises  to begin its development.  

To convince yourself more fully that there really is an Etheric Body begin with the  following
experiment.  One night as you are in bed, lie on your back with your feet spread  apart.  Then
slowly bring your feet together until you can feel them touch each other.   When you feel them
just touch try and see if you can put them together any closer.  You  will be surprised to find that
you can.  This distance is the area occupied by the Etheric.   You can also do this with another
person.  Try touching the other person on an area of  bare skin.  The neck and head area is the
best.  Touch them with one finger very lightly  and then slowly remove the finger to about one
inch away.  The person will not be able to  tell the difference when you are touching and when
you are not.   Now that you are more  fully convinced that there is an Etheric, let's move on and
see it.  

It will be easier if you get another person to help you.  Have that person stand against a  neutral
background, the best color is white, and have them relax and breathe deeply.  The  lighting is
very important.  The light should be behind you and positioned such that it will  not produce a
shadow on the subject.  The lighting should be dim.  You should now  position yourself away
from the subject about six to ten feet and sit or stand in a  comfortable position.  Relax and
breathe deeply.  Look at the subject and let your eyes  relax.  Do not concentrate on seeing
anything.  Look beyond the subject as if looking off  into the distance.  The subject's Etheric
Energy will extend around the outline of the  physical body.  If you are alone you can still
practice seeing the Etheric.  

Have a mirror positioned in front of you such that you can see the upper body outline.   Have
behind you a background of neutral color.  Do the same as outlined above as if you  had
someone before you.  In all the work, outlined above, do not become discouraged if  results do
not occur the first time.  Be patient and know that all is, and will, work for you if  you but try. 
No one can become a Master Night Magician without great practice and  perseverance.  So you,
too, can be a Master of Night Magick if you will but practice and  persevere.  You leave the Realm
of the Etheric and Magickal Sight to enter into the Realm  of Magickal Sound.  

18.  The Power of Sound    

Ever see an opera singer shatter a crystal glass?  It is said that words are things and once 
spoken may cause the very thing to happen.  Can there really be so much to the spoken  word?  
Let's explore the physical properties of the spoken word, or in other words, sound  and its
properties and discover the secret.  

You first must learn that sound is caused by vibrating structures.  That for sound to travel  it
must move through a material substance or medium.  Sound travels as a wave motion.  As a
sound wave travels, in a medium, small displacements occur to the molecules in that  medium
or substance.  These small displacements are a regular collective motion in  which all the
molecules, in a small volume of matter, move together.  Think of this motion  as compared to a
small volume of water held by a container in which you would see a  wave moving in the
volume of water.  This ordered wave motion is superimposed on the  random thermal agitation
or vibration of the molecules.  We, therefore, look at sound  waves as the molecules of the
substance jiggling back and forth in a regular fashion.  You  know that sound is the result of
vibrating bodies but beyond this you must know that a  traveling sound wave transports
energy.  

When this sound wave is incident on, or striking, a body of matter there is absorption of  that
sound wave's energy by that body.  In some cases this will force the body to vibrate at  the
frequency of the incident wave.  A state of resonance will occur when the vibration of  the body
and that of the incident wave are close in natural frequency.  Sound can do some  phenomenal
things. For example, remember the high pitched note of the singer, when it  is incident upon the
crystal glass, causes it to break.  But even greater is the Power of the  spoken word or sound
energy, when that energy is transmitted on the carrier wave of  creative magickal thought.  The
spoken word is endowed with the Night Force when the  creative thought behind that word is
that of Night Consciousness.  Your words are  endowed with Night Force when your Magickal
Consciousness is that of the Oversoul.   Your words are as potent as your consciousness is equal
to that of Night Consciousness.   For your words to be life and accomplish that where they are
sent, then your  consciousness must be that of the Oversoul.  Your will is the selector of the
words, but for  them to be more then mere words they must be endowed with Night Force
through Night  Consciousness.  Let's try it.   

To begin with first see yourself as the Oversoul.  Feel the Night Presence of your own  Oversoul
selecting the words with which you wish to create with.  Then speak the words  knowing that it
is not you that says the words, but that it is the Oversoul who says the  Words.  Then those
Words will go forth and do as they are sent forth to do.  The greater  your attunement with your
Oversoul, the greater will be the potency of the Words.  Keep  your thoughts in tune with your
Oversoul at all times.  For your words to take on the Night  Force you must become the Oversoul
in all you do. Repeat the Words over and over again  till you can feel the words take on a life of
their own.  Repeat them till your words are  endowed with Night Force then they will go forth
and create as you have said.  There are  no limitations to what your Words in Night
Consciousness may do.  They can bring to you  your heart's desire.  They can literally move
mountains.  They can create life.  There are  no limitations to what you can do, so long as it is
in accord with your Oversoul.  As you are  filled with the Sound of the Oversoul, now to fill
yourself with the Energies of the Earth. 

19.  Earth Rite  

Your body is very much like that of the Earth.  As was shown in an earlier topic, the body  has
interspaced in it an Etheric Body. This is your magnetic field just as the Earth has a  magnetic
field.  It is essential to your good health to be in contact with the Earth.  The  Earth currents
mixed with your own magnetic currents keep you in good health.  You will  experience less
tension and frustration.  If you can do nothing else you should get out into  the country and go
barefoot.  Here though, I would like to introduce a rite which will allow  you to absorb a great
deal more Earth Energy.  

The Earth's energy is of the highest order.  You may feel that the Earth is an unclean  place and
that its energies are of the same order.  This is not true!  Man's attitude is the  harmful energy
which is slowly destroying the Earth itself.  From the Oversoul's viewpoint  the Earth is
covered in a dense blanket of Man's wrongful attitude concerning the Earth.   The Earth is the
Body of a magickally advanced Being and Its Energies are of the deepest  order.  Let's look
specifically at how to absorb these life giving energies.   

The only place to do this rite is outdoors.  You should select a place which is free of  Man's
urbanization.  Go out into a park or a private woods.  Go somewhere so that you  won't be
disturbed. Once you have selected a place that feels right sit down and get  comfortable.  Your
bottom should be in direct contact with the Earth.  Do not sit in a chair.   Next begin with deep
breathing, relax, and let all tension go.  When you are perfectly  relaxed begin to feel your own
Etheric Body.  Feel your magnetic current touching the  magnetic current of the Earth.  When
you breathe in, you will draw the Earth Energy up  into your body via the Night Centers.  See
this energy flowing up through the base center  and flow on higher and higher through each
center until it reaches the crown center.   When it has reached this far, hold the energy there
and allow it to penetrate your entire  being.    Then, as you exhale, see the tired and tense
energies of your own body flow  back out of your body and being absorbed by the Earth.  The
Earth will change and  charge these energies with Earth Force. Continue this exercise as long as
you feel  comfortable.  During this exercise you should feel a communion and Oneness with the 
Soul of the Earth.  The Earth is a Magickal Fountain of the Darkest Night.  Drink from it  and
be renewed!  

You have traveled far on the Earth Road.  You have learned a great deal about yourself.   You
have come to know the hidden faculties and powers that lie within you.  But as all  things on
Earth must end so in the next topic, you will come to know your own ending and  this chapter
on Earth Magick.  

20.  The Physical Realm of Death    

It has always been said that people fear the unknown.  One of the greatest unknowns in  life is
death.   Dying is as important as living on Earth.  Dying does not have to be a big  unknown. 
There does not have to be fear of death.  To end the fear of dying one must  look at death and
understand it.  

Your life is sustained only so long as the silver cord is attached to your physical body.   This is
your lifeline from your Oversoul to that which you know as "I".  In the actual  physical process
of dying it takes three complete days for this cord to separate.  The body  should be left alone
and undisturbed as much as possible till then.  As you are  separating, you feel like a cloud
drifting over your physical body.  After three days, you  will cast off like a ship adrift on the
seas.  The process of dying is entirely painless and  you should have no fear.  Before casting off
for the next dimension, you are required to  view the actual process of the preparation of your
body for burial.  This is to convince you  that your physical body has actually died, but that you
still live.  Here, it might be  appropriate to say something about those who are left behind.

In the west, you have been taught that you should grieve for the one who has departed.  It  would
be more appropriate to celebrate for they now have left this world for a new world  of happiness
and joy.  In this new world there is no suffering, hunger, or struggle for  survival.  You grieve
over another's dying for many reasons, but mostly at the loss you  feel and at being alone.  How
can you overcome this grief?  

First, you should realize that you will someday be reunited with them if you wish.  Only  those
in harmony with each other can reunite, for only harmony can exist on the other  side.  You
should also realize that you should not grieve so much for the one gone, for  you tend to disturb
their rest and recuperation on the other side.  What can you do to help  the person who is
suffering from grief?  

The best help you can provide is to be the "listening ear".  You should do everything in  your
power to help the person talk out their grief.  Let them talk to you about the sorrow  they feel
over their loss and talk about how it was in the past.  Keep them company and  let them cry all
they want.  Crying and tears are the greatest safety valve the human body  has.  This prevents
an emotional overload causing perhaps insanity.  Allow the person a  reasonable time to
express their grief.  But this should not go on for ever and ever.  Grief  can not be allowed to go
too far. It will cause the person to develop self-pity and this is  just as bad.  Dying to this world
is birth to the next and higher world.  There is a practice which will assist you in the process of
dying.  You should prepare  yourself through meditation.  Meditate on the subject of death as
has been described  here.  See yourself at the time of dying.  Feel and know yourself developing
as a cloud of  consciousness over the physical body.  See yourself actually trying to get out of
that old  dying house.  Then you should see and visualize the person you want to come help you 
and meet you.  Feel their presence very strong and know that they are there to help you  make
the transition.  If you have no one special to come get you, know that there are  special helpers
waiting to assist you into the next dimension.  Have no fear for you are  never alone.  Know that
just as soon as there is complete separation of the silver cord  from the physical body that they
will assist you to the next realm.  Then allow yourself to  relax and wait out the physical
process of dying.  There is no pain nor fear to experience,  only the beginning of a new day in a
new world.  The only thing you will experience is the  feeling of going home.   This simple
process of meditating on the transition from one  world to the next can relieve much anxiety
and worry when the actual time seems near.   There is no way that meditating on death can
bring about the actual thing.  Only the  Oversoul knows the time of transition and can cause it
to happen.  So rest assured, that in  dying from the physical world, the process is simple, easy,
and merely a phase of  transition necessary to enter the next world beyond.  Now you must also
make the  transition from one chapter in Night Magick to the next.  

You must leave behind the Earth Realm and enter the Water Realm. You have seen many 
wonders in the Earth Realm.  You have learned better ways of breathing and things about  your
body you may have never known about.  You are opening your Night Eye by learning  about and
seeing your Etheric Body.  You should be acquiring better health and a  sounder mind through
meditation and the use of colors.  I must emphasize here, before  leaving Earth Magick, that no
matter how far you go do not stop practicing the techniques,  rites, and exercises learned early
in this book. Always take time to meditate and practice  Night Breathing.  All the things you
have learned, so far, are essential for your success  later on.  If you are ready to explore a
fascinating realm and discover many new wonders,  then let's enter into the exciting Realm of
Water Magick. 

CHAPTER V


WATER MAGICK

21.  The Water (Astral) Realm 

Here you will enter a land of great beauty.  A land of Harmony and Peace.  In the last  topic, you
had just left your dying body, the silver cord had separated, and you were set  off adrift.  At this
point, it is essential that you believe that there is continuity in life after  physical death,
otherwise you will simply drift in a dense, dark fog, until slowly you  realize, that you are still
conscious and alive.  As soon as doubt is gone, the clouds will  dissipate and your loved ones
will be there to help you.  

In the first stage of transition, you will be allowed time to recuperate.  The process of  living on
Earth and the troubles of the long years spent there have made you very weary.   In the new
realm that you have just entered, you are given time to rest from your journey  on Earth and to
adjust to the Astral Realm. Everyone, no matter what their magickal  attainment, must enter
this level of the Astral Realm.  It has been referred to, by some  religions, as purgatory.   You are
here in order to rest, purify yourself of human dross and  make decisions about your magickal
future.  Your magickal development determines the  level of purgatory you first arrive at.  

For souls who are of the lowest and crudest of development, there is a very low vibrational 
level for them.  At this level, acts of the worst kind, akin to their own vibrations, are  portrayed
before them.  The things that they did wrong on Earth are done to them.  This is  a very dense
region.  This is not a land of punishment and torture, but a place to show the  individual the
folly of such a life and a place to rid the soul of its denser energies.  This is  not Hell.  There is no
such place as Hell.  If Hell is anywhere it is right here on Earth.  It is  what humankind has
made of the Earth.

Above this there is the next level which some go immediately to and some come up to  from a
lower level.   This level is for souls who allowed their lower passions to rule them.   For those
who sought after money and power without maintaining the Eternal Night  Balance.  This
region is very much akin to the physical plane just left behind.  The Astral  surroundings will
be very similar to those of the Earth.  Here the souls will remain, till they  rid themselves of the
courser Astral material, so that they may go ever higher.  They rid  themselves of this dense
Astral material by learning control of their passions.  They must  make up the Eternal
Balance.  From here we go to the level you probably rose to from the  beginning.

You rise to the level where generally all begin who are of a basically good nature.  This  land is
filled with beautiful parks and lakes.  There are very beautiful buildings all around  you.  There
are colors never before seen by you.  The air is alive with energy and life.   Animal life is
abundant and tame.  There is beautiful music everywhere in the air.  Here in  this realm no
disharmony can occur.  No one can meet anyone who would cause them  unhappiness of any
kind.  When you first arrive, your loved ones or magickal helpers will  be there to assist you.  In
this realm, all that you want is produced by your thoughts.   Travel is by thought.  If you want to
wear clothes then you must think of yourself dressed  as you want to be dressed.  Your
nourishment is all around you.  All you have to do is  breathe.  Your physical habits that you
learned on Earth will still be with you.  You may  feel that you still have to eat.  This is fine. 
You need only think of the food you want to eat  plus the table and so forth necessary to eat it
with.  But the sooner you learn to forget the  old physical habits, and learn and experience your
new Astral Body, the sooner you will  be able to progress.  This is a very real world.  This world
is as solid and real to its  inhabitants as your own Earth is to you.  But there are some who see
this realm slightly  different.  

For some souls who believe in an exact type of heaven according to their religious beliefs,  or
even of the opposite region, and feel that this is where they are going, then this is what  they
will see.  If they believe that they will see the Pearly Gates and St. Pete at them, then  this is
what they will see.  Gradually though, imperfections will show up here and there.   The gates
may squeak or even fall off the hinges as they start to open.  The angels, flying  about, may
suddenly be wearing flannel shirts and play off-key on their rusty harps.   When the person has
enough doubts about their make-believe heaven, then like a dream,  it will disappear and the
real Astral Realm will appear and so their beloved ones too.  

It is best to keep an open mind when you make the transition. This will quicken your entry 
into your new realm and life.  After you have become adjusted to this new realm, you will  be
escorted to a building where you will review your recent life and past lives you have  lived.  All
that you have ever done will be shown to you on what has been called in some  religions the
Akashic Record, and by others, the Book of Records.  Let's look at this  Record and see what it
is? 

The Night Record, as you will come to know it, is a special energy upon which everything  that
has ever occurred to anyone and anything is recorded.  There is further shown, on the  Night
Record, the probabilities for the future.  This Record not only can show what has  occurred on
the Earth, but for anyplace located anywhere.  This Record can be seen by   those who have
made the Earth transition in order to look at their life just lived, and by  those of high
magickal development who have a need to see. The Record is not for the  use of just anyone.  

So, you were just entering the Night Record Hall and preparing to review your life.  You  see the
things you did and the things you shouldn't have done.  You see the things you  were supposed to
have done and learned.  No one judges you but yourself and your  Oversoul!   You are your own
sternest judge.  It is through your Oversoul that you see  where you have gone wrong and what
your Oversoul wanted you to accomplish in your  life.  You are then led out of the Hall by your
guide and taken to a council of advisors.  These advisors are trained to aid you in reviewing
your lives and determining the best  means for accomplishing the previous desired results
wanted by your Oversoul and thus  planning your future. You are placed in the proper
circumstances, at the proper time, to  achieve the desired results.  After this planning, you will
retire to the Astral Realm of your  vibration and rest and prepare yourself for the next phase of
life.  

You are responsible for all that you do in life.  You are responsible for the debts you  occur in
life and for repaying your debts.  No one will pay your debts except you.  The bad  and good you
create is called Karma.  Karma and the Astral Realm are deeply related.  It  is at this plane of
life that you make decisions which will effect your future.  Until you  learn the lessons
necessary to be learned on the Earth plane then you must continue to  return until you have
learned all there is to be learned.  Who determines when you have  learned all that there is to be
learned?  The Oversoul is who! 

In a Process not described here, your future is woven out of your magickal essence in the  Astral
Realm.  This magickal fabric that is being woven contains the basic kinds of  programs.  By
programs, I am referring to programs very similar to that used by the  computer so that it can
carry out its basic functions.  One of your inner programs sets for  you predetermined events
which you must experience.  These events are the results of  energies you have set into motion
from out of the past which must be again experienced  and worked through.  Further, they can
be events, not necessarily a result of your past but  of events which you need to experience to
make you stronger and a better instrument for  your Oversoul.  The second program is for you to
make.  

These are periods which allow you to determine the path you will choose.  They are like a 
blank tape upon which you write your future.  You know when you have entered these  periods
for you feel like a ship adrift on the seas.  All the familiar surroundings,  experiences, and
securities in your life are gone. They are not easy times for you, but  they are the greatest
periods for your soul growth.  They bring to you periods of inner  growth, new directions in your
life, and a chance to accelerate your magickal growth.  In  these periods, you are the Captain of
your Destiny.  By the choices you make and the  opportunities you take to advance, your future
is set in motion.  These periods allow you  to clear up excess karmic debt.  They will bring to you
new friends, teachers, and many  changes which if taken advantaged of, will allow you to
achieve great magickal growth.   You must watch for these periods and take all the advantage of
them you can.  You have  to be tough.  They will test the very essence of that which you are made
of.  You must do  the very best you can in all that you do.  You must be strong and know that you
are  guided.  You never fail in life if you can say that you did your best.  You can gain these 
learning experiences in the Astral Realm just as you can learn them on Earth.  So why  would
you want to leave the Astral world.  

In the Astral, life is full of harmony and beauty.  It would take a long time to learn even the 
easiest of lessons.  So, in order for the Oversoul to grow at a fast rate, it chooses to send  a part of
itself, being you, to learn quickly in the "School of Hard Knocks".  You know that  you grow
fastest when you have to learn the hard way.  You learn your lessons quickly  and well.  If life
was all fun and games you would never learn, so life is not easy.  There  are some lessons that
can only be learned on Earth. A hard life may not necessarily be a  sign of large karmic debt,
but a period of quick growth and possible advancement.  How  many lifetimes does it take
before you don't have to come back here anymore?  

No one can really say how many lives it will take except your Oversoul.  There is only so  much
that can be learned from each sojourn on Earth.  There are so many things that  must be
learned from living on Earth.  You keep coming here to the Earth until you have  learned all the
lessons necessary and until the Oversoul is in charge of your life.  Each of  your lives adds to the
Eternal Essence which is your Oversoul.  Yet this idea of  reincarnation or the returning to life
on Earth time and time again scares many.   

They don't like reincarnation because they are afraid that they will lose their individuality.  
Well, you never lose that individuality.  Your Oversoul can be compared to a vessel of  water.  In
that vessel of water, if you add some red dye the water will appear red add the  color yellow and
you will have orange.  Each color is still there but their added essence  creates a new whole. 
Thus you add each individuality into the Oversoul.  The Oversoul  grows and becomes more
then it just was by that new addition.  You are still that  individuality but you are in
cooperative union with all the other parts which make up the  sum, which is the Oversoul. 
When you have learned all that must be learned, then you no  longer have to return to the Earth.
You then pass beyond the Astral World when you have  learned all that you have to learn there. 
There are many things to learn in the Astral.  

There is the special group that is responsible for the souls making the transition from the 
Earth to the Astral.  There are those who weave the soul fabric for a soul's journey to  Earth.
There are also teachers, doctors, nurses, advisors, and guides to those still living  on Earth. 
You can, after gaining all that you must learn in the Astral, die or leave this  dimension and go
on to an even higher realm.  You could also go on to a more advanced  planet and civilization
and begin the cycle of life and death there.  The variables are  endless and the choice of your
Oversoul.  I have referred to the Astral Realm as the Water  Realm.  In Night Magick, the things
you will learn of this realm are known as Water  Magick.  

From the beginning, the Ancients have likened the Astral Realm to water because things  of the
Astral involve the emotions.  The Astral Body is the body of emotions.  You feel and  express
emotions because you have an Astral Body.  It is the purpose of Water Magick to  help you gain
control over, and to refine, your Astral Body.  The instruction, exercises, and  rites are
presented here to accomplish this purpose.  This is the hardest body to gain  control over.  The
emotions in most people run wild and out-of-control.  People give into  their emotions without
trying to gain any self-control.  You have to learn to control your  emotions in order to have
magickal growth.  You must make the Astral Body an  instrument worthy of the Oversoul.  It
must become an Instrument through which the  Oversoul pours out Its Night Energies into the
world.  You must strive at all times to be  consciously aware that as you feel and express
emotions that actually it is the Oversoul  who feels and expresses through you. That control
over your emotions and the expression  of Night Force comes only through constant
communion with your Oversoul.  Strive for this  communion at all times.  You are the Oversoul
in emotional expression here on Earth.   Through the Oversoul you will succeed.  Let's begin
immediately learning exercises for  emotional control and magickal advancement.   

22.  The Astral Body and Exercises for Emotional Control 

On each realm of life that the Oversoul lives on there is a necessity for a vehicle made up  of that
realm's essence in order for the Oversoul to find expression in that realm.  The  vehicle you are
most familiar with is the physical body.  It is made up of dense physical  matter.  You know
from earlier discussions that there is a large amount of space between  all the molecules of the
physical body.  Interspaced in the physical body can be found the  Astral molecules which
make up the Astral Body.  

In the Astral Realm, your Astral Body and all the Astral surroundings are as solid and real  to
you as is your physical body and surroundings, when you are in the physical realm.   The Astral
Body is much more refined, and vibrating at a higher vibration, then is the  physical body.  The
Astral Body has the same identical form as your physical body.  When  you are in the Astral
Realm though, your Astral Body is very beautiful and without  imperfections.  There are no
signs of ageing as there are in the physical world.  The Astral  form is very beautiful and the
face is of exquisite beauty.  There is no ugliness or lack of  harmony in the Astral.  The Astral
Body exists simultaneously with the physical body and  all other bodies as well.  While you are
in the physical body, the Astral Body is the body  through which you feel.  It is the body through
which the Oversoul impresses and  communicates with you.  

At night, when you sleep, it is the body through which you experience dreams.  Dreams  are
often distortions of your experiences in the Astral Realm.  The Astral Body is the body  of
emotions.  The Astral Body can be likened to an emotion magnet. When you express  an
emotion, you actually charge the surrounding Astral material with that emotion.  You  have
experienced this happening.  

For example, when you have gotten someone angry, you can actually feel the atmosphere 
around that person become alive with anger. You have also seen this when someone  expresses
love for another. The Astral material which surrounds you and the physical  world is made up
of charged Astral Energy.  For the Earth, this energy is of a dense  nature.  

There are all kinds of emotional energies which make up the astral material around the  Earth. 
These energies range from love to hate.  On the Earth you can have inharmony  and discord and
harmony and accord.  This is what is meant by dense.  You can express  any emotions while on
Earth.   

When you express an emotion, such as hate, the energy which is of like quality in the  Astral is
attracted to you.  You can see that your hate, added to the greater hate which is  surrounding you
only makes your hatred more intense.  You can then become consumed  with hate, so much so,
that you may lose control and seriously hurt through that hate.   Long after the hate seems to
have left you, it still remains within your Astral Aura.  The  slightest thing can trigger again
this hate reaction and more hate energy will be  generated.  This is what happens from a lack of
emotional control.  

As I've said, the world as a whole is made up of many kinds of emotional energies.  The  energies
are there to use and express with control.  Without control, you become a pawn  for domination
by the emotional energies surrounding you.  You must begin by learning  to refine your Astral
Body.  To learn to place it under the control of your Oversoul.  Let me  introduce some exercises
which will help you gain self-control.  

Begin by deliberately slowing yourself down.  When you drive on the road always let the  other
person go first.  Slow down when you drive.  If you will drive the speed limit, or five  miles an
hour below it, you will be passed by all.  When you walk do it slowly.  Let others  enter a building
or room ahead of yourself. The idea is to slow down.  This is the first  exercise and the next
involves your use of meditation.  
When you are in meditation, visualize a cleansing energy moving through your Astral  Body
and Night Centers.  See that energy cleansing all emotional energy and replacing it  with the
Night Force.  Visualize bliss, peace, and ecstasy filling your entire being.  Next,  visualize any
act which you know produces an out- of-control emotional response within  yourself.  See that
event occurring and you remaining in perfect control.  Do this with all  events and slowly you
will gain control.  Learn to disassociate from an emotional world of  chaos.  

The world rids itself of an over abundance of chaotic energies through natural means.   These
include such events as hurricanes, tornados, earthquakes, floods, and violent  storms.  They
are the world's safety valves when the human emotional energies become  too much.  You can
help to prevent these occurrences by correcting your own energy  production.  In meditation,
you can visualize the entire world and do for it what you did for  yourself above.  See that
cleansing energy fill the world.  See the emotional energies of  humankind balanced and in
order.  If you will do this daily the world will become a more  stable environment.  This is your
first step on the Road of Water Magick.  Your next  involves the Astral Aura and its relationship
to colors.  

23.  Astral Aura, Color, and Exercises  

Around you, shaped like an egg, is the electromagnetic energy known as the aura.  Each  body
produces its own aura.  The most studied aura is the product of the Astral Body.  I  will discuss
the astral aura, its relationship to colors, and exercises for seeing and  strengthening the aura.  

The aura surrounds your body like an egg with the point at the feet.  In the average  individual
the aura extends approximately twelve to eighteen inches around the body.  As  you develop
magickally the aura enlarges.  The electromagnetic energy is perceived by  the Night Eye as
color.  

In the Astral aura, these colors reflect the emotions which make up the individual.  The  colors
of the aura generally extend up to the eyes with the halo region just beyond that.   Out of the top
of the head extends a fountain of energy in the more advanced soul.  This  halo region is the
strongest region of energy and is the easiest to see using your Night  Eye.  On the outer fringes of
the aura is the Auric Sheath.  

This is a skin-like film and completely encloses the aura.  On the auric sheath, which can  be
compared to a translucent screen, the subconscious mind projects a variety of thought 
pictures.  On this screen can be seen images of thoughts and even past life images.   Before you
learn to see the aura, let's look at what the auric colors reveal about people.  

To begin with, some of the colors seen reflect current emotional expression.  For  example,
anger will flash into the aura as a deep, dark blackish-red.  This color will  generally last only
as long as a person feels the emotion, although residuals of this anger  will remain for
sometime.  The second kind of colors seen reflect long standing emotional  states.  You'll
remember in the last topic that the emotional energy produced by your  Astral Body was a
magnetic attracter for similar energy.  

For example, if you become angry a great deal, then this energy tends to concentrate in  your
aura.  The concentration tends to increase for surrounding anger energy is attracted  to the
anger energy already in your aura.  Thus, you will see a heavy concentration of  blackish-red in
your aura which remains there over long periods of time.   It won't  dissipate so long as you
continue to create this energy.  This applies to all kinds of  emotional energy.  

There are seven basic colors in the aura.  They are red, orange, yellow, green, blue,  indigo, and
violet.  All the colors and their shades indicate a particular emotion or  something about the
character of an individual.  Take each color and try to learn as much  about it as it pertains to
people.  Some things you will learn about colors will come from  your experiences over the
years.  Colors can first be broken down into two main groups.   The red, orange, yellow group
are full of energy.  They represent people who are vibrant.   These are people who are extroverts.
They are the worlds' socialites.  The second group,  green, blue, indigo, and violet are the
introverts.  These are the quiet, less social people.   They are more concerned with their
interests then those of the world.  

The color red rules the physical world.  It is the color of Earth's fertility.  It is the color of 
activity and creativeness. When seen as a clear, bright red in the aura it signifies people  who
possesses the attributes of ambition, leadership, sociability, and strong character.  It  indicates
force, vigor, and vitality in people.  They will have a strong sex drive.  They will  be pioneers. 
They will love adventure and have a great need for new friends and new  things.  These are very
aggressive people.  This does lead to some problems.  

Red makes people very impulsive.  They are apt to be abrupt and impatient in all things.   They
are very earthy in their ways. This is the person with clear, bright red in their aura.   But there
are many modifications to the color red that can be see in the aura.  Dark red  indicates a deep
passion or emotion within. A person who is sometimes domineering and  brash.  A light red
indicates irritability, nervousness, and one who is excitable.  A bright  red flashing on a black
background indicates extreme anger arising from hatred and  malice.  A brick red is for conceit
and reddish brown is for deceit.  A dark scarlet is for the  strongest, sensual love.  A coral color
pink is for immaturity in teenagers; childishness  and insecurity in adults.  A clear, rose pink
is for a friendly, selfless loving person.  The  people who have red in the best and clearest colors
are leaders of the world.  They are  one-pointed, high spirited, and seek after what they want on
their high driving force.   These are people of high energy and a color you could use some of in
your aura.  This is  the color of creation.   

The color orange is related in some ways to the color red.  The color orange is formed by  the
blending of the red and yellow colors.  It is the color of vitality.  When this color is  found in the
aura it indicates people who are in good health and full of vitality.  Orange  indicates that they
are considerate towards others.  They are the humanitarian.  It can  further indicate people
who are creative, even to the extent of genius.  This is a social  person.  Again, you see the red
nature of this color. These are people who like to get  along with others and be liked in return. 
They like to lead an adventurous life.  They look  for events in their lives which offer
excitement.  They are lovers of freedom and look  forward to all that is new.  Shades of orange
represent many things.  

A dark orange indicates one full of self-pride.  A brownish orange represents one who is  lazy. 
It could also indicate someone who is subject to kidney trouble.  If muddy and  cloudy orange is
present in the aura it indicates a person of low intellect.  But yellowish  golden orange in the
aura shows self-control and efficiency in all things.  I have indicated  what orange can mean
when seen in the aura.  Let's go a bit further and see what orange  induced into your aura
through meditation can do for you.  

The color orange is a color which can induce change into your system.  It is an energy for 
dealing with problems which can be changed to a more positive situation.  For example,  let's
say you have an inferiority problem.  You always feel unmatched towards any  problem.  You
perhaps have a low opinion of yourself and never feel able to deal with life.   The orange light
can change this attitude.  It can make you feel free of limitations.  It will  add zest and optimism
in your life.  Orange helps to induce change into your thinking  processes so that you can
assimilate new ideas.  It also induces stability in your thinking.   As you will recall, orange is
made up of two colors.  The first was red and the second is  yellow.

Yellow is the color of the mind.  It signifies all there is in relation to intelligence.  In the  aura, a
bright, clear yellow represents good mental capabilities.  This color is very  prominent in the
halo region.  An excess of this color denotes people who spend almost  all their time after
mental pursuits. These people have very quick minds.  They are able to  realize their mental
capabilities.  They have a desire to help other people through the  products of their mental
abilities.  They do tend to be shy and slightly introverted.  They  control their anger easily. 
They are the concrete thinker.  They deal in hard physical  realities.  This is a good color for
scientists and professors.  If the colors are of a softer,  paler shades, then this is good for the
writer, artist, and all creative workers. Diffused  yellow, in the aura, indicates people who are
tactful, cheerful, and use discrimination in  all they do.  They do not worry about mundane
things.  They are generally happy, friendly,  and helpful to others.  If the yellow is muddy,
mustard yellow it shows craftiness.  A  grayish cast to the yellow shows mental cunning.  A
greenish yellow aura it indicates  jealousy.  Pinkish yellow shows astuteness in people.  A
dingy yellow shows cowardice  and reddish yellow shows mental, moral, and physical
timidity.  Yellow induced into the  physical body leads to the regeneration of the human cells
keeping the body in beauty  and health.  Yellow effects the Astral Body by inducing a state of
emotional well-being.  It  further helps the mental capabilities by sharpening them and
improving the memory.  It  will make the mind quicker and able to more easily assimilate new
material. Yellow  qualities help to produce the next color.  

Green is the color of Earth.  It is the garment that clothes the Goddess/God of Earth.  This  is the
color which symbolizes balance, harmony, and abundance.  In the Night World, this  is the
color of balance and harmony.  In the physical world, it is the color of success and  prosperity. 
If this color is a pure, emerald green, with just a touch of blue, it is the color of  healing.  This
color can be found in the aura of doctors and nurses.  Green is also found  in the auras of
teachers.  Green in the aura generally indicates people of peace and  harmony. They are the
good neighbor and active in all community projects. They are  people who have a strong inner
faith in themselves and humankind.  It is a color  representing generosity and sympathy
towards all of humankind.  If there is a light green  present it shows prosperity and success.  A
middle green denotes adaptability and  versatility.  An excess of green indicates people who are
very individualistic and  independent.  Clear green denotes sympathy and dark green indicates
deceit.  Olive  green shows treachery and a double nature.  Next we have blue.  

Blue is the color of the Sky World.  This is the  color denoting peace and calm.  In the  aura, the
deeper the shade of blue the deeper the nature of the individual.  Blue is a good  color regardless
of its darkness.  Pale blue is an indication of people who are trying to  grow emotionally.   They
may be struggling with who they are and what they should do in  life.  As the blue deepens so
does their emotional maturity.  They are closer to knowing  who they are.  They are closer to
seeing the true purpose of their life.  They are people  who are more dedicated and work harder
in life.  The deep shades of blue indicate people  who have found their quest.  

They are people actively involved in their quest.  They know their purpose in life and  actively
seek to complete it.  They are totally immersed in the magickal quest.  People  with blue
predominate in their auras are generally very calm individuals. They seek the  contemplative
life and friends of like nature. They are not akin to the social set.  They can  be very
temperamental when their calm is disrupted.  They are easy people to get along  with and are
very thoughtful.  They are sensitive people towards their surroundings and  other people.  They
enjoy times of intimacy with close friends and love the quiet and  solitude.  In the aura, a deep
and clear blue indicates one of pure magickal devotion.  A  pale and etherial blue shows
devotion to a noble idea.  A bright blue shows one given to  loyalty and sincerity.  The sixth
color is indigo.  

Indigo is the color of the true seeker on the magickal path. They are one dedicated to the 
magickal quest and only the magickal quest.  People with indigo predominate in their  aura are
the ones who aim at the stars and succeed for they combine the ideal with the  practical.  They
have developed a magickal maturity which will carry them unto their  ultimate goal; the goal
of Night Consciousness.  The final color to study is violet.   Violet is the highest vibration of
color that can be seen in the aura.  The souls who have  this color in predominance are very
rare indeed.  They are supersensitive and will hold to  their ideals even at the cost of personal
suffering.  All the great works of art owe their  realization to the souls who have this color in
their aura.  Violet is the stimulator of ideals  and provides nourishment for the brain cells in
the upper brain which gives greater  magickal understanding.  They are people of a mature, well-
rounded personality.  They  are strong in character with sound judgement in all things.  They
have excellent mental  abilities and strong reasoning capabilities.  They have the highest sense
of personal  integrity.  People are strongly attracted to them.  They are introspective and 
temperamental. They can be easily irritated because of their sensitivity.  They enjoy the 
refinements of life, but can easily forego these and endure the most austere of lives, if it  will
serve their purpose in attaining their goals.  So far, I have said a great deal about the  colors of
the aura itself.  This won't help you, if you can't see them.  

To be able to see the aura you will need to go back to the topic on seeing the Etheric  (Topic 17).  If
you have been studying and practicing seeing the etheric, then you will soon  be able to see the
Astral aura.  The aura is not easy to see.  The colors in the aura are of  a much higher vibration
then the energies of the Etheric, and this requires that you have  greater development of the
Night Eye.  It requires that you do not become impatient and  give up.  The lower colors, those
from red to yellow, will be the easiest to see.  The higher  colors may elude you for some time. Do
not forget that you can also see thought images  or in other words pictures projected onto the
auric screen.  The procedures for seeing the  Astral aura are identical for seeing the Etheric. 

It is best to begin with a period of meditation before trying to see the aura so that you will  be in
the highest of magickal states and awareness.  All of this will take time and practice  on your
part but the effort is well worth it.  You will help your magickal development and  learn more
about people.  You will come to know people for what they truly are inside  when you can see
their auras.  The second exercise involves strengthening the aura.  

To strengthen the aura, you must first cross your wrists and your ankles.  This will  complete
your bodily circuit and prevent your energies from being dissipated.  You must  also slow down
and deepen your breathing.  A few minutes of Night Breathing would be  excellent.  You should
then see added energy flowing down your silver cord, from your  Oversoul, adding tremendous
Power to your aura.  This will aid you when dealing with  others who try to exert their own aura
against you.  This often takes place between people  in business who are negotiating a contract
between themselves.  It will also aid you in  trying to see someone else's aura along with your
own.  If you are trying to view another  person's aura, and they are practicing with you, have
them do this too.  You will find you  can see it much easier and more clearly.  The progression of
the colors from red to violet  marks the road of a Night Magician's journey.  

You must develop the highest qualities and characteristics of each color.  Ultimately, you  must
master each.  Through mastery of the qualities embodied in the colors and their  energy added
to your aura, you will see yourself progressing towards Night  Consciousness.  As you learn to
see your aura, you can identify the colors and the  character they represent.  If they are not of
the highest standard then you can work for  their improvement. Again, strive to achieve
mastery over self.  Embody within yourself the  highest qualities of the colors.  The next subject
is intricately related to auras and colors.    It is the Higher Night Centers.  

24.  The Higher Night Centers and Exercises

In topic seventeen, you looked at the purely physical aspects of the Night Centers.  Here,  you are
going to examine the magickal aspects of all seven.  You will discover the powers  that will
become yours to use as each Night Center begins to function within you.  You will  see how
colors are related to each Night Center and learn an important exercise to help  advance the
opening of the Night Centers.  Finally, you will examine and perform an  exercise that will
release the Night Energy through the Night Centers into your world.  

First, let's have a quick review of what you learned in topic seventeen.  You were able to  locate
the Night Centers in relation to the physical organs.  The first and lowest was  located at the
base of the spine in relation to the gonads.  The second was located over  the spleen/pancreas
and the third over the navel area or solar plexus.  The fourth is  located at the heart level. The
fifth at the throat.  The sixth at the brow level and the  seventh at the crown of the head.  The
Etheric Centers have a role in your life which  extends beyond the physical plane and your
physical bodies.  You saw that the centers  are for the purpose of keeping all planes in
communication with each other. As you grow  magickally, the Night Centers begin to unfold
more and release their energies into your  life.  As these centers unfold, you become aware of the
higher things on those realms. As  you develop magickally, all Night Centers on all realms
evolve and receive continually  higher energies which pour into your lives.  This releases
abilities and powers into your  life not normally present in the lesser evolved.  What are the
abilities and powers of each  awakening Night Center, and what do they mean to you? 

Let me begin by saying, "DO NOT FORCE YOUR DEVELOPMENT!"  As you proceed in this  topic, I
will cover the powers which will awaken in you as you develop magickally and the  Night
Centers begin to open.  In the unevolved, only the minimum of energy flows through  the Night
Centers to the physical body so that there is life. But as you develop magickally,  the centers
evolve and the Oversoul is able to send more of Its Energies through you.  As  long as you
develop along magickal lines, the Oversoul will send ever greater Energies  through you.  But do
not practice any form of Night Meditation, or Yoga, or whatever,  which will force the
development of the base Night Center.  This is the seat of the Earth  Fire.  In the eastern
languages, it is referred to as the Kundalini.  The Earth Fire is Life.  It  is the Energies of Life
itself.  This Energy lies in the base Night Center of all planes. It is a  powerful and special
Energy which when released, will surge upward through the Night  Centers and awaken each of
them to their fullest extent.  Only if you are fully and  magickally developed and have special
guidance from a magickal teacher of the Higher  Realms will you survive such a forced
awakening.  For example, the Earth Fire, on its way  up, could very easily tear through tissue
and destroy various organs and cause physical  death.  This is the least that could happen! 

The second Night Center is concerned in its undeveloped state with sensual gratification, 
sexual desires, and reproduction.  If the Fire is unleashed while the Night Center is  magickally
undeveloped, then all the bad traits of this center will be extremely heightened  which could
result in uncontrollable, depraved, sexual conduct and harm to others.  This  forced awakening
could cause insanity.  Allow the Earth Fire to awaken inside of you,  naturally, as the result of
your magickal development.  Grow magickally and the base  Night Center will awaken in you,
as you are ready to handle the power that is contained  within it.  You will be shown how to
unfold the upper Night Centers but allow the base  center to unfold of itself.  It will awaken
naturally and easily as you unfold magickally.   When this base Night Center has fully
awakened, you will become the Oversoul.  You will  be a Night Magician of the highest degree. In
the beginning of your development, this  center will glow with a reddish light.   When you have
achieved Night Consciousness it  will glow with an intense dark light of incredible power.  

The second Night Center relates to your passions.  The deeper your passions are and 
involvement in lust and sexual gratification the darker the red of this center's light.  As you 
develop magickally, a dark light begins to be added to the red till the center is all aglow in  the
Night.  In its highest development, this Night Center will allow one to overcome  disease, old
age, and eventually physical death.  This is a great center of vitality.  It  absorbs the orange
light and distributes the energies throughout one's being.  As this  Night Center begins to
awaken, you will be able to remember journeys taken into the  Astral Realm at night.  Upon
awakening in the morning, you will begin to have vague  recollections of what they did in the
Astral that night as their body slept.  You will  probably have the feeling of flying while in the
Astral Realm.  

The third Night Center as it awakens will give you the feeling of an awareness of Astral 
presences.  You will become very conscious and sensitive to all manner of psychic and  Astral
influences. Some of these influences may feel good, while others may induce in  you a sense of
fear.  On the lowest levels, this center is associated with power, mastery,  and ego control.  This
is the center for engrossment in material matters and their control.   On the highest levels, this
center will be able to help you achieve strong magickal rapport  with your fellow Astral
brothers.  This center is used to contact Astral entities.  This Night  Center should be
surrounded in the Night Pillar such that the contact remains a contact  and does not allow the
Astral entities control over your bodily mechanism.  

The next Night Center is the crossroad for all centers.  This is the fourth Night Center and  it is
located over the heart.  As this center begins to open on the  etheric level, you will  begin to have
an emotional rapport with others.  You will be able to know and feel the  emotions of others
around you.  You will have empathy with them on all levels of feeling,  to include that of feeling
their pains as your pains.  Located within this Night Center is the  "Heart of the Oversoul".  This
is the anchor within your magickal being placed there by  your Oversoul.  It is around this
miniature dark star that all that you are is gathered.  You  can liken it to a small miniature
Oversoul.  It is the embryo of your Oversoul beginning.  As  you begin on the path of Night
Magick and continue to grow magickally, you will see this  embryo begin to grow into a small
child of the Oversoul.  The farther along you develop,  the child will continue to develop and
grow, until you gain Night Consciousness and the  Oversoul within you is a full adult.  This
center actually does exist and can be seen in  meditation.  You will learn to do this in a later
topic.  It is the focal point in your world  where you, as a Night Magician, can go and meet your
Oversoul.  In this center's fullest  development, the Power of your Oversoul will pour out from
you.  Through the Energy  pouring out of you there will be nothing you cannot do. This is the
Center of the Night in  which you move and have your being.  

Through the fifth Night Center, you gain the ability for clairaudience.  Clairaudience is the 
ability to hear voices in the Astral Realm.  You will have the sensation of hearing those on  the
other side, as you can hear those on this side of life. You may also be able to hear the  "Music of
the Night Spheres". As this center continues to develop, you will be able to  clothe your thoughts
in form.  The thoughts you generate with your mind, through this  center, will be able to take on
direction and energy and go forth and do as directed.   Through the development of this center,
you will achieve strong will power which will see  you through difficult tasks.  Through this
center, you will achieve true mastery over  yourself and life.  This is only, though, when you
link up this center with that of the heart.   Together, these centers in unison can do anything.  

In Night Magick, the sixth center is the Night Eye.  As this center begins to develop, you  first
perceive Astral shadows.  You will often see nothing more then clouds of color.  As  the Night
Eye continues to develop, you will be able to see Astral people, landscape, and  symbols.  When
the Night Eye is fully developed, you will be able to have true seeing  which you call
clairvoyance. Clairvoyance is the ability to see and know Truth in all its  forms.  It is seeing
and knowing as the Oversoul within you sees and knows.  You will be  able to see the past and
present.  You will be able to see anyplace at anytime and be  able to enlarge, in the physical
world, matter ranging in size from small to microscopic.   In the future, you will be able to see
the probabilities of what might happen.  In the future,  there is little which must happen, and a
great deal which can change according to your  actions.  Thus, according to the way things seem
to be forming you can see what will  probably  happen.  
The seventh center is the link between your mind and that of your Oversoul.   In the  beginning,
as this center begins to open, it allows for partial consciousness when you are  in the Astral
world.  As this center unfolds, your consciousness will be more complete, and  you will perceive
the Astral Realm as clearly as you do the physical world.   You will never  know any cessation
of consciousness whether you are in the physical world or the Astral  world.  As you grow more
and more dedicated to doing the Soul's Will this Night Center  will continue to open on Higher
Realms allowing more and more Magickal Energy to be  released into your everyday world.  You
will become more in tune with what your Higher  Self would have you do in this world.  When
this center has developed far enough, in  conjunction with the heart Night Center, the Oversoul
Child will be born within you.  When  this Night Center has opened completely, your aura and
your word will be filled with Night  Energies and the aura will glow with a brilliant radiance of
the Night.  From what has just  been said, there can be seen a relationship between the Night
Centers and colors.  

Each Night Center, in its pure and developed state, vibrates to a particular color.  The  base
Night Center vibrates to the color red.  The spleen/pancreas center vibrates to the  color orange.
The third center, located over the solar plexus, vibrates to the color yellow.   The heart center
vibrates to the color green and the throat center to that of blue.  The brow  center, Night Eye,
vibrates to that of indigo, and the highest of Night Centers, the crown,  vibrates to the color
violet.  As all the Night Centers are developing magickally, they will  attain to the purest of
colors.  As the Night Centers reach perfection, they will open, and  the colors will flow till they
can be perceived as the color of the Night.   Let's look at an  exercise which can be done to
develop the Night Centers so that they will radiate in the  Night and permit your the Night
Powers to flow through you.  

First, refer back to topic sixteen.  In that topic, we discussed meditating on the desired  color
you needed for healing and projecting it into your Night Pillar.  You prepared  yourself for
meditation with a sheet of color paper, which would help you concentrate, and  draw to you, the
desired color energy that you wished to use.  Let's again do the same  technique, only this time,
instead of sending the color into your Pillar, you will send it into  the specific Night Center you
wish to stimulate.  

You should first see the specific Night Center, in your mind, and feel that great wheel of  Night
Energy slowly rotating, and see the specific color desired flowing into the Night  Center and
stimulating it.  See the center whirling faster and faster as the result of the  inflow of color
energy.   See the center becoming a pure channel for the color energy and  the impure energies
leaving it.  Further, see the added Energies of the Oversoul flowing  into the center via the silver
cord.  Do this with all of the Night Centers except the base  Night center.  This is an excellent
exercise will actually bring the Night Energies from the  Higher Realms and then release them
into the physical world around you.  Stand with  your feet together, and your arms and hands
outstretched, as you form a living X.  Palms  should be facing outward.  Now you must become
very calm and silent within. See  yourself as the Oversoul on Earth.  See yourself as a  Night
Being.  Now, you will bring  into your being Two Great Energies. Through the soles of your feel,
you will see the Earth  Energies rise up, and at the same time, you will be drawing into you the
Night Force  flowing from your Oversoul down through the Crown Night Center.  These Energies
will  meet in the heart Night Center.  As they meet, see these Energies going out, under the 
direction of your Oversoul and the Night Gods, healing, cleansing, purifying, and touching  the
Earth.  If you know someone in special need of the Energies, see them flowing to her  or him.  As
you continue to practice this exercise the flow of the Energies will become  stronger and
stronger.  You will be of true service to the Night Guild.  You will truly be a  Night Magician
when the Night Centers radiate in the night of your world.  I said earlier,  that as the Crown
Night Center begins to open, you have partial awareness of the Astral  Realm.   Yet, your
awareness is often distorted.  One state of awareness that you have of  your Astral journeys is
the dream state.  In our next discussion, you will enter the Dream  Realm.  

25.  The Dream Realm 

There are a great many books on the market dealing with the topic of dreams.  Many of  these
books list the symbols which you see in your dreams and then tell you what they  mean, or
what is going to happen because of what you dreamed.  But interpreting dreams  is just not that
easy.  Dreams are a very personal thing to each of us.  A dog, seen in one  dream, may mean one
thing to me and a totally different thing to you.  

To begin with, there are two basic types of dreams.  The first type of dream is a common 
occurrence in most people's lives. This is the dream when upon awakening you have only  vague
recollections of what transpired.  These are dreams which you rapidly forget what  took place. 
They are very confusing dreams and are the mental garbage which your mind  gets rid of as you
sleep.  The second type of dream is what you need to pay attention to.  

These are dreams which you remember very vividly upon awakening. You see images,  and
possibly colors, vividly.  You feel that you were actually there and taking part in what  was
going on.  You have a sharp recollection of what took place and you do not easily  forget what
transpired after awakening.  If this is the kind of dream that has occurred in  your life, then
you are remembering an actual experience that has taken place in the  Astral Realm.  You can
also be witnessing a message that is meant to help guide your  life.  The first type of dream you
can forget about.  This is just your mind getting rid of a  lot of mental garbage and worries
pressed upon it, or a distortion of a journey in the Astral  Realm.  The second type is important. 
You have often heard of the phrase, "sleep on it",  in connection with solving a problem that you
cannot seem to resolve.  

When you sleep on a problem, you are out in the Astral Realm and can meet with people  on that
side of life and receive an answer to your problem.  The answer generally comes  to you in the
form of a dream.  There are other things that can be done in the use of your  dreams.  

Let's say that you have an important interview with a client coming up.  The night before,  you
will need a picture of your client that you're going to meet.  Preferably, this should be  a
physical picture or a strong mental picture will suffice.  Then before going to sleep, you  should
concentrate on the picture of your client and think of the thing you would like your  client to
do.  Think and say the things to your client that will persuade her/him your way.   Then put it
out of your mind and just know, that as you sleep, you will meet your client in  the Astral and
this will help prepare your way in tomorrow's meeting.  You will be  successful if you do this. 
You can see that there are endless variations and possibilities  in the use of your dreams.  You
can also help improve your dreaming.   The first thing you should do in helping yourself in
dreaming is find out which way you  sleep best.  The body best picks up magickal currents by
having the head facing in a  certain direction.  Practice sleeping with your head pointed say to
the North and keep a  record on how you slept for a week.  Then the next week, sleep in a new
direction and do  the recording.  You should do this for all four directions.  This is the first step
towards  better sleeping and dreaming.  

To further improve dreaming do the following: when you fall asleep at night, say to  yourself
that you're going to remember all that you dream of clearly and sharply.  Say this  over and
over to yourself until you fall asleep naturally.  Know that you are going to dream  true!   Now,
you will want to keep a diary of your dreams.  

Keep this diary by your bed along with a pen.  Upon awakening from a vivid and true  dream,
record what you saw and the impressions of what it meant to you.  If the dream is  in a very
symbolic form, then take that dream into your meditation periods and seek to  discover the
meaning of those symbols.  As said before, symbols are a very personal thing  to you and their
meaning lies with the Oversoul and Night Teacher.  You may want to  record these symbols on a
three by five card and arrange them alphabetically.   Symbolism is used a great deal of the time
by your Oversoul for communication with you.   Symbolism is used so that you will spend more
time in communication with your Night  Teacher and Oversoul in seeking an answer.  Dreams
are important.  It is important for you to become familiar with your dreams and their
meaning.  Dreams  are one means by which the Oversoul may speak with you and give
important information  to guide your life. This could be from warnings concerning your health
or well-being to job  assistance or ways to improve your practice of Night Magick.  Another
mode of  communication is the Oracle, which we will discuss in the next topic, along with a 
discussion of Astral Guides and the use of Trance.   

26.  Astral Guides, Oracleship, and Trance

You are never alone in this world.  You may feel that you stand on some deserted island  in the
middle of the ocean, yet you should take comfort in the fact that all around you your  Guides
and Teachers are with you each and every moment of the day and night.  In  addition to
discussing the Guides, you will also explore communication with the Astral  Guides, or
oracleship, and a special state of consciousness, the Trance.  To begin with,  let's take a close
look at who your Guides and Teachers really are? 

Your Guides and Teachers are actually two distinct groups of magickal helpers.  The  Guides are
those who have remained on the Astral Realm and assist you from that  dimension.  They are
composed of both relatives and friends of your past lives who are  gaining valuable experience
and magickal growth by assisting you on the physical plane.   You should remember that their
personalities are still very much akin to the ones they  had in their last life.  There are
Specialist who come under this group of Guides.  They  assist you with special guidance if you
are undertaking a special task and need their  magickal expertise. They assist those in the
process of transition from physical to Astral  living.  They are the Astral doctors and nurses. 
The other group is made up of those I  term Teachers.  

They are a magickally advanced group of Beings.  They administer to you from a much  higher
realm of existence.  The Realm of the Soul.  They are usually with you from the  beginning of
time and follow you long into your magickal development.  As you reach a  special development
in your magickal path, the rank of the Teacher continues to advance  until you work with your
Night Teacher.  I will discuss the Night Teachers in a later topic.  

Everyone on this planet has been led by inspiration at some time or another, but most  have
never taken the time to try and understand where that inspiration came from.   Inspiration has
its origins from two different sources.  The first is your Oversoul and is of  the highest form of
inspiration.  The second is guidance given to you through your  Magickal Guides and Teachers.
You can receive a closer rapport with your Guides and  Teachers by learning to remain in a state
of inner listening, by remaining in a state of  inner awareness, knowing that they are always
with you and that you can receive from  them guidance in all that you do.  
You must begin by accepting their Presence and knowing that you can communicate with 
them.  Whenever you can shut out the outer world and its problems, then can you hear  them
speak to you.  You must always carefully weigh what they tell you and know that,  ultimately,
the decision is yours.  They never compel you to do anything, but simply guide  you as to what
the probabilities are and then it's your decision.  You may be able to hear  the Astral message,
but some are exceptionally good at hearing those from the Astral  Realm.  These individuals are
Oracles.  
An Oracle is a person who through a difference in body and brain structure is able to  receive
messages from the Astral with an exceptional clarity.  They are individuals with a  delicate
physical and nervous system upon which Astral Spirits may impress the  message.  The person
enters an altered state of consciousness, whereby the Guide or  Teacher is able to impress upon
the nervous system the message to be given.  The  Highest Guide or Teacher also acts as a traffic
controller regulating which Guide or  Teacher will give a message and who will not, through the
Oracle.  The Oracle must  remain in a very passive state of mind.  The Oracle is only a link
between this world and  that of the Astral.  There are degrees of passivity in consciousness for
the Oracle.  The  Oracle may retain almost total consciousness while seeing and hearing the
message, and  then again, consciousness may be totally repressed by the Guide or Teacher.  This
total  repression of consciousness, in the Oracle, is known as Trance.  

Trance is an altered state of consciousness, whereby the Oracle's consciousness leaves  the body
and that of a Higher Entity enters into it.  Thus, the Higher Entity has free reign  to speak and
act through the body instrument without misinterpretation by the Oracle.  In  the other form of
oracleship, the Oracle hears and interprets what s/he sees and in this  case s/he does not.
Generally, for the Oracle in Trance, it seems as if s/he has been  pleasantly sleeping.  Depending
on the Oracle's development, s/he can go into Trance on  the physical plane and still remain
conscious and active on the Astral plane, and so can  control the type of entity who is giving the
message through her/his body, to those on the  physical plane who are listening.  Even if the
Oracle cannot remain awake in the Astral,  there is nothing to fear.  If her/his body, emotions,
and thoughts are one with the Oversoul  then nothing can happen to her/him while s/he is in a
state of Trance.  Here is a warning  to those who would attempt to practice the state of Trance.  If
you are without fear and  know that there is nothing to be afraid of, and live in the Night Pillar
of the Oversoul, then  no harm can befall you.  Remember this, keep your thoughts at one with
the Oversoul and  nothing bad will ever happen to you.  If you cannot live in this state of being
then do not  try to reach a state of Trance.  Otherwise, you are subject to entry and hold by the
lower  mischievous entities. Most people have a safeguard against entering Trance and that is 
falling asleep, but entry and hold is still possible at just the point of falling asleep, and  the
point of awakening.  This can only occur when you are attempting to reach the state of  Trance.
This cannot occur if you are just normally going to sleep.  Have no fear, but live in  the Oversoul
and no wrong entry can occur to you during the state of Trance.  There are  several forms of
Trance.  

There is the kind, just mentioned above, whereby a Higher Entity uses your body to  transmit a
message to a group of listeners while the Oracle is in a soporific state.  There  is also what is
called Night Trance.  
Here the Oracle can be fully conscious and by his own control deliberately enter the state  of
Trance rather then it being induced by the possessing Higher Entity.  The next kind is  called
Magician's Trance.  

Here, the body is very rigid, even to the point of having hard skin.  You are still in your  body,
but what you see can be likened to sitting on the highest peak with a telescope.  In  other word
wherever you look, you can see what is transpiring. There is no limit as to  where or what you
can see.  Time, distance, and/or physical structures are no obstacles to  your seeing.  The final
kind is called Trance Projection.  

Here you leave the body.  The flesh remains very limp and the breathing greatly reduced.   The
heart rate is also greatly reduced.  Again, there are no limits to where you can see.  Everyone, to
one degree or another can receive messages from the Astral.  It is important  that everyone
learn to take time to know and become close to their Guides and Teachers.   Their messages of
guidance and help can completely change the world that you live in.   There is no limit to the
aid that they can provide in your world.  Take the time to still the  mind and body so that you
may hear the guidance that they have to offer you.  It is not  essential that you try the states of
Trance.  You should only induce the state of Trance  under the guidance of your Magickal
Teacher.  Therefore, I have omitted the how-to  instruction for the state of Trance.  You should
not try the different states of Trance unless  you are sure of what you're doing and that you're
entering them with the correct frame of  mind and under the proper supervision.  Above all
learn this, "To be still and know the  Oversoul."  This is the key to Night Magick and Night
Consciousness.  We have been  discussing the magickal influence of your Astral Guides and
Teachers.  Yet, they are only  one magickal source, out of many, that influence your life. 
Another great source of  magickal influence over your emotional and magickal life is the
Goddess Diana.  She is  better known to you as the Presence of the Moon.    

27.  The Moon and Its Rites

There are many roads of magickal evolution which are filled with excitement, adventure, 
accomplishment, and success by those who travel them.   One of these roads is serving as  the
indwelling life force for souls within a moon, planet, or star.  The stars, planets, and  moons
are the physical bodies of Great Beings who are on far on the road of magickal  evolution.  Of all
these grand Bodies, the one most symbolic of this chapter on Water  Magick is the Moon.  

The Moon of the Earth exerts great influence over the tides of the ocean.  You can then  extend
the Moon's influence over the Tides of humankind's emotions.  In this topic, you  will examine
this function and the magickal role that the Moon plays in your life.  You will  also study and
perform special rites associated with the Moon.  Let's begin by looking  directly at the magickal
role of the Moon.  

You see the Moon because it is lit by the reflected light from the Sun.  The Moon is a  source of
Yin Light for it takes the Light of the Sun and transforms it into Yin Light.  This  Energy is at a
lesser extent, when the Moon is new, for it reflects lesser quantities of the  transformed
Energies.  The Energies of the Moon can help directly in the process of your  Oversoul's gaining
control over your emotions.  The Energies of the Moon passing  through your Oversoul where in
turn, they are purified and added to your aura, go on to  strengthen and build emotional
stability.  The Energies of the Moon are very powerful and  add great Magickal Force to your life
when purified.  The Oversoul, acting as a filter,  filters out the impurities of the Moon's Energies
caused by the grey energies that come  from humankind. After filterization, you have the
Moon's Pure Magickal Energies, and the  Moon shines in the night as a Luminous Orb of
Rarified Power.  When your life and aura  are illumined with the Yin Light of the Oversoul and
is in turn magnified by the Moon, a  great reflector, then is your Power in the Night multiplied
to its maximum.  You are  likened to the Moon, when you, as a Night Magician, use your
purified Night  Consciousness to reflect the Yin Light of the Moon into the world.  You are the
Moon, a  reflector of the Night Energies.  The time of the New Moon is a time of new beginnings.  

It is a time when a Night Magician should consecrate and dedicate her/his aspirations  and life
anew unto her/his Oversoul.  Thus you celebrate this time with a rite of new  beginning.  The
rite unfolds as follows: 

Make sure your Night Altar is ready except don't fill the chalice with any wine or grape  juice. 
Putting on your Night Robe and arming yourself with your Night Weapons place the  Night
Pillar around yourself, the Night Altar, and the world.   Put in your right hand the  Night Wand;
face the direction of North which symbolizes the element of Water; and now  while making the
sign of Night Magick, see fig.___, say this solemn invocation to the First  of the Four Great
Beings of the Cosmic Elements: "I invoke the Great Powers of the  Cosmic Being of the (insert
direction) to flow into my being.  Fill me with the Cosmic  Power of (insert element).  Renew me
in the Power of Night Consciousness.  Make me a  Being of Cosmic Yin Light.  Guide me upon the
Road of Night Magick."  Then face the  Night Altar and place a little of the correct element from
the vile into the chalice.  The  chalice is symbolic of you and the element representing the
Cosmic Being. Then face the  West and repeat the entire procedure inserting the correct
direction and selecting the  correct element to put into the chalice.  Do this for all four
directions.  The correct  elements and directions are as follows: water representing Water and
North; oil  representing Air and the West; salt is of the Earth and South; and fire(candle) that of
Itself  and East.  Now pickup the candle; make the sign of Night Magick over the chalice; and if 
there is just you, then repeat an invocation of dedication of your life and being to the  guidance
and care of your Oversoul, Night Teacher, and Guides.  After this, touch your  first two fingers of
your left hand in the substance of the chalice, and upon your heart  make the sign of Night
Magick and then repeat the Night Invocation on Earth as follows: 

"Let the Earth be filled with the Presence of the Night.  I honor the Presence of the Night  in all I
say and do.  By the Night all things are given, by the Night all enemies removed.   By the Yin
Light of the Moon I shall walk the Night Road on Earth in power, and glory and  victory forever. 
So be it."   

After this you will need to hum for ten to thirty minutes. Although you probably know how  to
hum let me make sure.  With your lips shut and together make the "mmmm" sound.    Hum the
sound such that eventually you'll feel a resonance building in your head.  As you  head begins to
resonate, this resonance will spread over your body and you will begin to  feel yourself
vibrating and pulsating.  

If there are others doing this with you, then select one to be the officiant.  The officiant will  do
all that has been described so far, up to the point of saying the Night Invocation on  Earth. Each
member present will repeat a silent prayer of dedication to her/his life and  being, and
committing it to the guidance and care of her/his Oversoul, Night Teacher, and  Guides.  After
this, the officiant will touch her/his first two fingers of her/his left hand in the  substance of
the chalice, and upon each member's heart s/he will make the sign of Night  Magick and repeat
the following: "With the substance of the Four Worlds and the Powers  thereof, may you forever
be guided on the Road of Night Magick and become a Night  Magician."  Then, repeat the Night
Invocation on Earth, in unison. Everyone will then hum  in unison till stopped by the
officiant. This is the Rite of the New Moon.  A time of joyous,  beautiful renewal in Night
Magick.  

The next rite is in celebration of the Full Moon.  The Full Moon marks the time of  realization,
attainment, and fulfillment.  The consecration and deepening within of these  aspects is
celebrated in a very beautiful rite.  If there is just you performing this rite, then  you will need
only one small candle on a plate.  In addition, you will need two more small  plates; one
containing sage and the other holding your vessel of water.   With these  things in hand, you are
now ready to begin.  

Place these three things on your floor Night Altar, with the candle in the middle, the sage  on
the right, and the water on the left.  Place them such that you will be seated facing the  North
with them in front of you.  Then before being seated, take the candle in your right  hand and
with your left hand clear the four points of direction.  You will begin with the  East and move
counterclockwise making the sign of Night Magick and repeating to each  direction:  "This way
is the clear road to Night Magick bathed in the Yin Light of the Full  Moon."  Now be seated,
repeat the Night Invocation of the Earth and enter into a deep  silence and communion with
your Oversoul and feel the achievement of knowing and  being the Oversoul on Earth.  Now take
a small portion of the sage in your right hand and  say, "This is the Spirit of the Night in form
upon the Earth.  It is the Essence of a Night  Magician.  Honor to the Night Spirit that I have
achieved all that I AM".  Place the sage  around the candle.  The candle should be lit from the
beginning of the rite.  Next pickup  the water in your left hand and repeat "Water is the Night
Spirit in pure Essence.  It is the  Power of the Spirit and Life on Earth. I AM the Waters of Life
and the Night Soul on  Earth." Pour the water around and on the sage.  Now repeat, "the Night
Soul united, One  and forever, in Spirit, Power, and Life, within that which I am, a Night
Magician.  So be it".   Close by humming the "mmmm" sound till you resonate deeply the sound. 
If there is  more then one then use the following guidelines.  

Everyone present will have the same plates and materials before them.  Selecting one as 
officiant, s/he will clear the four points following the same procedures outlined earlier.   S/he
will stand in the center of the circle formed by all the celebrants and begin in the  East.  Then
everyone should be seated.  Hum together after seated.  Continue all as the  same in unison.  

The final rite requires nothing other then yourself.  Be seated comfortably on the ground  at
eventide, or night, when the light of the Full Moon may fall upon you.  Doing this on a 
cloudless night is best.  Put the Night Pillar around yourself and all members  participating.  If
there are more people doing this then just yourself, then all should face  towards the Moon. 
Begin with Night Breathing for a few minutes.  Then you will visualize,  and all with you, the
Light of the Full Moon passing through your Oversoul.  Know that the  Moon's Energy is being
purified of all the Earth's human dross and is flowing now into  your Astral Body and aura.  See
yourself filled with a most intense, pure Yin Light.  This  Light will give you emotional stability
and inner strength.  Do this, feeling the Night Soul's  Presence being magnified within yourself. 
Know that you are the Oversoul.   

You have learned from the Moon and its cycles, that it represents your beginning upon  the path
of Night Consciousness in its New Moon phase and ends with your fulfillment as  the Night
Soul in the Full Moon phase.  Use carefully the Light of the Moon.  The Light of  the Moon must
be purified by the Oversoul before it can be accepted into your world.   Thus, you must always
remain in Night Consciousness in order to reflect into your world  only the Night Energies.  The
Moon is a very Advanced Being.  The Moon is a great  reflector of the Yin Light into your world
during its night.   The Goddess Diana is the  Master of the Element Water on Earth.  Now, you,
too, will become Master of the Element  Water in the next topic.   

28.  Water Rites  

Water is representative of the Night Spirit.  Water is Life and the Night Spirit.  I will  introduce
two rites which embody the use of water.  Water is a very powerful magnet and  container for the
Night Energies.  Water will greatly intensify your drawing power of the  Night Force.  The first
rite that I will teach is designed simply to aid your drawing upon,  and concentrating the Night
Force.  

Begin by obtaining a glass bowl, similar to a mixing bowl, with a large open space at the  top. 
The size you will need is based upon the number of people participating with you.   You should
have a bowl set aside for private use and one for group use. When your not  using the bowl keep it
wrapped and in a place so that no one else will disturb it.  You will  also need three black
candles, your Night Altar that is close to the floor, and a black cloth  to cover the table.  Setup
the Night Altar so that you, or the officiant, when seated at the  altar faces North.  If there are
others present then they should be seated around the altar.  The Night Altar should be covered
with the altar cloth.  Fill the bowl full of water and place  it in the center of the Night Altar.
Finally, everyone will be seated, but the officiant who will  light the three candles and place
two of them on the outer edges of the group.  Now that  you have these things setup your ready to
begin.  

Light the incense with the third candle; face West of the Night Altar; and with the lit, black 
candle in your right hand and while making the sign of Night Magick with the left hand  repeat
the following invocation: "Let only the Night Spirit remain here and only the Night  Spirit go
out.  This room is protected in the Yin Light of the Oversoul.  Let the Light of the  Night Brethren
enter here and only the Night Force remain.  The first Night Guardian shall  remain this way
and only the Night Spirit's Power will stay.  So be it".  Now turn  counterclockwise to the next
major direction and repeat again this invocation.  Each time  preceding it with the sign of
Night Magick.  Do this again in the third major direction, and  finally over the Night Altar
itself. Then take your seat on the floor before the bowl and  again surround yourself with the
Night Pillar.  Contact your Oversoul and begin to draw  into yourself the Night Force.  Then
reach out and touch the bowl with both your hands,  one on each side of the bowl.  If this is
being done as a group, then all will interlock  fingers when hands are placed upon the bowl by
all members present.  All should see the  Force flowing into themselves, and then into the bowl
filling the bowl with the Night Force.  Continue to do this as long as you, and the members with
you, feel comfortable and can  control the Force.  If at anytime you should begin to feel
uncomfortable, you should stop  and again stand and clear all four corners of the room.  Then
rest a while before trying  this again.  This is a tremendous rite for collecting the Night Force in
its most  concentrated form.  After the rite, it is suggested that you obtain clean drinking
glasses  (one for each member present) and dip them into the water of the bowl and drink of it.  
Drink as much water as you can comfortably hold.  The water has a great healing and 
energizing effect and will ward off illness for a long time.  It is further effective in aiding  ailing
plants and animals.  The benefit of the Force, coursing through your body, is cause  enough to
do this as often as possible.  

In the second rite, in addition to what you have setup, a mirror and two of the following  color
candles: violet, blue, green, yellow, red, and black.  This is not a group rite but for  you alone. 
Begin this rite the same way you did the first rite, by clearing the four points of  the room. 
Setup the bowl of water and a mirror directly behind it.  You will use four  candles placed upon
the Night Altar, one on each corner.  The two closest to you will be  black candles.  The other
two candles' colors depend upon what you are trying to  accomplish.  When this rite is properly
setup and performed, you will be able to see your  Guides and Teacher and to receive answers to
questions you put before them.  The color  combination of the candles is very important.   

If you wish to have questions answered by no one in particular, then a blue and red  candle are
used.  Another strong color combination you can use is red and violet.  To  contact your Night
Teacher, the color combination must match their personal harmony  and frequency.  There is
a chart located in Appendix B which will give you the proper  color combination for the various
Night Teachers I speak of in this work.  For those Night  Teachers not listed or if you're not sure
who yours is, then you can use the blue and red  candle combination to find out and also their
specific color combination to be used in this  rite.  Here is how to use this rite.  

Be sure you have cleared the four points in the room and have surrounded yourself in the  Night
Pillar.  Otherwise, you will attract the wrong force.  Setup the bowl of water with the  black
candles in front and the other two in the rear, (make sure that the four candles can  be seen in
the mirror), and the mirror directly behind the bowl.  Light the candles and your  ready to
begin.  Meditate upon your Teacher and Guides and upon the fixtures in front of  you.  Be sure to
get comfortable, surround yourself in the Pillar of Protection, and relax  with Night Breathing. 
Sit directly in front of the Night Altar, such that, you will see the top  and surface of the water
in the mirror.  The reflection you should see in the mirror, is the  surface of the water and the
candles. The candles will form a figure 8.  The faces of the  Teacher, or Guides, will appear in the
reflection of the water in the mirror, or just above  the actual bowl.  If at anytime you should
start to lose the vibration, stand up and again  clear the four points and begin at another time. 
Not only will the faces appear in the  mirror but also images that will answer your questions.  It
is also possible that you will  hear the voice of the Teacher from the image that appears.  This is
very much akin to  picture telephones.  Your mind should be free of mental garbage and
worries.  You  should also be in good overall health.  If you seem to fail at first then you know
that you  are making true progress.  As with anything, you must practice over and over again to 
achieve true results.  If you do so, then you'll achieve the highest results.  You have  learned so
much about the Astral Realm.  But wouldn't it be great if you could go there  and see it for
yourself?   Well if your ready, just turn the page and you'll be on your way.   

29.  Night Projection

Perhaps a more familiar term for what you are about to study is Astral Projection or  traveling. 
The word "Astral" is derived from the Latin and Greek language which means  "of the stars".
You learned in the beginning of this chapter on Water Magick, that the  Astral Body
interpenetrates the physical body.  Your consciousness resides in the  physical body during the
day and by night, when your physical body sleeps, your  consciousness resides in the Astral
Body.  People don't remember what takes place  during their Astral sojourns because they
believe that this physical world is the only true  reality, and so their mind rationalizes what
they have seen in the Astral Realm into a  distorted dream.  But if you truly believe that the
Astral Realm exists and that you can go  there then you will remember what you have seen and
done in the Astral Realm and  remember it upon awakening.  Yet, you can go beyond dreaming
and actually travel  there.  You can bring back your experiences in the Astral Realm. You can do
this by  learning, consciously, to project yourself into the Astral Realm.  This is Astral or Night 
Projection.  

To begin with, in learning to Night Project consciously, you must learn to have no fear.   Fear is
the greatest destroyer of good results in this work.  Fear will prevent you from  accomplishing
anything in Night Magick.  So do not be afraid to Night Project. You can  not get lost while you
reside in the Astral Realm.  The physical body is firmly attached to  the Astral Body by the
silver cord.  No matter where you travel in the Astral Realm,  whenever you wish to return to
the physical body, simply think of yourself there, and you  will do so.  Why would you want to
travel in the Astral, in the first place? 

To begin with you could see how well you're doing so far in your sojourn on Earth.  You  can
meet face-to-face with your Guides and Teacher and receive first hand instruction on  how to
solve certain problems.  You can receive instruction on how to better your life and  access the
lessons you have learned so far.  You can also travel anywhere on the Earth  plane you wish to. 
You can see great libraries and be able to read the books contained  therein.  You could see
museums and other places of interest. There is no limit to the  things you can do while Night
Projecting.  But be warned if you try to go somewhere and  invade another's privacy.  You are
liable to receive an "astral shock" and get slammed  back into your body with a terrific
headache. Although the person you visited may not be  able to physically see you their
subconscious will be able to do so and send a strong  astral blow to your Astral Body.  Its best if
you don't go where you intuit you shouldn't go.   Without fear and listening to your Oversoul for
guidance your ready to Night Project.

First, you should watch your diet before Night Projecting.  Try to eat as little fried food as 
possible.  Do not travel on a full stomach.  You won't get anywhere if you are  uncomfortable
because your stomach is full and in the process of digestion.  For about a  week prior to actually
projecting you should prepare yourself mentally by repeating the  following invocation, four
times daily. Do it once in the morning, noon, evening, and  before going to bed.  The invocation
is, "On this day ___, I am going to Night Project.  I  am going to travel in the Astral Realm and
remember all that I see and do.  I will recall all  of this after I have returned to my body.  This I
will do and won't fail."  On the day you  have selected to Night Project be sure and have as
peaceful and quiet a day as possible.   You must try and keep your mind on the subject of Night
Projecting all that day.  You  must look forward to going to bed that night with the intentions of
traveling in the Astral  Realm.  Now, you need to learn to relax before projecting.  

Many will say this is easy for them to do, but actually this is not true.  True relaxation is  an art
and must be practiced to be mastered.  To begin Night Projection, you must be fully  relaxed.
There must not be a tense nerve or muscle in your entire body. When you lay  down to project,
the room must be just right, being neither too cold, or hot, if you are to  achieve true relaxation.
To assist relaxing and projecting, darken the room and secure it  from entry by anyone else.  In
no way should there be any way that you can be disturbed.   If you are touched, while traveling,
this could cause harm to your physical body.  Further,  no one should attempt to try Night
Projection if they are prone to heart trouble.  This is not  to scare anyone, but the body should
be in good health.  You should not cover yourself  with heavy bedding for this will interfere
with relaxation and projecting.  If you're ready to  relax, then let's begin.  

Turn your consciousness upon your toes.  Concentrate mentally on them and see them 
relaxing.  See all the tension leaving the toes.  Next, work on the foot and see all tension 
leaving it.  Do this all the way up one leg and then do it for the other leg.  Do not go on till  there
is no tension or tightness in any part of your lower extremities.  Then move on to the  pelvic
region and do the same relaxation technique.  Then do the arms and each finger,  individually,
till you feel calm and relaxed.  The stomach and chest region are next, then  on up the neck and
finally, the head region.  Relax the jaw and forehead.  Relax each part  thoroughly before going
to the next part.  Once you have accomplished this, it is time to  relax the mind.  

In order to relax your mind, allow your thoughts to dwell on a beautiful day with billowy 
clouds in the sky.  Take your thoughts and place them on one of those beautiful dark  clouds. 
Just relax and drift on the cloud and let your mind forget all its worries. Think of  nothing else
but the deep sensation of peace and floating on the cloud.  At this point your  eyes should be
closed. Relax your thoughts and for a few moments try to think of nothing.   In Night
Projection, you are where your thoughts are.  

The Astral Body looks somewhat like your own physical body so picture it floating about  three
feet above you.  You must know that you're actually floating above your physical  body.  Relax,
do not force the process, do not strain or induce tenseness in the physical  body, and above all,
do not jerk.  If your body jerks, then you will find that you will have to  wait till the next night
to try again.  You will feel a floating sensation and a gentle sense  of rising.  This is great! If you
don't jerk, then you will find that you will continue to float  and rise, so carefully, open your
eyes.  You will have found that you have floated up and  away from your physical body.  If you
want to view your room then you can do so by just  thinking of doing so, but be careful.  The
experience is something akin to hearing your  voice for the first time on the tape recorder.  It
will be quite a shock and you'll hardly  believe it's your body.  Some have become so startled
that they have returned to their  bodies with a shock. Do not be startled or afraid.  Just relax as
you float there and get  used to the sensation of your new body.  You will find that you are
naked.  If you will think  of clothes, then you will be dressed, but remember to put that thought
away in a corner of  your mind in order to remain dressed.  Slowly, "will" yourself to settle back
to the floor.   What will you do next? 

For the first night, it is best that you go straight to the Astral Realm.  All you need do is  think
of being there and you will do so.  Wherever you want to be your thoughts will take  you. If you
will go to the Astral Realm first, and thereafter spend a little time in the Astral  before doing
other things on the Earth plane, you will never have trouble getting out of the  physical body
again.  You will also receive a tremendous magickal recharge by visiting  the Astral Realm. 
When you want to return simply think of your physical body and you  will be there.  Now, you
must return slowly, and carefully, back into your body.  

It is essential that you do this slowly.  Have you ever had a dream where you felt yourself 
suddenly falling and woke up with a start.  This is what happens when you return too fast  into
your physical body.  It is essential to align the two bodies up correctly, or you will  suffer from a
headache.  If this happens, simply fall back to sleep and when you awaken  the alignment
process will have occurred naturally and the headache will be gone.  On  reentry, you will feel as
if you are returning to a very dense and cold body.  It won't be the  most comfortable experience
in your life.  But this shows you how much more crude and  slower a rate of vibration the
physical body really is. There, you have Night Projected.   Let's examine another technique for
projecting yourself out of your physical body.  

Again relax fully and make sure that there are no rough edges disturbing your body and 
distracting you.  Have your eyes closed and roll them up so that, in effect, you are looking 
somewhere up at the top of your forehead.  Do not create eyestrain though. Breathe  regularly,
rhythmically, and deeply then forget all about your breathing.  Turn your  conscious awareness
towards your third Night Center which is located over the solar  plexus, or navel area.  It is
from this area that the Astral Body leaves the physical body.   Visualize your Astral Body
slowly starting to leave your physical body.  Picture the third  Night Center like a window
through which the Astral is going to leave.  See the Astral as a  cloud-like figure, shaped
similarly to the physical body, and slowly rising up and floating  about six feet above the
physical form.  At this point any one of the following might  happen: 1) again you might jerk
and return to your body and so on another night you'll  have to try again, 2) you'll feel a tingling
or numbness in your physical body which is a  good sign, but which you should ignore.  From
here, you will feel a rigidity or stiffness  come over the body and you will not be able to move.
DON'T PANIC! This is an excellent  sign of progress.  You will be able to see as if through your
eyelids and the surroundings  will be bathed in a soft light, if you remain calm, you will begin
to feel a slight swaying  and out you'll move into the Astral Realm. You will see things in very
vivid colors and with  remarkable clarity, 3) you may feel a swaying motion and then
experience the feeling as if  going through a dark tunnel, at the end of which is a bright light.  At
the end of the tunnel  you will pass through a curtain of brilliant colored drops and then,
suddenly you will be in  the Astral World.  Night Projection is a very beautiful experience.  

Have no fear and you will have no problems.  Don't be discouraged if, at first, you don't  succeed. 
Nothing ever comes too easy in life but must be worked at with great patience  and diligence.
Never talk about your travels except to help others.  Use it to grow  magickally on the road of
Night Magick.  Remain always in the Shadow of your Night  Teacher as you travel in the
Greater Realms.  You have come to the end of another  chapter in Night Magick.  

It was a chapter filled with the wonders of Water Magick and the Astral Realm.  You have  come
to know the Realm, intimately, and even how to travel in it while still living in a  physical
body. You have explored the secret uses of water.  You have learned secrets  about your physical
and Astral bodies and the inner power contained within them.  You  can look at others now and
know their thoughts and emotions by the use of your Night  Eye.  You have met the Goddess
Diane and perhaps most importantly, you have come to  know that you are never alone in this
world.  That your love ones and friends are just in  the next Realm always waiting to help you if
you will let them.  Yet, for the moment, you  must leave the beauty of the Astral Realm and the
lore of Water Magick and enter into a  higher and even more exciting phase of Night Magick. 
This is the Mental Realm and the  lore of Air Magick.   

CHAPTER  VI


AIR  MAGICK 

30.  The Mental Realm 

As you travel on the road of Night Magick and endeavor to become a Night Magician, you  first
had to gain some mastery over your physical and emotional selves.  This is a long  process and
may take many lives to accomplish.  But as you begin to achieve that  mastery, you will
continue down the road towards Night Consciousness.  Now you will  travel the third portion of
the road towards self-mastery.  You enter the Realm of Mind.  

As you found with the Astral Realm, the Mental Realm is composed of varying levels of 
vibration.  It would be wise to examine, in brief, these different vibrations and their 
interrelationship. Let's begin with the highest realm and work our way down to the lowest 
level.  

The Void is the highest level that can be reached.  It is the level where we are all united in  Mind
as One.  Here, all are One.  This is the level of knowing.  Here, you do not think for  all is known. 
Here all ideas exist, all things are known, and you as the Spirit are the  Knower.  This is the
level of Pure Mind, the Void Mind, the sum of all.  This mind essence  interpenetrates all and is
accessible to all who are in vibration with it.  This is the ultimate  level all must someday
reach.  You must be the Knower.  The Godsoul Mind is the next  level.

This is the level of original mind.  Here all minds are as one yet there is individuality.   This is
the level of highest individual mind.  Here is the origin of the archetypes of mind. The Oversoul
Mind is the next level.  

This is the level of the Higher Mind.  From out of the Godsoul Mind, ideas that exist  become
manifest in this world.  Here, you find all joined in the Oversoul Mind.  There is  Oneness in
thought and consciousness.  The Oversoul Thought first creates, using the  ideas drawn from
the Godsoul Mind and the mind substance of the Oversoul Realm.   Here, you are the Oversoul in
Thought and Action, the Creator.  Now you enter the  physical world of thought and mind.

You may believe you know this world.  Actually, your thoughts and consciousness are  much
more then you realize.  You will remember that your emotions were tied into your  emotional or
Astral Body. Your thoughts and consciousness are the same and make up  the Mental Body.  It is
through your Mental Body that you think and have consciousness  on the physical plane.  But
in order for the physical body to be tied into this Mental Body,  there must be a physical link
and this is the brain.  Many believe that it is the brain that  actually does the thinking, but the
brain is actually a receiving station.  It takes the Mental  energies sent to it, by the Mental
Body, and translates it into action in the physical body.   Your brain is attuned to the
wavelength of your Mental Body.  Your brain and Mental  Body produces an electromagnetic
current through its activities, and thus, also produces  a Mental Aura which is akin to your
Astral Aura.  To see these energies, you would have to  develop your Night Eye to a greater degree
then you had when you saw the Astral  energies.  I discussed earlier how the Oversoul is directly
linked to the physical body via  the silver cord into the heart region.  The silver cord is also
directly linked to the brain  region.  Thus your thoughts are always monitored and acted upon
by your Oversoul.  Your  Oversoul in order to experience the physical world must build-up
physical counterparts to  its Magickal Being.  

So in the beginning of the Oversoul's physical sojourn, the mind substance of the Mental  Body
is undeveloped.  But as time in this world and the others passes, the physical mind  develops
and slowly becomes refined.  Life after life, you come to this plane trying to  develop your
physical consciousness into one with your Oversoul consciousness.   Although the Oversoul can
influence the Mental Body if the Mental Body does not listen  then there is little that the
Oversoul can do.  The majority of the world does not listen to  the Oversoul.  Therefore the
Oversoul withdraws into its own realm and remains there  until the Lower Mind calls upon it
for assistance and tries to listen and follow its will. This  is what you are trying to do.  
So, as you move farther into this chapter on Air Magick, you will encounter exercises,  rites,
and the use of your Night Magician's Tools and Weapons, in order to develop your  mind.  You
will take your mind through the tests of self-mastery in order to become a  Night Magician. 
Your first rite in Air Magick will give you the link between the air and  your mind.   

31.  Air Rite 

The Ancient Ones compared the element of air to that of the mind. The Ancient Mysteries, 
likewise, showed that the mental faculties could be compared to the aerial regions.  It is  my
intention to introduce a rite that will greatly benefit the mind and its faculties.  The rite  puts
together two elements: your mind and the air.  I will show you how your mental  powers can be
enhanced through a special form of breathing.  

You will remember in the topic on Night Breathing that it was through very deep breathing 
that your health could be improved and for many, breathing is very shallow.  In the Air  Rite,
you are going to use deep breathing but it is going to be based on a particular  breathing rate. 
Instead of just breathing in and out rhythmically, you will breathe in and  hold the breath for
so long, and then breathe out and then, again, hold your breath. Great  benefit can be derived by
such.  Before you begin, I want to make it clear that this is  serious business and not a game.
Please, DO NOT deviate from the set pattern that is  about to be described.  To do so can be very
hazardous to your health.  

To begin with, you must sit or lie down so that you are very comfortable.  Then, you want  to
become very relaxed and reduce all the tenseness possible in your body.  Then, you  will need to
cross your ankles and wrists to build-up the energy from your breathing.  If  you have done all
of this, then you are ready to begin with the breathing.  To start with,  you will do three
complete deep breathing exercises.  If you have forgotten how, then here  is a quick review.  

Inhale as deep a breath as possible pushing the diaphragm out as far as possible.  When  you feel
you have taken in all the air possible, take in just a bit more air.  Then exhale the  air very
steadily and completely bringing in the diaphragm and abdomen as far as  possible.  You want
to really empty your lungs.  After you have done this, you are ready to  do the timed breathing.  

Timed breathing means you are going to breathe in for so many seconds, then hold your  breath
for so many seconds, then exhale so many seconds, and again hold your breath  for so many
seconds. In the Air Rite, you are going to begin by inhaling for five seconds,  hold your breath
for ten seconds, exhale for ten seconds, and hold your breath for seven  to ten seconds.  You are
going to repeat the entire process ten times.  There are certain  precautions you must take in
doing this rite.  

You must not do it if you are in poor health.  You must stop doing it if for any reason you  are
feeling dizzy or light headed. If you persist in doing it past these warning signals then  you are
likely to pass out.  You must not strain yourself in doing this rite.  There should be  absolutely
no force on your part to maintain the pattern of breathing.  If there is, then you  need to reduce
the number of seconds that you hold your breath.  If you do the rite  correctly then the benefits
are tremendous.  

You will find that your mental health will be tremendous.  You will feel relieved of all  tension
and mental strain.  You will feel extra charged with new mental power.  This is an  excellent
rite to use before and after any of the mental exercises in Air Magick.  If you  need added mental
power for long periods of study or for increased memory then this rite  will greatly increase
both.  If your world is filled with mental demands, then this rite is  best practiced several times
a day.  It is especially good to use it when you feel the least  mentally drained.  You can see that
there is a very close relationship to the air you  breathe and your mental faculties.  It is all
based on the right use of your breathing  patterns.  You should remember to be relaxed and not
to strain when you use the Air Rite.   Further, you must not play around with different patterns
of timed breathing if you don't  want to hurt yourself.  You should always use this rite to the
benefit of your good health.   By now, you should be mentally charged up and ready to explore
the power of your mind.  

32.  Power of Thought 

As the title suggests, there is power in your thoughts.  You probably have never thought of  your
thoughts as containing any kind of power but they do.   Much of Mental Magick  requires your
understanding of the Mental Realm and how to increase the powers of your  mind.   Here I will
discuss briefly the Mental Realm and begin your development of a  more powerful Mental Body.

When you die to the physical plane you move first to the Astral Realm.  After reviewing  your
past life and lives, you then receive guidance as to what to do next.  If you are of a  higher
vibration then that of the Astral Realm, then you may leave, or die to, the Astral and  go on to
the Mental Realm.  It is here in the Mental Realm that all ideas are first brought  forth in
created form.  It is a world of thought and creation through thought.  The great  creations,
inventions, social ideas, and art that are in the world today were originally  created in this
mind world and released into the physical world.  Here, in the physical  world, a receptive
individual is able to tune into these thought patterns and create from  them on the physical
level. Thought creation is the work of the Great Beings who live upon  this Mental World.  They
create in thought great things that will enhance the physical  world.  This leads to your
relationship with the Mental World.  

There was some very significant information in that last paragraph that you can carry over 
into your world here in the physical, in regards to thought power.  The Beings who live in  the
Mental Realm first perceive the idea, then they picture the idea, and then they give the  idea
form and send it into the physical world.  You do the very same thing all the time, but  without
very much effort or concentration.  You often get an idea of something that you  want, but that's
usually where it all ends. You may think about it once in a while and hope  you will get it, but
only sporadically.  If you look at the Mental Realm around you and  examine its properties and
how it works, then you will see why thoughts can have power.  

In this material world of ours, if you want to create something you must use some physical 
means to do so.  This means is usually by way of your hands.  In the Mental Realm, your 
material, so to speak, that you create with is the etherial Mental energies.  The tool with  which
you create with is your thought.  By applying a strong, concentrated, and  continuous thought
directed at the Mental energies, you can create a Thought Form.  That  is, your thoughts take on
a form imbued with the qualities of your thoughts.  If you  continue to add more thought power
to this form, it will eventually materialize into your  material world. Whatever the thought is
programmed to do, it will happen here on Earth.   So if you wanted a forty foot yacht, then that
is what would eventually come into your  possession.  If the thought was that of a specific
healing for someone, then the thought  would go forth and heal.  Now, before you go and rush off
and start wishing for this and  that, let's look at a few more facts.  

You just can't sit down and start wishing.  You do that all the time.  There is a certain way  that
this must be done.  Next, you must build-up your powers of observation,  concentration,
memory, and visualization.  The meditation that you have been doing,  hopefully all along, is
important too.  In topic forty, you will learn how to create through  thought.  It may seem that
you are a long way from getting to topic forty, but please don't  jump the topics in between this
one and forty.  You will, first, have to develop those  powers of the mind, through the exercises
that follow shortly.  The exercises must be  practiced faithfully, and for as long as it takes to
master them.  Further, each topic that  follows, up to number forty, will further enhance your
mental abilities and prepare you for  topic forty.  Now, let's get to those exercises.  

Exercise #1, Observation.  There aren't too many who can at the end of the day recall  what they
did step-by-step.  Yet, this is part of your observation training.  In the evening,  sit down and
recall the day the best that you can.  At first, this may not be as easy as it  sounds.  Then, take
this one stage further, and at the end of the week, say on Saturday,  again sit down and recall
the entire week in as much detail as possible.  Visualize, or  picture, the people you met, things
that you did, and things said.  Another observation  exercise you can do is to enter a room
quickly and, for say thirty seconds, look around the  room and then shut your eyes and recall
as many objects as possible.  You can do this in  the outdoors, too.  For example, while walking
down the sidewalk, or in the park, observe  what's around you and then stop and close your eyes
and recall all the details of your  surroundings that you have just passed.  If you will study these
examples, then perhaps  you can go on to create more observation exercise for yourself.  

Exercise #2, Concentration.  To begin with, do some mental arithmetic.  On your mental 
blackboard, begin by adding a row of numbers.  Write down the numbers on a sheet of  paper
and then close your eyes and see those numbers on your board.  Then, add them  mentally, and
when you have the answer write it down and then do it on paper.  Next,  multiply some numbers
and, also, do some division.  At first, you will be able to use only  simple numbers, but as your
concentration develops, you will be able to do more and  more complicated problems.  Another
concentration exercise you might use is to  concentrate on NOT thinking.  That's right!  You are
going to get very quiet in your  Magician's Study, with the curtains drawn, and you are going to
picture your mental  blackboard and you are going to keep it blank.  You are going to cease
thinking of  anything.  Concentrate on doing this.  It is not easy, for thoughts will do their best
to creep  in, but you must concentrate and not permit them to do so.  Do this for about ten
minutes  to begin with, and then gradually lengthen the time per sitting.  
Exercise #3, Memory.   Begin by picking your favorite passage from a book or poet and 
selecting five or six lines from it. Then memorize them.  Constantly create new memory  games
that will exercise your power of memory.  Acquire a booklet that gives you some  material to
study, and provides you with a test that will see just how much you have been  able to retain of
the material. Make a list of ten people, places, or things and then recall  them forward and
backward.  Gradually increase the number of items on your list.

Exercise #4, Visualization.  A phrase that you might select to mean the same as the word 
visualization is, "to picture with the mind's eye".  You are going to create an image of  something
in your mind.  Begin this exercise by thinking of someone you know and then  picturing what
that person looks like.  Get this image in your mind's eye so real, that it  seems to be right there
in front of you.  An aid that you might use is to get a photograph of  the person and then study it
for a minute and then do your visualization.  Next, you might  try, while walking down the
sidewalk and coming towards someone, to study their face  carefully and after they have passed
you, recall their face in your mind's eye.  Don't just  use people as subjects.  If you can think of
objects, or animals, that will be great, too.  But  when you visualize these people, or whatever
you choose, see them in clear detail and  always in color.  These are the four exercises that will
set your feet definitely on the path  of acquiring mastery over your mind.  In all these exercises
do them no more then about  fifteen minutes each.  You should do them all, at least, once a day. 
You might want to  separate them, doing some exercises during the day and others when you are
at home at  night.  Continue to practice these exercises for the rest of your sojourn here on
Earth.  

Practice these with patience and determination and you will gain mental mastery.  You  will be
on your way to being able to have great success with creative visualization.  An  important part
of the Mental Realm involves the Silent Magician who you'll meet next.

33.  Your Silent Magician 

You have just come from looking at your Mental Body and knowing that it is your physical 
consciousness.  But actually, your Mental Body is much, much more.  Your Mental Body  also
contains that part of your consciousness which is called the Subconscious Mind.   How much of
your consciousness is composed of the Subconscious?   Would you believe,  almost all of it? 
That's right!  You actually use only a very small fraction of your total  mental capacity.  What
about geniuses, you ask?  They only use a part of a fraction more  then do the rest of us.  To get
some idea of how small your mental capacity is, in relation  to the whole, let's first imagine a
fifty-five gallon drum.  

It's empty right now, but if you were going to fill it with water, representing your physical 
consciousness, how much water would it take?  Well, believe it or not, it would take only  about
five gallons.  The rest of the space comprises your Subconscious Mind.  As you can  see, your
Subconscious is a mental giant.  Just imagine what would happen if you could  tap into this
great source of mental power.  You are going to learn to do this in just a little  while.  But first,
you must become more familiar with the Subconscious Mind and the role  it plays in your life.  

You could actually name the Subconscious Mind, your "Silent Witness".  For indeed, that  is
what your Subconscious does.  It witnesses all that you do.  It is able to remember all  that you
have ever done in this lifetime and what's more, it contains the memories from all  your lives
here on Earth and sojourns in the otherworlds.  Why can't you remember them  then? 

This is because there is an energy screen between yourself and the Subconscious.  This  screen is
there for several reasons. First, this screen prevents you from tampering with the 
Subconscious Mind.  For most people memories of past lives should remain off limits.  
Therefore, you have this screen which prevents you from directly learning what is stored  in
your Subconscious.  To know your past lives may seem, at first, important, but really it's  not. 
What if in a past life you were a murderer or a robber?  Could you handle this  information? 
Some say, that they would like to search into the Subconscious Mind and  know why they have
returned to this world and learn what it is they came here for.  But if  you find this out, and
concentrate so hard on accomplishing this one thing, that you might,  inadvertently, overlook
something else which will cause you to have to come back down  here.  Actually, knowing your
past lives, and why you came down here, is really  unnecessary.  What's really important is that
you live this life to your very best.  That  each, and every day, you do the very best that you can
and give life your very best effort.   If you do this, then when you reach the other side you can
say, you did your very best, and  that is all anyone can ask.  

Second, unlike your physical consciousness, your Subconscious hasn't the ability to 
discriminate between Truth and untruth. The Subconscious simply takes all information 
given to it by the physical consciousness and records it.  The energy screen allows you  time to
hash over a problem, discerning what's right and what's wrong, and when you  have come up
with the right answer, or what seems right to you, your Subconscious then  incorporates that
into its storage banks.  The screen prevents data from leaving your  conscious mind, too soon,
and entering the Subconscious. So, you know that your  Subconscious Mind is the storage
house for all that you have ever done.  You also know  that it is not able to discern between
Truth and untruth, but there is more.  It will store  whatever you know to be Truth.  From this
you can determine that your Subconscious is  unable to reason, that is, unable to form
conclusions or make judgments.  The  Subconscious is not logical.  Yet, your Subconscious
Mind plays a big role in your life.   The biggest role it plays is to function as a relay between you,
the physical  consciousness, and your Oversoul.  

Your Oversoul receives information on your progress down here on Earth from your 
Subconscious Mind and the Oversoul relays information and directives to your  Subconscious,
who then puts them into action in your life.  This is an important aspect  which I will expand
on a little later.  Your Subconscious Mind is also in link with all other  Subconscious Minds. 
Your Subconscious Mind is able to tap in with any other  Subconscious Mind, and they are able
to pool information.  So, if you were able to  communicate with your Subconscious Mind
directly, you would be able to find out from it  information about anything that you needed to
know.  Your Subconscious has direct links  with both your Oversoul and with all other
Subconscious Minds.  But communication with  your Subconscious Mind is not an easy thing
to do.  

You can see by all the things your Subconscious Mind is involved in, that it is a very busy 
entity.  Getting its attention is the task at hand.  What would you do, if you were trying to  get the
attention of your next-door neighbor who is very busy in their house and who has  never been
disturbed before?  You would go next-door, and knock, and call out their  name, until someone
answered.  You are going to use a similar procedure with your  Subconscious Mind.  First, before
you start knocking on your Subconscious Mind's door,  your going to do a little visualization.  

In your mind's eye, view a large room with storage files and computer data banks and a  large
control panel, and in charge of all this is your Subconscious, your Silent Witness,  and who you
will picture as your Silent Night Magician.  You'll envision her/him dressed  as you are dressed
during your rituals in full Night Magick regalia.  It is here, in this room,  on the Isle of your
Silent Magician located in the Mental Realm, that you will go to speak  with your Silent
Magician.  Before you can communicate with Her or Him, let's first look at  the language you
must communicate in.  
There is a special way that you must talk to your Silent Magician in order for Her/Him to 
understand you correctly.  You know S/he can not reason nor is S/he able to be logical.   S/he
can not discern between Truth or untruth.  So the Silent Magician takes everything  you say
very literal.  So when you talk to your Silent Magician, you must use the most  simple, direct,
and plain language.  You do not want to say anything which has a double  meaning.  For
example, if you want to find out where your lost ring is, and you ask  Her/Him if S/he knows if
the ring is in the sink drain, the Silent Magician will answer, Yes!   Yes, S/he does know if it is
there or not, but that doesn't mean it is there. Ask Her/Him a  direct question, "Is the ring in the
sink drain of the kitchen?"  Now that you have the  preliminaries over with, its time for you to
get down to the actual business of communion  with your Silent Magician.  

To begin with, go into your Magician's Study and lie down and relax.  Do some Night  Breathing
and get very comfortable.  Now, envision the control room in your mind, where  your Silent
Magician is located.  And once again, picture your Silent Magician at work.   Now call out
Her/His name.  What's Her/His name?   

You're going to have to give Her/Him a very personal name similar to the one you  selected as
your Night Name.  This is a name that only you will know.  You're not going to  tell anyone else
the name of your Silent Magician.  Now, picturing very strongly your  Magician at work, call
out Her/His new name.  A proper way of doing such would be to  say, "You who are my
Subconscious Mind and Silent Magician and Friend, I give you the  name of __________ ."
Say this at least three times.  Then go on to say to, "when I call  out your name you will please
listen to me.  I want you and me to be partners and friends  for this will benefit both of us. I
want you to help me in all that I do.  I want this in all  sincerity and honesty." Say this also
three times.  You must do this three times a day.   You must grow use to saying and doing this
and thinking of your Subconscious as a friend  and ally. Know that when you have the
attention of your Subconscious Mind, that you are  without limitation.  

The Silent Magician is all powerful and all knowing.  S/He can be a tremendous ally.  For  now,
this is all you should do.  Just get acquainted with your Silent Magician and gain  Her/His
trust.  You should always be truthful and straightforward with your Silent Friend.   You, in
your own right, are mentally strong and you are only a small fraction of your full  potential. 
Imagine what would be your mental ability and the power of your thoughts, if  you could
increase them eleven fold.  This can be, if you will tie in with your Silent  Magician.  Your ally
on Earth.  As you have seen, your Subconscious is unique.  Even  though S/he can not reason or
be logical, S/he can do all that you can do.  S/He can do all  you can do only eleven times
greater.  It is the seat of total memory.  By reaching  Her/Him, and convincing Her/Him that
you need Her/Him, S/he will release information to  you that you are unaware of, about
yourself.  S/he can correct wrongs with you such as,  habits that you would like to be rid of, and
can increase such things as your memory  retention if you will work with Her/Him.  You can
also go direct to your Oversoul by  gaining your Silent Magician's trust and aid.  

The Subconscious will be glad to go direct to your Oversoul for you if S/he truly sees the  need. 
You must convince Her/Him of your sincerity and trustworthiness.  You will be  cooperating
with your Silent Magician in the use of self-hypnosis, the pendulum, crystal,  psychometry,
and telepathy.  So work hard on reaching your Silent Magician and  developing the close
rapport needed in your work as a Night Magician.  Your first joint  undertaking, between you
and your Silent Friend, is the practice of self- hypnosis.   

34.  Hypnotism and Self 

In classical mythology, Hypnos was the god of sleep.  He was the brother of Thanatos and  the
son of Erebus and Nyx.  The word, hypnotism, is taken from the greek word,  "hypnoein", which
means, "to put to sleep".  So you can see that hypnotism must have  something to do with sleep,
right?  Actually, it doesn't have anything to do with sleep,  except that when a person is in a
hypnotic state of consciousness, s/he may appear to be  sleeping. What then is hypnosis? 

In the state of hypnosis, you are extremely vulnerable to suggestions.  For example, if you  are
told that when you put your hand in a vat of water and will feel a pleasant warmth,  then this
will be so.  Even if the water in the tub is very, very cold. That doesn't mean that  your hand
won't be cold, but as far as your physical consciousness is concerned, the  hand feels warmth
from the cold water.  How can this be?  You're going to examine that  very question in-depth and
go on to learn some good uses for hypnotism and also the  dangers of hypnotism.  Lastly, you
are going to learn how to induce self-hypnosis and the  reasons for doing so.  First though, let's
see how hypnosis works.  

To begin your investigation, you're going to examine the technique of a hypnotist at work.   For
in studying how a hypnotist works, you will be able to gain an insight into how  hypnosis
works.  The hypnotist first needs a subject and that is going to be you.  The  hypnotist will then
stand in front of you and s/he will suspend some shiny object and ask  you to concentrate on
the object.  As you continue to concentrate, the hypnotist will begin  the first of her/his
suggestions to you; you are starting to feel drowsy.  Next, s/he will tell  you that your eyelids are
starting to feel heavy.  You can see already that from just trying  to concentrate on the object
that you will start to feel eye fatigue.  And because your eyes  are starting to feel tired, you
already are beginning to trust the suggestions of the  hypnotist.  As the process continues, you
will start to fall into an altered state of  awareness.  When the hypnotist has you deeply relaxed,
s/he will continue with further  suggestions.  For example, s/he will then ask you to raise your
right arm straight out in  front of you.  Then s/he will tell you that your arm is starting to feel
very heavy and that  you can hardly hold it up. Well, it's obvious that the hypnotist is
requesting you to do  things and then makes suggestions which corresponds with what you are
feeling.  But in  all of this, there is a very real purpose, and that is for you to believe in the
hypnotist.  You  are starting to trust the hypnotist and believe that whatever s/he tells you is
going to  occur.  But actually, there is much more to it then just your outer conscious belief in
the  hypnotist.  

Here, you rejoin your new friend, the Silent Magician, for the explanation.  What the  hypnotist
has been doing is breaching the energy screen that is between you and your  Silent Friend.  The
hypnotist has actually been working on the Subconscious Mind with  her/his suggestions and
gaining Her/His trust.  When the hypnotist has convinced the  Silent Magician that whatever
s/he says is going to happen, then you are truly hypnotised.   You will remember from the last
topic, that your Subconscious is unable to discern  between the Truth and untruth.  They are not
able to reason.  So as you, the physical  consciousness, trusted the hypnotist and began to
believe in her/him, so the  Subconscious Mind will too.  The hypnotist, in convincing you with
her/his simple  suggestions has caused you to lower the energy screen between you and your 
Subconscious.  Once this screen was lowered, the hypnotist is directly working with your 
Subconscious Mind.  
All that s/he now tells you, your Silent Magician will believe and comply with.  If s/he tells 
you when you look at an object, that you will not be able to see it, then to your physical 
consciousness, the object will not be there.  This is hypnosis.   Hypnosis can be a real benefit to
humankind, but it can also be a real danger.  There  have been some valuable uses for hypnosis
in today's society.  Medically they have used  hypnosis in some cases as a substitute for
anesthetic.  Thereby eliminating the dangers  of having to anesthetize someone.  The police
have used it to hypnotize a crime victim, or  witness, in order to draw out of the Subconscious
Mind greater details of a crime, and so,  possibly leading to the capture of the criminals.  These
are some very positive uses for  hypnosis.  
Hypnosis can be a very dangerous subject.  You should under no circumstances allow  yourself
to be placed under hypnosis by someone you do not fully trust.  Nor should you  undergo
hypnosis for fun and games.  Hypnosis is a serious business.  When you  undergo hypnosis, you
surrender your Subconscious Mind, out of the Hands of your  Oversoul, and into the hands of
the hypnotist. As you can see, this can lead to some  serious consequences for you, if you are in
the wrong hands.  Let your imagination  conjure up the harm that can be done to you by the
hypnotist.  So let this be warning  enough, DO NOT BE HYPNOTIZED, unless you are absolutely
sure of the hypnotist and  why you are being hypnotized.  How can you get around the
hypnotist? 

You can circumvent her/him by using self-hypnosis.  You are going to be the hypnotist.   For
sure, I can think of no better hypnotist then you, once you are properly trained.  There  are
many reasons why you might want to use self-hypnosis.  If you have ever wanted to  stop
smoking; to improve your memory; to stop a bad habit; to develop particular traits  within
yourself, for example, patience and calmness; then you will want to try self-  hypnosis.  For
some, a big reason would be to lose weight.  The possibilities are endless.   When you tell your
Silent Magician, in self-hypnosis, what you want, then you will see it  occur in yourself.  But be
sure, if you are trying to give up something, that you truly want  to give it up.  Otherwise you
won't be able to do it.  As you begin to learn the techniques  for self-hypnosis, you should be in
reasonably good health.  If you are in good health,  then let's begin.  
You will practice this in your Magician's Study insuring that the room is free from  intrusion
by others and without drafts.  The room should be reasonably dark.  Once all  your room
preparations have been made, then you should lay down on something  comfortable.  Now you
are going to practice the complete body relaxation that you  practiced in preparation for Night
Projection.  If you go through the same motions that you  did in that topic, then you will have
achieved the proper state of relaxation.  To quickly  recount what you did; you began thinking
of your toes and erasing all tension in them.   Then you went up the leg and did this for both
legs.  You worked on every part of your  body achieving the fullest relaxation possible.  This is
what you want here.  Now, practice  some Night Breathing and deepen the relaxation.  While you
are breathing, just let your  thoughts float on your breath.  The key is to relax deeply.  Now to
contact your Silent  Magician.  

Pull your thoughts together and concentrate your gaze upon a point somewhere on the  ceiling
above you.  This point should be at such an angle that it causes slight eye strain.   Now, as you
continue to stare, you will begin to feel eye strain.  When you can feel this,  you should then tell
yourself, aloud, that when you count beginning from ten and reach  one, you are going to close
your eyes and be unable to open them.  So let's do it.  

"I am going to count from ten to one and when I reach one my eyes will close because  they have
become very tired.  Ten, my eyes are starting to feel tired; nine, my eyes are  becoming much
more tired and I am beginning to feel like closing them; eight, my eyes  are starting to become
very tired; seven-six, my eyelids are becoming very heavy; five-four, my eyes are so tired that I
have to close them; three, I can no longer keep my eyes  open and feel a real need to close them;
two, my eyes are so tired they will no longer stay  open; one, my eyes have shut."  

Your eyes should shut automatically, even if your eyes should not close do not worry.  Go  ahead
and close them anyway for what you are doing is setting up an automatic reaction,  within
yourself, when you do this.  Now that you have your eyes closed, let's continue with  self-
hypnosis.  

You are going to visualize your Silent Magician and you are going to say outloud the  following:

"I am going to count from ten to one and when I reach one I'm going to be in a deep state  of self-
hypnosis.  I'm going to be alert and fully conscious and my Friend is going to  respond to all I
say to her/him and comply with my desires.  Ten, I am becoming very  relaxed and my body is
starting to feel very heavy; nine, my body is feeling heavy and my  spirit is lightly floating
within my body; eight-seven, I am becoming deeply relaxed and  slowly entering into trance;
six-five, I am now in trance yet alert and fully conscious; four-three, I am going deeper and
deeper into trance; two, I am reaching the deepest state of  trance every before achieved; one, I
am completely in trance yet fully alert and conscious.   State name of your Silent Magician
please listen to me and do what I ask for."  

Now is the time to make known to your Silent Friend all that you want her/him to do.  Let's 
give Her/Him, though, only one thing per session.  You are going to practice the entire 
technique, as outlined previously, for the first few times, until you can do it correctly and 
easily.  Then you will condense the relaxation and self-hypnosis state into one happening.  

You are going to say to yourself that when you count to one, you are going to achieve a  complete
state of relaxation and self-hypnosis.  That you are going to be fully alert and  know what's
going on and that you are going to be able to direct your Silent Witness to do  as you ask.  The
relaxation and self-hypnosis state should come easily, for it should now  have become an
automatic reaction.  Do not have any fear of coming out of this state of  self-hypnosis for it will
happen automatically. Through self-hypnosis you can correct faults  within yourself, or
implant qualities that you would like to acquire.  Through regular  practice you can achieve
this.  This is serious business and should be approached as  such.  Self-hypnosis will achieve
for you all that you desire, and you know that you're in  safe hands, your own!  Your Silent
Magician will also be your partner and friend in your  use of the Night Magician's Pendulum.   

35.  A Night Magician's Pendulum 

On a dark green hill, encircled by gardens of flowers, immense old trees, fountains, and  set
against a starlit night sky we find the cave entrance to the cavern home of the Night  Magician. 
A home dedicated to the ancient practice and knowledge of Night Magick.  A  home that is as
ageless as the stars that it is dedicated to.  As we enter this beautiful  home, through its ancient
portal, we can see into the Magician's Study and find the  Ancient One, busy in observation of
the stars through a cavern window.  We continue to  enter, very quietly so as not to disturb the
Old One, when suddenly we are startled by the  resounding chimes of a huge grandfather clock,
in its act of proclaiming the hour of the  night.  The most striking thing about the clock is its
beautiful, ornate brass pendulum.   The pendulum swings side-to-side ticking away the hours. 
We all know that the pendulum  is set so that time is measured out with the greatest of accuracy. 
But the pendulum is not  just for telling time.  The pendulum is also a valuable tool for the
Night Magician.  So let's  leave the Old One and move to your Magician's Study to take up the
study of the Night  Magician's Pendulum.  

Your pendulum is not going to be as ornate and beautiful as the one you just observed at  the
Magician's home, but it is based upon the same principle.  The pendulum is made up  of a long
arm with a weight suspended on the end.  The pendulum you will use is simple  to make.  You
will want to construct at least two pendulums.  

One will require a string at least forty-eight inches long, and the other about twelve inches 
long.  A strong sewing thread will serve very well as the material from which to make the 
string. The weight you use can be made of a variety of things.  The weight can be made of  a
round ball, about one inch in diameter, and constructed of wood, plastic, glass, or a  neutral
metal.  You should have pendulums on hand made up of a variety of the materials  just listed. 
You can also use a simple ring as a weight.  Another very simple weight you  can construct will
require an unused pencil and sewing needle.  Put the point of the  needle through the top of the
eraser, so that the needle will remain attached to the pencil.   Then, put the thread through the
eye of the needle and tie it off, and so, you have the  complete pendulum.  Once you have made,
or acquired, your pendulums, what are you  going to use them for? 

Your pendulum will answer questions that range across the entire spectrum of your 
imagination.  Have you lost a ring and want to find it?  You could find missing people or a  lost
pet.  The pendulum can answer questions you have concerning most any topic that  you wish to
pursue.  But how can it do this?  

For part of the answer you must look to your old friend, the Silent Magician.  The  pendulum is
an instrument, used by the Silent Magician, to give you the answers to the  questions that you
put to Her/Him.  In review, you will remember that your Silent Friend is  very brilliant and
there is very little that s/he does not know, or cannot find out, since They  are in direct contact
with all other Silent Magicians.  You will remember that your entire  body has an electrical
field which completely surrounds it.  When you have the pendulum  suspended from your hand
and ask your Magician a question, s/he alters the electrical  field of your body.  That field also
surrounds the pendulum and causes it to move.  The  pendulum's movement has been set in a
certain pattern to indicate Yes or No.  The Silent  Magician is not the only one who can alter the
movement of the pendulum.  Any resident  of the higher realms can also alter your electrical
field, and so the movement of the  pendulum, if they know how.  As a rule, the entity working
with you, and through the  pendulum, requires some time before they really can manipulate the
pendulum well.  So  not only can you receive information from your Silent Magician but also
your Guides and  Teacher.  Before studying the mechanics of how to use the pendulum, you must
prepare  yourself to use the pendulum.  

The how-to of self-preparation is relatively simple to state, but often hard to achieve.  You 
begin by being sure your hands and body are clean, otherwise this will interfere with your  body
electricity.  You must have a calm and receptive mind.  Your mind must be in a  relaxed state
and without nervous tension and fears. Your mind must be prepared to  concentrate on only
one thing, and that is what you are trying to answer.  Your mental  attitude must be a serious
one when you approach this lore.  If you have achieved this  self-preparation in mind and body,
then you're ready to begin learning how to use your  Magician's Pendulum.  

First, you will prepare your Magician's Study for the use of the pendulum.  Be sure the  room
will be free from interruptions. Then erect a table to work on that is made up of only  a hard top
surface and four legs.  Nothing should be under the table for this will interfere  with the
reception of the proper answer.  In all cases, you will want to have blank, clean,  unused, white
sheets of paper.  

The standard, eleven by eight white typing paper will be fine. This is the paper over which  you
are going to suspend your pendulum.  On the paper, you are going to draw in the  center a large
plus sign(+).  At the top and bottom of the paper, you are going to write the  word, YES.  On the
right and left sides of the paper, you are going to write the word, NO.   You will use a new sheet
marked in this way for each set of questions asked pertaining to  a certain area of
examination.  Please be sure and use a fresh sheet for each set of  questions asked, for when
questions are asked, the paper becomes saturated with the  impressions from those questions,
and these impressions will interfere with any other set  of questions asked.  To begin, you must
formulate the questions you are going to ask.  

For example, where is my lost gold ring?  The question must be simple, clear, concise,  and
unambiguous.  Then you must invoke the Night Pillar around yourself and your  Magician's
Study or the place you're working in.  If you don't do this, then any force may  use the pendulum
and cause misleading answers.  After this, you'll take the short stringed  pendulum, between
your hands, and concentrate on the Night Force around you.  Then  ask the question three
times.  Then, take the string of the pendulum and wrap it around  the first or second finger of
the right hand, if you are right handed; left hand if you are left  handed, such that when you rest
your elbow on the table, the weight of the pendulum is  about an inch above the paper and
suspended over the plus sign. Then, begin asking if  the ring is in the kitchen sink, and so on.
You can tell when the pendulum is answering  you, because it will swing with purpose.  Be sure
and wait between each question, till the  pendulum answers.  If the pendulum makes a circling
motion, this indicates uncertainty.   Either the force guiding the pendulum doesn't know, the
question is ambiguous, or they  refuse to answer the question.  Try asking the question in a
more precise and clear way,  and if there is still uncertainty, go on to another question.  If you
ask a question that  involves a geographical answer, then you will need a map.  If the search
area involves a  large area, use a map of small scale.  This is a map which covers a large area of
land on  a small amount of map area.  Then, when you have found a more precise location, use a 
larger scale map to get a pinpoint location.  In order for you to use the map, place it on  the left
side, and the plus marked paper on the right.  Take the pendulum over the map  area and ask it
to reveal the location of what you're looking for.  Then hold the pendulum  over the white sheet
of paper as before, and as you ask your question, you'll move your  left forefinger slowly over
the map area.  The pendulum will swing in the positive direction  when you have reached the
right area.  This completes the instruction on the use of the  pendulum, indoors.  It takes
practice to gain mastery over the use of the pendulum.  You  must be sure and use simple
language and concentrate strongly on the question you want  answered.  Perhaps you've seen, or
even used, some form of dowsing rod to locate water.  

The dowsing rod works on the very same principles as the pendulum.  For uniformity, and 
familiarity, you are going to use the pendulum outdoors in locating not only water, if that  is
what you want, but anything else you desire.  For this method, you will now need your  longer
stringed pendulum.  To start with, you must prepare the pendulum for your use.   Let's say you
want to find gold.  Then you will need to place in, or on the weight of the  pendulum, a sample of
gold.  This can be as small as a flake, but it must be pure gold.   Further, you must put under your
feet another piece of gold.  The gold must be pure, so  for example, if you use your wedding ring
be sure it is solid, pure gold.  Then, with your  pendulum in the correct hand, you will again ask
your Silent Magician or Guides to find  gold for you.  Then, loosely holding the string in the
proper hand, slowly lower the weight  towards the ground until it swings in a definite circular
motion. You will need to  experiment with the proper length of string, until you get just the
right length which gives  you the best circular motion.  At this point, you should mark the
string with a knot, and  color code it, and record it for future reference. You can apply this same
technique to  anything that you want to find.  You should take the time to prepare your
pendulum for all  the things that you will want to find.  In all that you do with the Night
Magician's  Pendulum, you should remember certain key things in its proper use.  

You should remember that in talking with your Silent Friend, you want to use the simplest  and
most direct language, and to repeat it at least three times.  You should always  remind your
Friend that you need Her/Him, because what you ask Her/Him to do for you,  S/he does for
Her/Himself, too; that you are One in Thought and Purpose.  So be sure,  that whatever you
decide to do, that it is in agreement with your inner beliefs.  If you try to  use it for something
you know to be wrong, then your Silent Friend will stop working with  you and that will be the
end of your growth. At the end of each set of questions, be sure  and thank your Silent Magician
for the aid that S/he has provided.  Appreciation and  respect, go a long way in your successful
use of the Night Magician's Pendulum.   Remember, that the pendulum is for your use alone. 
Never allow anyone else to use or  touch your personal pendulum.  You can use the pendulum to
help others find answers to  their questions but they should never use your pendulum to do so,
you will use it for them.   Most of all, you should go into this practice with the most serious of
attitudes towards it.  Your frame of mind can mean the difference between success and failure. 
Everything you  do to get closer with your Silent Magician, Guides, and Teacher, and to make
them your  unfailing allies in all that you do, will bring mastery into your life here, and
hereafter.  The  pendulum is the first of your new Magician's Tools to be acquired in Air
Magick, and now  you are to acquire your second tool, the Night Magician's Crystal Globe.   
36.  A Night Magician's Crystal Globe 

You will remember that when you were in the Night Magician's cave last, you found the  Old One
busily engaged in the observation of the stars.  Let's return to the Magician's  cavern home and
see if the Ancient One has begun some new practice from which you  can observe and learn.  

As you quietly enter the home, you have the feeling that you must go to the study.  As you  move
into the study, you find the Ancient One sitting on the floor in an apparent state of  deep
meditation.  You find that the room is very dark and that it is taking your eyes some  time to
adjust to the darkness.  As you continue to observe the Magician, you suddenly  become aware
that more then just meditation is taking place.  You can now see that the  Wise One is gazing
into a sphere of apparent nothingness.  To your vision, there appears  to be a hole of darkness
into which the Magician seems to be gazing.  You move closer to  get a better view of what this
phenomena is.  You can now see that this sphere of  emptiness is composed of what appears to
be a clear substance. Suddenly, it dawns upon  you that you are observing the Magician in the
act of Crystal Gazing.  Now you know this  is what you are going to learn to do.  Let's begin your
instruction then with an in-depth  examination of the Crystal the Ancient One was using.  

The Crystal is spherical in shape and was so clear that there appeared to be nothing there  in
the darkness.  Due to the clarity of the Crystal Globe, no reflection of light could be  observed to
give it depth.  The Crystal Globe, that the Magician is using, is without flaw.  If  there were flaws
in the Crystal then what light was available would cast reflections off  these flaws and disturb
the Magician's gazing.  When the Magician gazes into the Crystal  Globe it is like looking into a
deep globe of nothingness.  If you were to visit a store in  order to purchase a Crystal Globe or
even one of glass, you would find that a perfectly  flawless one is very expensive.  So for your
purposes, you are going to use a crystal  hollow globe with a hole in the top.  

I indicated you should use crystal but glass will also do.  The hollow globe should be as  round as
possible.  The surface of the globe should be without flaws or markings.  The  globe should be
about six inches in diameter.  A similar globe is often sold as a fish bowl.   It should be able to
sit on a flat surface.  If you have now purchased this Crystal Globe,  then let's go on to prepare
the gazing area.  

Arrange your Magician's Study so that you can be seated comfortably on the floor, and in  front
of you, you should have your small Night Altar of about eighteen inches in height.   There
should be no strain on the back or shoulder muscles.  If there is then adjust the  height of the
table.  It is not absolutely necessary that you sit on the floor, for you can sit  in a chair as long
as you can see directly into the globe and it is within easy reach.  Cover  the table with a dark
blue or black cloth. You must insure that almost all light has been  eliminated from the room.  

Be sure you are clean and have washed your hands before ever touching the globe.  You  must
clean the globe, without soap, before filling it with water.  Clean the globe under  running water
and hold the globe with a cloth and dry it before filling it.  Never allow  direct light to fall on the
globe.  Keep the globe in a safe place and wrapped in a dark  cloth.  Never allow the curious to
touch the globe.  After you have placed the globe on the  table then fill it with water.  Fill it all
the way to the rim so that the globe appears to be  solid.  This takes care of your study
preparation but you mustn't forget self-preparation.  

Be sure you are in good health.  Before you begin this exercise, you must be in a good  mental
state.  Your mind should be calm and as free from worry as possible.  Be sure that  you have been
eating sensibly and don't eat a big meal just before commencing to use  the globe.  Now you are
ready to begin using the Crystal Globe.  

Be seated comfortably and place the Night Pillar around you.  You must practice Night 
Breathing for a few minutes in order to become more relaxed.  Then place your hands on  the
bottom sides of the globe.  Your hands should be in direct contact with the glass.   Gaze lightly
upon the globe.  Do not begin with a fixed and concentrated gaze.  Look at a  point somewhere
inside the globe and relax.  Do not try to see anything.  As you continue  to gaze, you will see the
globe start to cloud up with a whitish appearance.  This is  excellent and exactly what you want. 
You should continue to gaze, and the cloudiness  will disappear, and you will begin to see.  You
may even feel a slight falling sensation so  don't be startled, or you will have to try another
evening, which by the way is the best time  to practice this.  
There are three types of seeing that may occur.  

You may actually see as if you were watching television.  That is, you may see pictures  and
events occurring.  Next, you may only see symbols.  These are pictures which  represent events
or happenings.  Finally, you may only receive impressions.  You may  only receive feelings and
thoughts as to what is trying to be communicated to you.   Whatever you receive, through the use
of the Crystal Globe is a true achievement.  You  are successful, whether you see pictures,
symbols, or impressions.  In the beginning, you  may encounter some difficulty in achieving
any results.  

You should only begin by gazing for about fifteen minutes at the most.  By the end of the  week,
you should have extended that time to about thirty minutes.  This is all that is  recommended
when you are first beginning.  In the beginning, you will see only things  that pertain to you
alone.  As you begin to see more clearly and easily, you should begin  to direct the Crystal in
what you want to see.  As you first touch the globe and relax,  concentrate a mental thought at
the Crystal and tell it what it is you want to see.   Eventually, you will gain control over the
Crystal and be able to direct it at whatever it is  you are interested in knowing.  You can also use
the Crystal Globe to give others a  reading.  

To do this, you will go through the very same setup procedures. Then before you actually  touch
the globe, direct the individual who desires the reading, to touch the globe and  concentrate on
what s/he wants to know about.  You should also warn them, in advance,  not to say anything
that will disturb you while you are gazing and giving her/him their  reading.  Then, you will
take over control of the Crystal and gaze upon it as you would for  yourself, and give what you
see.  

In all cases, when you are through using the Crystal Globe, you will again rinse the globe  and
dry it off before putting it away. 
The Crystal Globe works by focusing and concentrating the clairvoyant energies from your 
Night Eye Center.  The Crystal Globe is an extension of your Night Eye.  The globe, as  with your
own personal clairvoyance, is able to do many things.  

The globe can help you look into the past, present, and future. It can help you look into  any
matter which concerns you and to see all sides of the matter under discernment.  You  can go
anywhere at anytime and see all that you wish to see.  

You must know that you are going to succeed each time you use the Crystal.  Even if you  don't
succeed, you must not become discouraged.  Every attempt at using the Crystal  Globe leads you
one step closer to success.  You should have the attitude of a very  personal commitment to the
Crystal Globe.  Always treat it with the utmost respect.  The  entire business of crystal gazing is
very serious business and should be treated as such if  you are going to succeed at it.  Your next
subject is also a form of seeing.  Only instead of  using the eyes to see with, you are going to use
your hands.  

37.  Psychometry 

Psychometry is the development of your clairaudient faculties in relation to your sense of 
touch.  By psychometry, you are going to be able to pickup an object and know its origin  and
history. If the object ever belonged to someone, then you will receive the thoughts  and feelings
of that individual.  Psychometry is related to your clairaudient faculties.  Let's  see how? 

As you will recall, clairaudience is related to your fifth Night Center which is located at the 
throat level.  As your Night Center begins to grow and develop, you develop the sense, in  part, of
being able to perceive sound from the Night Realm.  You can hear in a sense, the  voice of the
Night Spirit and even the so called "Music of the Night Spheres".  All of this is  the attunement
to, and perception of, higher vibration.  An extension of your clairaudient  ability is the
perception of an object's vibration through touch.  Your left hand, if you are  right handed, is
the sensitive hand to magickal vibration.  All things, of all types of nature,  have a personal
vibration.  That vibration is composed of the entire history and nature  peculiar to that object. 
Your clairaudient faculty is able to attune to that vibration and  translate it into pictures,
sounds, and/or feelings that you can perceive.  

Psychometry has many practical applications.  You can see actual history taking place by 
using objects that are related to a particular historical event.  But remember, you will see 
history as it related to that particular object and its part in that history.  You can view the 
origin of the planet through very ancient objects.  In a more practical application, you  could
pickup a book and get the basic feeling of that book and what it is about, and then  decide if you
are going to like reading it or not.  You can learn about the inner nature of  individuals of
interest to you by examining an object which belongs to them. For example,  this could help you
understand your employer better; why s/he expects certain things from  you, her/his reasoning
behind certain acts, and overall, help you to improve your working  relationship with
her/him.  The possibilities are as endless as your imagination is fertile.   How do you go about
developing your clairaudient faculties in relation to psychometry?  

To begin, let's look at the area of self-preparation.  You are going to see a trend  developing
through self-preparation.  As in the use of the Night Magician's Pendulum and  Crystal Globe,
you again need a clean body and hands, and a sound and tranquil state of  mind.  In review, I
stated in topic thirty-two, "Power of Thought", that in all the exercises  used to strengthen and
train the mind, meditation was very important.  Hopefully, you can  see the reason for this and
have been practicing it.  Meditation builds for you a tranquil  mind.  If you have not been doing
it, regularly, then get to it without fail.  If you expect to  achieve anything in the Night Magick,
it must be done through a strong and tranquil mind.   So much for self-preparation, now on to
the mechanics of psychometry.  

Hopefully, you have someone who is very sympathetic towards your magick and wishes to  see
you succeed in it.  If so, get this person to pickup a smooth stone, and take that stone  and wash
it thoroughly, along with their hands.  Then holding the stone in her/his left  hand, allowing it
to rest in their open palm, ask them to concentrate on a single thought.   This thought should be
simple.  For example, thinking of the color red.  Have them  concentrate for several minutes on
this thought.  Then, s/he should wrap the stone in a  clean cloth and give it to you.  Then take
the stone with you and retire to your Magician's  Study.  
Now lie down, relax, place the Night Pillar around you, do some Night Breathing, and  place the
stone in your clean, left hand. Let the stone rest in the palm of your open hand.   Now you must
allow your mind to be without thought and tranquil.  Do not try to  concentrate on the stone. 
Just relax and allow your mind to drift on nothingness.  You  may or may not feel a tingling in
the palm of your hand.  What you should receive is a  feeling or impression, in this case, the
color red.  If not, then try moving the stone to your  left temple and again relax.  If you do not
receive an impression do not be discouraged.  It  takes practice and perseverance to succeed.  If
you do not have someone who can help  you, then you can try something else.  The next time you
receive a letter or bill, before  you open it, retire to your room and go through the same
procedures as just outlined  above with the stone.  As you receive the impressions, record them
and then open the bill  or letter and see if you're right.  Remember, that many people will touch
the letter or bill  before it gets to you, and so their impressions will also be on it.  This is
psychometry.  

You will receive impressions, feelings, or pictures from objects you touch.  As your 
clairaudient faculties develop through practice, you will be able to see easier and much  more
extensively into the depths of an object's history.  Practice and perseverance is the  key to
mastery.  Not only in psychometry, but in all things as they relate to a Night  Magician's life. 
Your next subject is something which has long been talked about, and  yet not understood.  You
are going to learn to bridge the gap between your mind and  another.  

38.  Telepathy 

We have all heard the old phrase, "you must be reading my mind". The other person  seemed to
know your thoughts in some way.  This ability to know another's thoughts is  telepathy. 
Telepathy is the ability to be able to transmit and/or receive thoughts from one  person to
another.  You are going to learn how to do this and some of the possible uses,  but first, you
should learn how telepathy works.  

In order to understand how telepathy works, you need to go back and re-examine the  workings
of the brain.  The brain is an extraordinarily complex organ, and its physical  workings are
little understood.  What is known about it, and the key to understanding how  telepathy works,
is that in the brain's functioning it generates electricity.  This electricity is  very fine and can
be measured upon an electroencephalograph (EEG). Your brain emits  high frequency waves
upon which thought is carried.  Your brain operates upon a certain  frequency which is unique
for each individual.  When you can attune yourself to that  frequency generated by the brain's
electrical functioning then you can intercept and  comprehend another's thought waves.  As a
radio can receive radio waves when tuned to  the proper frequency, so can your brain receive
thought waves from another person when  properly attuned to them.  Occasionally, a person is
telepathic to another, unknowingly,  because each is very close in frequency to the other.  They
seem to be able to know what  the other is thinking constantly, and this is because of the close
harmony between their  personal frequencies.  Couples who have been married for sometime
grow close in  harmony and each becomes attuned to the other's thoughts.   You are not limited,
though,  to accidental telepathic reception.  

You can learn to consciously tune in to anyone you desire. Thought wave attunement is 
achieved through the opening of your crown Night Center.  Not only are you able to tune  into
other peoples' thoughts, but you are able to begin receiving direct communication  with your
Oversoul.  To begin this awakening of your Crown Center, you must have begun  to reach some
mastery over the mental exercise in topic thirty-two.  You must be  achieving a strong and
tranquil mind.  If you are to practice telepathy, you are going to  need someone who you can
send thoughts to, and who will, in turn, transmit to you.  If you  have such a person, then at a
certain designated time each of you is going to retire to  your Magician's Study, dim the lights,
and try to eliminate all possible distractions.  

One of you will have agreed, in advance, to be the transmitter and the other the receiver.  
People generate thoughts constantly, but they do this in such a scattered manner that the 
thought goes in all direction and carries little effect.  You, though, are going to  concentrate and
direct your thought specifically at the receiver.  As the transmitter, you  will have prepared, in
advance, a simple message or symbol to transmit.  So lie down and  become very relaxed.  You
must place the Night Pillar around you and practice Night  Breathing for a few minutes.  You
should have in your hand a picture of the person you  are going to transmit to.  Spend a few
moments thinking of this person and all the things  that bring you both together.  Then for
about five to ten minutes, you will transmit the  message.  This completes the portion for the
transmitter.  

As the receiver, you also will lie or sit down and become very relaxed.  Place the Night  Pillar
into action and practice Night Breathing for a few moments.  You will need a picture  of your
transmitter and will be thinking of those things that draw you together in harmony.   The you
will allow your mind to become still and without thought.  Just let go for about five  to ten
minutes and receive.  Sound easy? 

It will become so if you practice and do not become easily discouraged.  After you have 
completed this exercise, you will certainly want to call each other and check the results.   Don't
become upset, though, if it did not work.  Be positive, know it works, and in a short  time, you
will be able to do it, not only with your friend, but with anyone you meet.  The  uses for
telepathy are numberless and important.  

It would be great if you could transact business with another and know whether you were 
getting a good deal or not.  You would always be able to stay in touch with your friends  and
know if there are ever any problems.  If you had a friend who was ever in trouble or  danger,
they could beam a thought to you, for help, and you could go to them.  The  possible uses for
telepathy are endless.  Make the most of them.  As you continue to  develop your telepathic
abilities, and thus your seventh Night Center, the closer you will  become to your Oversoul.  

You have learned to use your mind for communication with other minds.  Next, you will  learn
to use your mind to travel in the Mental Realm.   

39.  Mental Projection 

You will recall, in Night Projection, you traveled in the Astral Realm in your Astral Body.   So
you can conclude, in Mental Projection, you will travel in the Mental Realm in your  Mental
Body.  You can look upon Mental Projection as the "flight of the mind".  It is with  your mind
that you will see and visit places, and find a universe open to your mental  explorations.  So
let's begin this topic with a short flight, and view one of the many places  that are open before
you.  

Ten, nine, eight, seven, six, five, four, three, two, one...  and you have lift-off.  You begin to 
climb through the sky, leaving the Earth far, far behind, and enter the darkness of deep  space.
You continue to travel at the speed of thought passing by planets and stars in the  twinkle of an
eye.  In moments, you find yourself approaching the first planet in your  journey.  The planet's
side you approach is enveloped in the darkness of night. As you  approach it closer, you see,
outlined in the light of a setting sun, a vast beach and cliffs  upon which a great ocean touches,
and whose waves gently caress it.  Set in the side of  the cliffs is a great door which you know
leads to a vast city below the surface.  You,  mentally, beam a message asking to enter, where
upon the great door opens and you find  yourself moving rapidly through a long, lighted tunnel. 
Inside, you find a great city  shrouded in the twilight of an artificial night. There are beautiful
fountains and statues  inside and buildings resembling those of Ancient Greece.  By some
unknown force, you  are now led away from this city beneath the surface and find yourself
leaving the planet  far behind, and once again, traveling through space.  You soon approach
your next  destination, which is a planet that, at first, appears similar to the one you just left. 
As you  grow closer, though, you see a culture much different then the last one.  Here, the culture 
is very mechanized, and the citizenry live upon the surface.  The dwellings are very rustic  and
blend naturally with the bareness of the planet.  You continue to watch with  fascination at the
unique machinery and lifestyle of the people.  You find, though, that you  are starting to grow
weary and feel a need to return to your origin.  So you return to your  body which you left far
behind on the planet Earth.  You think of your body, and its place  on Earth, and the sensation
of rapid movement, of flight, is upon you again.  Pinpoints of  light and matter, again, whisk
past you with incredible speed.  Then, you feel the slowing  in movement, and the heaviness of
your body, and ...Ten, nine, eight, seven, six, five, four,  three, two, one.., you have arrived.  So
ends your short flight of the mind through time and  space.  Were you really there?  Did you see
the planets, buildings, and people? 

The answer is a definite, Yes!  There is no place or time period that you cannot visit in  Mind. 
You can visit anyplace on your planet or see anyone.  You can travel back into  time or go
forward into the realm of possibilities.  As you have seen, you can travel to any  planet, of any
star system, of any galaxy.  You can even travel into the various planes of  the Magickal Realm.
The only restraints to your traveling is your own magickal  development.  

Your own magickal development is the only limiting factor as to where you can travel.   This
applies to Night, as well as Mental Projection.  You are allowed to see and visit  those things
which have an equal or lower vibration to your own.  For example, each  planet, in the
universe, has a unique magickal vibration.  In order for you to see and visit a  planet, your own
vibration must be equal or higher to it.  Otherwise, you will be prevented  from going there. 
Similarly, for you to visit a magickal level or plane, you must have an  equal or higher
vibration in relation to it.  Of course, the solution to unlimited travel is a  personal magickal
vibration that allows you to go anywhere.  Although there will always  be magickal plateaus
that you must strive for, you can develop magickally so that you are  relatively unrestricted in
your magickal travels.  How do you develop magickally? 

The answer has been before you all along.  You must follow the instruction outlined in  this
book.  If you follow these instructions, live by the Will of your Oversoul within you,  then your
magickal growth will be both rapid and unending.  Being Magickal is not being  able to read
minds or see in the Night Magician's Crystal Globe, but is based on living as  the Oversoul on
Earth.  Telepathy, crystal gazing, and all that you are studying, is  developing within you the
necessary physical, emotional, mental, and magickal discipline  that will aid you in living as
the Oversoul on Earth.  This, brings true magickal growth that  will be with you forever and
ever.  

To practice Mental Projection, you must be physically fit and mentally sound.  Your mind 
must be in a state of peace and relaxation.  Your mind must be free of tension and  worries and
your body should be in good health, especially your heart.  You do not have  to wait for truly
advance magickal growth in order to start traveling mentally.  The only  thing, as said before,
is that your magickal development will limit those places that you  can visit.  As you continue
to travel and grow magickally so will the places that you can  visit grow in clarity, beauty, and
magick.  The "how-to" of Mental Projection is not that  difficult. 
You must enter your Magician's Study and extinguish all light in the room.  The room  should
be in almost total darkness.  Then, you should be seated or lying down in a very  comfortable
and relaxed manner.  You must place the Magician's Night Pillar around  yourself and begin
Night Breathing.  You must achieve a very relaxed and calm state of  body and mind.  Once you
have reached this state, you are ready to take flight with your  mind. In Mental Projection,
unlike Night Projection, you are not going to project a body in  which your consciousness is
going to travel. In Mental Projection, only your  consciousness is going to be projected forth. 
Remember, your Mental Body is your  consciousness.  In Night Projection, you projected forth
your Astral Body from your  physical body, and in that Astral Body you placed your
consciousness.  In Mental  Projection, all visual and emotional sensation will center around
the forehead of your  physical body.  It is from here, that you will project your formless Mental
energies or  consciousness.  

To start with, you must visualize in your mind the place, person, and/or thing you wish to 
visit.  Once you have in mind where you want to travel to, then you should imagine your  mind
doing the traveling and actually going there.  See your formless Mental energies  going forth to
discover and see in the Mental Realm. You will feel your consciousness  starting to travel forth
into the Mental Realm.  You will have visual impressions of your  surroundings passing you by,
just as if you were traveling in an airplane, only much  faster.  Then you'll begin to truly see
your destination.  

In the beginning, your visual images may be hazy and faint.  But as you practice, the  images
will become clearer and take on color.  While Mental Projecting, if you want to go  somewhere
else then where you're currently visiting, all you have to do is concentrate on  the place you
want to be, and with the speed of thought you will be there.  Where your  thoughts are, there you
will be too.  In no way, should you force Mental Projection.   When you project, it must be from
the area of the forehead.  If you feel a swaying  sensation from your entire body, then you are
starting to project the Astral Body, rather  then the Mental Body. Your conscious projection of
the Mental Body must be from the  forehead.  You must center your conscious efforts to project
from the area of the head.   You should definitely know that it is your mind body that you do
travel and see through.   You are actually present in your Mental Body and can send magickal
healing and power  through it to any person, place, or thing as you feel the need.  When you are
ready to  return, you should do so slowly and easily.  You should see yourself returning the same 
way you went. 
As you begin to feel your physical body again, for while in traveling you will forget it, move  the
fingers and hands slowly. Next, you will concentrate on your breathing, and you will  find the
need to take a deep breath, for while traveling, your breathing has become very  slow and
shallow.  In all, return very slowly and you will prevent any harm to yourself, for  returning
too quickly can cause headaches and an "out-of-sorts" feeling.   Mind Traveling is your key to
unlimited new discoveries in life. You can visit and stay in  touch with friends and love ones
far away.  You can see cities, great libraries, countries,  and places untold.  You can go into space
and discover new worlds and civilizations.   Your past and future are open to your exploration. 
You can even explore the Magickal  Realms and see the Magickal Leaders and Teachers of the
world.  At first, go easy in  learning to use your mind to travel with.  You must practice and be
patient and the results  are assured.  Remember, Mental Projection is your means to worlds
untold; the passport  is your own magickal development.  You have finally reached the topic
that you waited so  patiently for.  So without further delay, let's learn how to create the world
around and  within you that you desire to have.  

40.  Creative Visualization 

The Magick of Creative Visualization is awesome.  There is absolutely nothing you cannot 
create into your world through Creative Visualization.  There are examples of people who  used
the power of Creative Visualization throughout history.  Look at the lives of Albert  Einstein,
Thomas Edison, and Leonardo Da Vinci.  Look at the lives of Mozart, Beethoven,  and Wagner. 
In all these lives and thousands more like them, they used their minds and  a vision they held
in their minds and created and changed the world.  They created  intuitively.  You too can
become like them by knowing how its done and then using it.  The  whole process is known as
Creative Visualization.  

Through this process, you will be able to create for yourself and others anything that you 
desire.  Remember always to create within the laws of the Eternal Night Balance and the  Silver
Rule. As long as you follow these two principles there is absolutely nothing you  cannot create
into your world through Creative Visualization.  The process of Creative  Visualization is
broken down into two basic parts, a.) Imagination and b.) Invocation. The  process ends with
the final results of c.) Materialization. So without further delay, let's  begin with imagination.  

a.  Imagination

Imagination is a product of your mind.  It is the ability of your mind to be able to visualize, 
picture, envision, or imagine situations and things.  As a kid, you used your imagination in 
playing house.  You imagined yourself as either the father or mother and your toy dolls as  your
children.  Your house was a big box that you got from the local appliance dealer that  once
contained a refrigerator or stove.  Or remember the time you laid down on the soft,  cool, green
grass and looked up at the big, fluffy, white clouds on a warm summer day  and imagined what
this cloud or that looked like.  Some looked like big elephants or dogs  and others looked like
planes.  Remember?  This is your imagination at work.  

As an adult, you constantly use your imagination to imagine what an interview is going to  be
like with the new boss, or what an appointment with the dentist is going to feel like.  If  you
have a birthday coming up, you try to imagine what gifts are going to be given to you  and who
will send cards.  You constantly employ your imagination in your life.  Your  imagination is a
very powerful force in your life.  In fact, your imagination is the most  powerful force in your
life today.  Disagree? 

Well if you do, then let's look at some examples.  Many will say that your will is the  strongest
force in your life but this can be easily disproved.  In any contest between the  will and the
imagination, the imagination always wins.  For example, let's take a catwalk  high above the
factory floor.  The catwalk is only two feet wide and there are guard rails at  waist height
running the fifty foot length.  Can you cross it in safety and ease? Sure, for  you have the added
safety measure of the guard rails. Now, let's take away the guard  rails.  Has your ease in
crossing changed any?  The catwalk is still quite wide enough to  cross with ease but when you
take away the guard rails, your imagination starts to go to  work.  You look at the long drop
below and without the rails, you start to imagine what  would happen if you slip.  It will be hard
to convince your imagination that you can cross  without any danger.  You find that you are
truly scared at walking on a two-foot wide  catwalk suspended one hundred feet in the air.  If
you attempt to force your will over your  self, this will only create more tension, and begin to
cause your body to shake and sweat  to appear on your forehead, and you will be totally unable
to cross.  Your imagination  wins.  Another example of how your imagination has been used as
a powerful force in  your life is the fear that many people have of a place called Hell.  

Churches have long used the idea of Hell to keep people in line. In your imagination, you 
believe that if you are not good and do exactly what the church says, you will pay for it by  going
to a very, very hot, sulfurous, brimstone place, and there suffer eternal torment.  If  you truly
believe this and have convinced your imagination of this, then you will not do  any wrong if
possible.  Your imagination is even stronger then the sexual forces in your  life.  

It is in your imagination that a particular type of man or woman is attractive to you.  
Imagination must come first before the sexual forces can be activated.  So, your  imagination is
dominant even over your love life.  As you have just seen in these  examples presented here, and
many more that come to mind, the imagination is a very  powerful force.  Whatever you
imagine to be true in your life, your imagination will insure  that it is so in your life.  If you feel
that an unsupported walk will be very dangerous, then  your imagination will conjure up the
most dismal of pictures in your mind's eye, of you  lying broken up on the floor far, far below. 
The idea, then, is to learn to use your  imagination constructively.  You must learn how to
manipulate your imagination to  achieve materialization.  With your imagination, you are
going to learn to imagine  whatever it is that you desire to happen.  

To begin with, you should have by this time become quite proficient at visualization.  The 
hows of this was discussed in topic thirty-two, exercise four.  If you haven't been doing  this
exercise, then refer back to it and begin doing so at once until proficiency is obtained.  
Whatever it is that you want to happen, you must first be able to visualize it.  Once you  have
visualized it clearly in your mind's eye, then you must continue to add to the  visualization
using your imagination and give it substance. Let's begin with an easy  example.  

You want to create an apple.  First, you would have already visualized the apple itself.   You
have pictured, in your mind, a bright, beautiful apple.  Then with your imagination,  you will
continue to add substance to it by adding the color to its skin. Now, you have a  bright,
beautiful, red apple.  Then you will, in your imagination, see the insides of the  apple, and how
beautifully yellow they are.  Then, go on remembering how delicious and  sweet they taste, and
even how fragrant it smells. In your imagination, hold this total  picture of a bright, red,
yellowish insides, sweet tasting and smelling apple.  This is how  you will use your imagination
in Creative Visualization.  But you don't have the apple yet,  do you?  You need something more
then just your imagination alone.  You need the  added ingredient of Invocation.  

b.  Invocation 

You are probably asking yourself what I mean by Invocation.  The very meaning of the  word
tells you what is required next. Invocation is the act of calling upon a deity or higher  power for
aid in accomplishing something.  In Night Magick you are going to invoke the  aid of your
Oversoul to complete the act of Creative Visualization.  It is your Oversoul who  answers your
invocation. The Oversoul places into your world those things you desire to  see in it. There are
no limitations placed upon what invocation can do when combined  with visualization and
imagination.  None! How do you invoke so that your Oversoul will  answer with action? 
First, you must have the attention of your Oversoul.  If you have been practicing meditation 
with dedication and sincerity, then you will have been slowly opening the Crown Night  Center
or your Portal to your Oversoul.  In your practice of meditation and Night Magick  overall, you
have been practicing a way of life that raises your magickal vibration and that  of your
Oversoul, too. When you dedicate yourself to this magickal way of life, your  Oversoul then
becomes directly involved in your magickal growth. So, since you have  been practicing
meditation all along, you know that your Oversoul is listening.  To begin  your invocation then,
you must establish that communications link with your Oversoul.  You can do this standing,
sitting, or lying down, whichever you are most comfortable with.   Then, you will put the Night
Pillar around yourself.  You will need to use your imagination  and see yourself as the Living
Oversoul.  Envision yourself dressed in a seamless, black  garment glowing in intense magickal
radiation. You must see yourself as you would  imagine your Oversoul must seem in Its Realm. 
That is, as an embodiment of Power and  Glory unknown on Earth.  You must go beyond just
imagining yourself as the Oversoul on  Earth.  You must know that you are the Oversoul. That if
you raise your vibration high  enough, and know that you are the Oversoul, then your Oversoul
will join you on Earth and  will work with, and through you.  At this point, you will start to feel
an increase in heart  rate and exhilaration unknown to you before.  Through this, you will
know your Oversoul is  listening and is with you.  Even if you don't feel this exhilaration, be
assured, that your  Oversoul is with you.  Then you can say your invocation to your Oversoul. 
There is a  certain way that the invocation should he said.  This is not like a typical prayer that
you  have been taught how to say.  Your invocation is more a command and affirmation.  The 
invocation should be based on the following example: "Darkest Oversoul which I AM, send 
your Yin Light and Energy through me.  For I AM the Oversoul in Action here on Earth and  live
by Your Will alone.  I AM commanding as Oversoul in Action here on Earth that your  request
be done.  By the Oversoul's Will let it be done.  So be it."  You should repeat this  invocation three
times.  If you do this with all sincerity and knowing that it will be done,  then it will be done.
The result of this invocation and your use of imagination is defined as  Materialization.  

c.  Materialization 

What is materialization?  Materialization is the bringing forth into material or physical 
existence your desires.  This is the ultimate goal of Creative Visualization.  You want to  bring
into the material world your ideals.  Can you achieve this materialization through  invocation
alone?  No, you must have the combination of imagination and invocation  together.  One
question that may come to your mind is where the apple, or anything that  you are trying to
create, materializing from? 

When I speak of using your imagination to form the image of what it is you want, you are  also
using concentrated thought.  You are building this image first on the Mental Realm.   As you
continue the imaginative process, you continue to fill the image with your emotions  or feelings
about what it is and like to have.  Thus, you continue to build it, and so, lower  it into the Astral
Realm. The object is actually materializing on both the Mental and Astral  planes.  Then, you
employ your power of invocation, building or materializing it on both  the Magickal and the
Etheric planes.  In the materialization of objects, this form, made up  of condensed energy, will
create the necessary events in order to manifest into your or  another's world, depending on
what it is you are trying to achieve.  If you are of advanced  magickal development, with a need
of the object immediately, then physical matter will  start to form around the energy form
until you have the final material product.  With your  imagination and invocation, you are
programming the energy form to materialize. The  energy form will do whatever is necessary to
bring about the creation.  Let's return beck to  the apple you were trying to materialize, and see
the whole process through.  

Remember, you were imagining a bright, red, yellowish insides, sweet tasting and  smelling
apple.  You had used your imagination to such a point that you could almost  smell and taste
that apple. At that moment, you would go on to use invocation.  You now  see yourself as the
Oversoul on Earth.  You truly feel Its Power and Energy descend upon  you and know that you
are One.  Now, you would insert in your invocation the image of  your apple.  From this, you
would have your apple.  Is the apple going to be right there in  front of you, after you do all of
this? 
That depends on you and your magickal development.  If you have reached the state of  Night
Consciousness, then YES, the apple will be there in front of you.  For in Night  Consciousness,
you and the Oversoul are One.  There is perfect communion and  cooperation in all things.  In
lesser magickal development, the apple would have been  there, but only as low as the etherial
state.  But, what is in the etherial state of  materialization will eventually have its material
existence fulfilled.  Somehow, and  eventually, that bright, red apple will come into your life.
Food is not the only thing that  you can materialize.  

There is no limit on the physical objects that you can materialize into your life, but more 
importantly, there is no limit to the physical happenings that you can cause to exist.  By 
physical happenings, I am referring to events or changes to occur in your or another's life.   For
example, you may want to become more like one of the Night Teachers.  You would,  then, first
activate your imagination and begin to build the image of the Teacher you  would like to
become more like.  Think of all the qualities and attributes held by that  Teacher.  What they
look like? What mannerisms?  Build the image very strong and then  you will slowly start to
see yourself taking on these magickal qualities.  You should then  bring in your invocation. 
You will ask your Oversoul to build within you, the qualities  found in the Teacher.  You should
then continue this visualization over a long period of  time.  In other words, you must practice
this visualization process many times, over a long  period of time, in order to become fully like
the Teacher.  There is no way of knowing how  long it will take to acquire these qualities.  But
as each day goes by, you will become  more and more like your Night Teacher.  The change will
hardly be perceptible to you, but  change you will.  You can help build these qualities into other
people.  You can  materialize in anyone, anything, through your imagination and invocation. 
Through  Creative Visualization, you could achieve unlimited supply of the things you need on
Earth  and the Soul qualities you need in life to reach Night Consciousness.  You have traveled 
to the end of your journey in Air Magick.  

You began it, by visiting the dimension where the Great Ones live and bring into mental 
creation, what will soon thereafter become a physical discovery and invention.  You have  long
been convinced, by now, of the great power of your thoughts, and the even greater  power of your
Friend, the Silent Magician.  You have learned to bring improvements into  your life through
self- hypnosis.  You have acquired new Night Magician Tools such as the  Pendulum and
Crystal Globe.  You have learned to travel to anywhere, at anytime,  through Mental Projection,
and to invoke or communicate with your Oversoul.  Best of all,  you have learned to control the
world around you and create as the Oversoul through  Creative Visualization.  You have come a
long way on the road of Night Magick, but the  road stretches out before you a bit farther.  You
find yourself journeying on the last part of  the Night Road and entering the Night Realm.

CHAPTER  VII


Night (Fire) Magick

41.  The Night (Fire) Realm

Fire was the fourth element held sacred by the Ancient Magicians. Fire represents a  Magickal
Energy that transforms the lower nature into the Magickal.  It was used in  Magickal Alchemy
to represent the transmuting agent necessary to change ordinary  metals or souls, into silver or
the Oversoul.  It is symbolic of the Oversoul and the Night  Forces, pouring forth into the life of
the Night Magician, changing the base elements into  the Silver of the Oversoul.  This is the
final realm into which you will enter for exploration.   It is the Realm of Magickal and
Celestial Energies.  In this topic, you will explore the  Night Realm, as the Land of the Perfected
Night Magician.  You will learn of the different  vibrational levels of the Night Realm.  You will,
then, enter the Inner Night Realm found  within you; and the purpose of this chapter on Night
Magick.  If you are ready, let's  discover the Night Realm.  

This is a realm, that for many, even a glimpse of it is still far down the road.  It is a realm  of
pure Night Power and Energy.  It is a Realm of Pure Night.  The beauty of this realm,  words can
not describe.  I made an attempt earlier in the book to describe this realm, and  could not even
come close in describing the Power and Energy found in this world.  If, in  your highest
magickal imagination, you could envision a Magickal Realm of dazzling,  silver, violet, and
dark light, that fills every part of your being with a warmth and power  beyond description,
then you would have some idea of the Night Realm.  If you could  imagine a power that flows
through you, giving to you knowledge and wisdom beyond  anything you know; to know
yourself as timeless and eternal; then you would know the  Night Realm.  In the Night Realm,
you would see each other as radiating Spheres of  Eternal Night Energy, outshining even your
surroundings.  As has been said before, you  must strive to reach this realm, for it is only then,
when you see and experience it  yourself, will you truly know the Night Realm.  The Night
Realm is divided into numerous  vibrational levels.  

Each level is the home for Beings of compatible harmony and vibration.  The Night Realm  can
be viewed as having basically two major levels.  The higher region, I will refer to as  the
Celestial Night, and the lower as the Magickal Night.  

The Celestial Night is the home, so to speak, of the Night Spirit.  It is the region of the  Night
Spirit Power and Energy. Beyond this, very little can be said about this region.  The  concepts
that make up this region go well beyond your understanding.  Perhaps it is here,  that I should
discuss the concept of dimensions.  

Referring back to the Astral Realm, you will remember that when you are in it, that you  could
do a great deal of things that you could not do on Earth.  You could float in the air,  conjure up a
four course meal, build a house by thought, and could return to the lower  level of Earth.  In your
Astral Body, you could go through Earthly walls and not be seen by  people still in an Earthly
Body.  On Earth, you often refer to the physical plane as the third  dimension, and you could,
therefore, refer to the Astral Realm as the fourth.  If you go to  the next dimension, that is the
fifth, you would have an even greater range of abilities and  be governed by totally different
concepts then those of the lower dimensions.  With each  higher dimension, the concepts that
apply become more abstract and less  understandable by those in lower dimensions.  This is
why the Celestial Region is far  beyond your understanding.  This region could be viewed as the
twentieth or fiftieth  dimension.  It is well beyond comprehension.  Then, there is the Magickal
Region.  

You could view it as the ninth or tenth dimension.  So again, understanding of its  composition
and concepts is well beyond you. You do know that it is the home of your  Oversoul.  It is the
place you know as the Realm of the Perfected Night Magician.  It is the  region of Magickal
Wisdom.  It is here that all ideas and prototypes are fixed and  released into the lower
dimensions below and become manifest on each level.  This is the  dimension where you find
the Causal Body.  

The Magickal Region holds the vehicle through which you enter your Inner Night Realm.   You
enter the Inner Night Realm through your Causal Body.  Your magickal nature is  found
summed in the Causal Body.  All that you have ever done has gone into molding the  Causal
Body.  The Causal Body is as inert and undeveloped as any other Body or vehicle  in which you
have had to find expression here on Earth.  All that you have ever done, has  gone towards
refining the Causal or Magickal Body.  You could liken the Causal Body to a  treasure chest.  It is
here, that you store your Magickal Silver.  Your Magickal Silver  consisting of all the
accomplishments and growth you have ever acquired while in  existence.  It is these things
which activate and quicken the Magickal Body.  It is through  this Magickal Vehicle, that you
are joined in Oneness with your Oversoul.  It is the  Oversoul's Magickal Body, as well as yours. 
This is why I have stressed to give so much  energy to Night Magick.  This is why I have stressed,
so much, on the things that you must  do to grow magickally.  When the Causal Body is perfected
then you join the Oversoul in  Perfection and Energy.  Then, you reach up and into the
Consciousness of your Night  Soul.  This is why I have presented this chapter on Fire or Night
Magick. 

Through the practice of the information, exercises, and rites found in this chapter, you will 
greatly enhance the development of your Causal Body.  Through hard effort, dedication, 
perseverance, and patience, you can achieve perfection of the Magickal Body.  You will  expand,
refine, and fully develop your Magickal Body and the perfection of your Inner  Nature.  All that
you will do, in this chapter, will directly effect your Oversoul. S/He will be  your active Partner
and Friend in your life.  You will learn to give and apply magickal  healing direct from the
Oversoul within.  You will learn the Night Rites, which will directly  bring power and energy
into your Inner Being and the world around you.  You will learn  how to use the Night Powers
and Flames, and the great changes that you can bring into  the world through them.  There are
other subjects that you will explore, and that will bring  knowledge and wisdom into your life
from their study.  This is your final chapter and will,  perhaps, open up before you knowledge
and power never before encountered.   Remember, that in all you learn and practice, you must
remain in the Energy and Will of  your Oversoul.  

Even though this is the final chapter, and you may have been sailing along in your  education
in Night Magick, and passing all the tests, remember, that your study and  progress goes on
forever into eternity.  You will never stop learning and growing in Night  Magick.  Beyond this
Earthly life, there is so much that awaits before you.  So, practice  Night Magick with
dedication and perseverance and remain victorious on the road of Night  Magick. Your first
subject for discussion, in Fire Magick, is the Great Magickal Beings  who are the Citizenry of
the Magickal and Material Universe.

42.  The Solar, Planetary, and Lunar Powers   

It may come as a shock to you, but the Stars, Planets, and Moons that you look upon  every day
and night are indeed Great Magickal Entities.  Descending from out of the  Celestial Realm,
they have chosen to incarnate into the Stars, Planets and Moons.  Their  magickal path is one
of many advanced magickal paths, but it is a very important path.  It  is important, especially
in regards to you, for it provides places upon which lesser souls  may find development and
magickal advancement.  Humans are not, by any means, the  only race in the universe.  The
Stars, Planets and Moons are, indeed, Conscious, Sentient  Beings, each with their own
personal natures.  Under this topic, I am going to discuss  each of these Inner Natures.  I will
begin with a discussion of the Solar Life.  I will then  discuss the Planetary and Lunar
God/Goddesses, in general, and then discuss,  specifically, the Inner Natures of each.  Along
with discussing their Inner Natures, I will  also talk about the auric effect of each, upon you.  If
you are ready, then let's proceed to  the Solar Force.

The visible Stars are inhabited by advanced beings following the Yang path of  development. 
There is no doubt that physically we need the Sun in order to provide  physical heat and act as a
physical source for the positive solar energy needed by living  things on Earth.  As a Night
Magician you will become very sensitive to solar energy.  As  your depth in the Night proceeds
you will need less and less of the solar energy.  You  want to be very careful not to receive too
much sunlight and so become overcharged with  solar force.  This will definitely harm your
magickal workings.  I have been to places  where the Night Force was so strong that it acted
much like a polarized lens and filtered  the harmful energy of the Sun from me.  But these
places are few and far between.  If you  wrap yourself tightly in your Night Pillar then you will
greatly minimize the harmful effects  of the Sun.  

Within this system though because it is a Yin system there is also the Dark Sun.  It is also 
called the Black Sun.  The Black Sun absorbs too much Yang Energy and moves it to  another
time and place that is a Yang system.  The Black Sun is the source of all Yin  Energy in this
Dark Solar System.  It is the Parent Force to the Planetary and Lunar  Deities.  Let's examine
this parenthood some more.

You will remember that every human being receives its Oversoul and Godsoul from a part  of
the great whole which is the Earth Goddess/God's Oversoul and Godsoul.  In similar  manner,
the Planetary and Lunar Deities receive their Oversoul and Godsoul from the  Dark Sun.  So we
have the Dark Sun as the sum of the whole, who then divides Its Eternal  Self into smaller
pieces who are the Planetary and Lunar Deities, and they in turn divide  their sum into
individual sparks which become encased in the material world.  The Ancients knew, thou
enshrouded in myth, that the Planets and Moons are the physical  vehicles of very advanced
beings.  You are familiar with your own physical body and the  other vehicles that make up
your material being.  You also know that you have an aura  that is charged with emotions and
thoughts.  When you meet someone in the office, for  example, and come within range of their
aura, you often sense things about that person.   If they are feeling uplifted, or angry and
depressed, you can sense that about the person.   You also have found that if you permit it, their
aura may induce these same feelings in  you.  This is somewhat similar when we speak about
the Planetary and Moon Spirits  having bodies.  

They do have bodies, and along with that, they also have an aura that is supercharged  with
emotions and thoughts that reflect the Inner Nature of their Being.  Their bodies are  enormous
and so are their auras.  Thus, the effect of these auras is far reaching.  Yet, I  want to say this:
Humankind are foolish creatures when they allow the Stars, Planets, or  Moons to rule their
destiny.  The effect of Their Auras may heighten the highest qualities  in humankind but they
do not rule humankind's destiny.  Your destiny is in your own  hands and the Hands of Your
Oversoul.  Remember this.  Now what effects do these Great  Ones have upon you.  

When the Dark Sun runs strong through you, you find yourself filled with vitality and  health. 
You are ambitious, proud, strong willed, and face life with great courage.  You  have a very
strong and stable personality.  You have a great drive and zest for life.  You  are a very
independent and confidant soul.  You are generally quick witted, perceptive,  thoughtful, and
considerate.  These are the things that the Dark Sun can bring out in you.   You will soon learn
how to increase the power of the Dark Sun that runs through your  veins.  You will learn how to
do this through the Night Rites.  The Dark Sun does run  through everyone, to some degree, but
can be greatly intensified by practicing the Night  Rites.   

From the Dark Sun we proceed onward with the Planetary and Lunar Spirits.  The first-born
Children of the Father-Mother Dark Sun are the Planetary and Lunar Night Powers.   Each
Night Power has elected to incarnate into a planetary or lunar physical body. They  serve the
noble purpose of giving a home to countless souls. They serve as Father,  Mother, and Guardian
to all the souls incarnate thereon.  They are beautiful, Magickal  Beings of the Night Spirit's
Power.  They all embody the Energy of the Night Soul.  They  all serve to help the progress and
advancement of lesser souls.  Think about this; you only  live a span of generally less then one
hundred years, but they live a life that is many  billions of years long!  Thus, you should
recognize them for what they are, and give them  your energy as best you can. Each Planetary
and Lunar Night Power has followed a  separate and unique magickal evolution, which is ever
ongoing, just as you have.  The  only thing is, that they have been at it a lot longer then you
have.  You find that, just as  you are strong in certain inner traits and qualities, so the
Planetary and Lunar Night  Beings are.  They have embodied certain magickal qualities and
forces from their  magickal growth and advancement.  These forces and qualities make up
their Inner  Nature and are reflected in Their Auras.  There is a science that is based upon the 
interplay of these forces, and others, on humankind.  It is called Astrology.  It is based  upon
many factors and is a very real science.  What you are going to do is study the Inner  Nature of
each Planetary and Lunar Night Spirit, and then the Auric effect of that Night  Spirit, on you,
when it plays upon you (or others) the strongest.  You will begin with the  Night Spirit Mercury.  

Perhaps, it is here, that I should interject this bit of information.  The names of the Lunar  and
Planetary Night Spirits are prefixed with the word Night God or Goddess.  This is so,  whenever
you refer to them as Magickal Beings in speech, or addressing them in  meditation.  Although
each Lunar and Planetary Spirit contains a Yin and Yang side their  is one aspect that is
predominate just as there is in you.  Let's return now to the Night  God Mercury.  

Mercury has always been represented as the winged god messenger. You can, indeed,  think of
Mercury as the Winged Night Spirit, in the form of a beautiful Silver Hawk.  The  Hawk is the
symbol of great magickal attainment, and the Night God Mercury has reached  those lofty
heights of the Planetary Oversoul.  His very core of Being is filled with Night  Energy.  His
Presence is filled with Oversoul Strength and the Night Power.  Yet, His  Nature is that of a very
warm Being.  He stands as the Rock of the Oversoul upon whom  all may build their lives in
confidence.  He is sure of His Place in the Drama of Life.  His  Aura radiates with the Power of
the Night Command and Direction.  Thus, He fills your life  with Night Direction when you are
open to His Influence.  When you are attuned to His  Presence and Power, you are filled with the
Presence of Oversoul.  You find inner  freedom and independence in yourself as the Magickal
Hawk.   You find yourself as a  seeker of Wisdom, wherever It may be.  His Presence quickens
your mental faculties and  gives you good memory.  You enjoy the pursuit of Wisdom in reading
and writing.  His  Aura makes you perceptive, studious, and logical.  You can be a strong leader
in life.   This is the Power of the Night God Mercury in your life.  From the Night Spirit Mercury, 
you travel to visit with the Night Goddess Venus.  

Venus is a Night Planetary Goddess who is very Warm, Vibrant, and Alive with the Night 
Energy.  She is filled with the Energy of the Oversoul and the Night Spirit, which She  radiates
in Her Aura to all beings.  If you were to visualize Her Presence, you would see  Her attired in a
flowing, red gown.  She has beautiful green eyes, skin that is pale and  soft, and Her hair is long,
flowing, and red in color.  You find Her a bit Reserved and  Mysterious in Nature.  She is filled
with the deepest of Compassion for others. You know  Her as the Morning Star, the last to say
good-bye.  When you bathe in the Presence of  Her Aura, your Inner Nature becomes filled with
Energy.  She fills you with a vibrancy and  warmth for life.  She gives to you an artistic nature
and an energy for beauty, art, and  music.  You become a part of Her Compassion for all of life. 
You enjoy being with other  people and spreading harmony, peace, and happiness among them. 
This is the Power of  the Goddess Venus in your life.  From here, you move to the next Goddess,
and One  whom you call Mother, the Earth.  

The Presence of Mother Earth is a very Commanding One.  She has a very strong sense of 
Direction and Purpose in Her Life.  Yet, you find Her a very Compassionate and Loving 
Creature.  If you could envision Her Presence, you would find Her arrayed in a beautiful, 
emerald green gown and shimmering in the Glory of the Night Spirit's Light.  She is a very 
Magickal and Elegant Lady.  She is very much concerned with life and nature.  When  filled
with the Presence of Her Nature, you, too, become filled with a concern for life and  nature.  You
sense the great importance all life and nature plays in your world.  You feel  very earthy and
strong in the ways of the Earth.  You become a part of Her Direction and  Purpose in Life.  You
become filled with Her Compassion and Concern for all things  living.  You know the feeling of
true parenthood, just as She does for all of you.  This is  your Mother and Night Goddess, Earth. 
You won't have to go far to meet your next Lunar  Night Goddess, the Moon.  

She has been known as Diana, or Artemis, the Goddess of Light and the Moon.  She has  been
recognized as the Goddess of Fertility. The Moon's Light comes from sun light but  she reflects
to the Earth only Yin Light.  She is the Great Reflector of the Yin Light into  your world.  She is
the Giant Mirror through which humankind can see their selves  reflected.  Thus, She is All-
seeing of the wrong and harm that is done to the beautiful body  of the Goddess Earth.  As you
meditate upon Her Presence, you see only the All-seeing  Eye and the tears that are shed for
humankind.  The Goddess Diana is a very  Compassionate and Loving Being, who has
constantly seen the wrong and harm caused  by humankind.  Thus, She is filled with a Great
Sadness over humankind and its doings.   When you come strongly under Her Presence, you are
filled with a restlessness and  boundless energy to correct those wrongs.  She has great control
over your emotional  nature and can raise in you the highest of qualities. She makes you
sensitive and intuitive  to all things around you. She fills you with great compassion.  She gives
you a receptive  and imaginative mind.  This is the outpouring of the Goddess Diana's Aura on
you.  Now,  you are off to visit the Night God Mars.  

Man has always envisioned the Night God Mars as a god of war. But the time has passed,  when
the Night God Mars may be referred to as such.  The Night God Mars, as all the  Planetary Night
Spirits, is a Great Being of the Night Spirit and Energy.  The problem lies  with humankind
itself.  The Energies of Mars can either bring humankind to its Highest, or  lowest Self,
dependent on the Inner Nature of humankind.  Thus, the Energies have  always reacted
adversely with the human aura and created a state of war in humankind.   Where Mars was,
before, symbolized as a Hawk, now, He shall be symbolized as a Swan.   The Swan is a living
symbol of the Oversoul in the Night Spirit.  The Night God Mars is a  Masculine Night Spirit
who is Young and Energetic.  He is Night Courage and Strength.   He represents Victory in, and
through, Peace.  He is the Fighter and Defender of the Ways  of the Night Spirit.  He is a very
Wise and Noble Night Spirit.  He is a King in All Things.   His Aura can raise the highest and
noblest of qualities in humankind.  

He fills you with a energy of liberty, freedom, and independence. He gives to you an Inner 
Nature of Night Strength and Courage. You become filled with inner purpose and  direction. 
You are filled with His Night Energy and thus, are ambitious, aggressive, and  straightforward
in all things.  You are given a good mind that makes you ingenious and  inventive.  You are
filled with the Wisdom of the Night God Mars.  When you are filled  with His Night Energies, you
must always be centered in your Oversoul. You must guard  against a lack of patience and
rashness.  You must guard against an unruly temper.  You  must always be filled with the Night
Energy and Light, and thus raise the Energies of the  Night God Mars to their Highest in you. 
You leave the Night Spirit Mars, and move on to  the Goddess Jupiter.   
Perhaps this will upset many, but the Goddess Jupiter is predominately a Feminine Night 
Spirit.  She does have strong Masculine overtones, but She is, nonetheless, a Feminine  Night
Spirit.  If you could envision Her Presence, you would see Her with very long,  flowing, blond
hair.  She wears a very radiant dress of blue light.  She is a very Magickal  and Radiant Goddess.
She is a virtual pool of Explosive Night Energy.  She is always  ready to go; to be; to do.  She is
filled with Night Liberty, Freedom, Justice, and the  Eternal Night Balance.  She is symbolized
by a Blue Raven of Harmony and Peace.  She  is a very Refined and Elegant Being.  She is very
businesslike in all Her Ways.  She  brings to you this businesslike attitude.  

She fills you with a very real sense of purpose and direction. She gives you strong  convictions. 
She give to you an optimistic, confidant, and determined attitude.  When you  have the Power of
the Goddess Jupiter flowing through strongly, you are very sincere,  courteous, pleasant, and
noble person.  You are a very refined individual.  You value your  freedom and independence
very highly.  This is the Power of the Goddess Jupiter.  You  leave Her to visit another of Her
Sisters, the Goddess Saturn.  

As you approach the Aura of the Goddess Saturn, you find Her Awesome, Powerful, and 
Creative.  She is filled with Great Elegance and Grace.  She is a very Mysterious the  Goddess of
the Night and Power.  She is the Mistress of Time and Space.   She is the  Taskmaster for those
who would enter the Path towards Night Consciousness.  She wears  the Silver Crown of the
Oversoul, and holds it for all who attain to the Oversoul.  She is a  very Stern Goddess, who
demands much from Her Sons and Daughters.  Yet, She is filled  with Great Compassion and
Energy.  Her Very Nature contains Night Tolerance, Patience,  and Fortitude.  She brings to all
humankind the aspiration to attain unto the Oversoul.  

If Saturn's Aura rules in you then you are very calm, grave, and serious in nature.  You are  one
who is ready to face the trials and tests of life.  You are ready for the great changes  and upsets to
come into your life.  You are ready, because you are one who strives to  become the Oversoul in
all things.  There is no greater goal and crown to be won, from  the Hands of the Goddess Saturn. 
You must take on the Goddess' Qualities of Tolerance,  Patience, and Fortitude.  You must be
ready for the long, slow climb towards Night  Consciousness, for indeed, with these Night
Qualities inside yourself, you can not fail.   These are the Powers of the Goddess Saturn, in the
life of those who would be the  Oversoul.  Let's go onward and meet the Night God Uranus.  

The Inner World of the Night God Uranus is one related to the technology of the world.   He is a
very Strong-willed Night God. He has a great feeling for the World of Technology.   He is very
thorough in all He undertakes.  The Power of His Aura is very far reaching, and  is felt strongly
in the world today.  He gives to those, who feel His Power, strong  originality and independence
of thought.  His Power gives the genius and inventor of the  world. The inventor is a lover of his
freedom and independence.  As with all geniuses and  inventors, there is a peculiarity or
strangeness that tends to set them apart from others.  It  makes them feel as if they are many
years ahead of their time.  The Night Spirit Uranus is  still very much wrapped up in His Own
Ways and Mysteries, and so it is with the next the  Night God Neptune.  

To look into the Inner Nature of the Night God Neptune is very much like looking into the 
depths of the oceans.  His Inner Nature is extremely Deep and Vast.  The Inner Depths of 
Neptune conceal many of the Ancient Mysteries that are still to be revealed to humankind.  
The Night God Neptune is a very Refined and Noble Planetary Night God.  He is filled to  the
Depths with Night Strength and Power.  He is symbolized by a Trident, with a Blazing  Silver
Light atop it.  

He gives to you Inner Strength of Purpose and Direction.  He knows who you are; why you  are;
and where you're going.  He fills you with a sense of Destiny and Purpose in Life.   His Aura fills
you with His Night Strength.  He gives to you an Energy for the Mysteries.   He makes you
intuitive and perceptive to the Night Force.  To those in whom the Power of  the Night God
Neptune flows strongest, He gives the Energy of the Seas and Oceans.  It is  best, for this one, to
live close to large bodies of water.  This is the Power of the Night God  Neptune.  Your last stop is
to visit the Night Goddess/God Pluto.   In the Night God Pluto, the Forces of Masculinity and
Femininity are in equal balance.   The Night God is neither more feminine or more masculine,
but finds a balance in both.   In the Night God Pluto, you find the Knowledge of the Night.  S/he
is filled with Night Life,  Light, and Speed.  S/he is the Guardian of the Night Age.  S/he is the
Harbinger of the Age  of the Eternal Night. S/he is the First One to see and understand the New
Horizons that lie  before humankind.  S/he is symbolized by the Equilateral Triangle ablaze in
Green Cold  Fire.  She is filled with a New Night Power for the Yin System and it is called Cold
Fire.  It  represents a new form of Night Power and Strength, and when magickally invoked,
feels  both cool and warm.  Its Power has yet to be fully understood and used in this world.  The 
Night Goddess/God Pluto represents, in humankind, the dying of the material concerns  and
the birth of the magickal way of life.   S/he will fill humankind with a new power and  energy
that will bring about new ways of life.  If the Powers of the Night Goddess/God  Pluto flow
strongest in you, you will find yourself standing atop the Mountain of the Night  God, holding
aloft the Blazing Night Energy of Your Own Divinity.  In the Night  Goddess/God Pluto, you find
the New Human.  This is the Human of the Night Age, the  Aquarian Age, the return to a
Magickal Way of Life.  

You found that Dark Stars, Planets, and Moons are Conscious, Sentient Beings of the  Night
Power and Energy.  You found that in some ways they differ as much as humans  differ from
each other. May you find in knowing the Planetary Night Goddess/Gods and  the Goddess
Diana, greater understanding about yourself, your future, and your relation  to the Universe
around you.  You leave the Magickal-Material Universe of the Planetary  and Lunar
Goddess/Gods and enter into the Magickal Realm of the Night Teachers.  

43.  The Night Guild 

You will recall, for a moment, that in the beginning of the book, I stated then, while  discussing
the Night Teachers, that I would return to them later and go into greater depth  and detail.
Therefore, I have donated this topic to the in-depth examination of the Night  Teachers in their
realm.  I discussed earlier in the book, the realm in which they live.   

You will remember that the Night Realm (Causal Realm) was the home of the Perfected  Night
Magician.  This is the region of the Night Teachers, the Perfected Humankind.  Yet,  the Night
Teachers also work and reside in the lower dimensions.  You will recall that the  Night Guild is
the organization dedicated to the service of the Will of the Night Spirit.  It is  dedicated to using
the Power, Wisdom, and Energy of the Night Spirit in whatever way is  required to further
promote that Will.  The membership of the Night Guild is as vast and  varied as the stars that
make up the Universe.  There are members that work in Realms  and Spheres of Light and
Energy far beyond your imagination.  I spoke in the last topic, of  those members who are the
Night and Planetary Night Spirits.  These are the Great  Beings that are the Night Spirit and
Life of the planets and suns of the Dark Sun system.  There are even Magickal Beings who are
on an even higher magickal level then these  Great Ones.  What you will become the most
familiar with, and your interest lies with in  this topic, are those Great Ones who are the Night
Teachers.  

The Night Teachers, as you will remember, are those members who work directly with the 
magickal evolution and progress of Earth and its inhabitants.  What kind of Beings are  they
really?  Well, they are in reality very much like you.  They are like you because they  have
walked the same roads that you walk.  Many have lived before on Earth facing the  same trials
and testings you face each day.  They have lived many lives and finally  overcome the cycle of
life and death on Earth.  They are free of all Earthly karma.  They  are the Elder Brothers and
Sisters of Earth. 
In the Night Guild are the Invisible Directors and Governors of the countries, states,  provinces,
and large cities on Earth. There is a Guild Member for each of these  geographical regions, and a
World Director over all of them and the planet.  The World  Director is Germain.  His last
incarnation on Earth was as the Comte de Sainte-Germain.   There are many other offices held
within the Invisible Government.  I cannot give you their  names nor regions that they rule
over because they are too busy dealing with the world  and its population and problems to
actually teach. You should not call upon the World  Director or any of his hierarchy.  They
serve only the indwelling Night Presence of the  Planet and would find any interruption or
disturbance troubling. What does concern you is a branch of the Invisible Government that
does deal with you  directly.  This is the office of the World Teacher.
 The office of World Teacher is currently held by the Night Teacher Merlin.  It is His task  to
plan the magickal education of the inhabitants of Earth.  If it is necessary to establish a  new
teaching then one of their own members is selected to establish it.  The World  Teacher may
elect to go into the world or may select an apprentice to go.  This is indeed  a great honor for the
apprentice so selected.  The members of the Night Guild who work  under the direction of the
World Teacher are the Night Teachers. You will recall that the  Night Teachers deal directly
with those who have traveled far enough on the Night Road  and truly want to become Night
Magicians.  Let's have a quick review of the relationship  between the Teacher and apprentice.  

You will remember that the initial contact between yourself and the Teacher is very  minimal. 
This contact only comes about when you have been accepted on the road of  Night Magick.  In
time, and with self-perseverance, the relationship between yourself and  the Night Teacher
deepens, until you become the Teacher's apprentice. Then you come  under Her/His direct
supervision and instruction. You become as Mother/Father and  Daughter/Son.  Yet, you ask
yourself the same question, who is your Night Teacher?  

To answer this questions, leads you to the Seven Forces of Life. The Seven Forces of Life  are the
seven basic types of forces, characteristics, and vibrations that can be found in  life.  There are
seven basic types of people, and within their Inner Nature, these Seven  Forces can be seen at
work.  For each type of person, there is one of the Forces that  strongly predominates over the
others.  The Seven Forces of Life are the seven  predominate ways that a person may find
expression in life.  In you, there is a  predominate Force and characteristic that makes up your
Inner Nature, and it is through  expression of this trait in life, that you find satisfaction and
happiness.  You would even  find this true for the Night Teachers.  They find predominate
expression through one of  the Seven Forces of Life.  The Night Teachers have achieved, though,
perfection and  mastery in each of the Seven Forces, and have the seven basic characteristics
balanced  evenly within their Inner Nature.  Yet you will find that One Force and characteristic
is  predominate over the others.  It is from this Dominant Force that the Night Teachers  choose
Their students and apprentices.  The Night Teacher chooses Their apprentice  based upon like
vibration.  The Teacher and apprentice can be found traveling the same  road of expression in
life.  The Teacher and  apprentice are on One of the Seven Forces of  Life.   This is the
predominate Force and drive of their lives.   As I said earlier, there is a  Night Teacher who is
the Channel and Focus for each of the Seven Forces.  You will find  in Her/Him the Supreme
Perfection and Expression of the Force.  They are the Gateway  for the Force from out of the
Infinite, into the finite.  We will call Her/Him the "Keeper of  the Force", and shorten it to
"Keeper".  There are seven Keepers, and they are each  Teachers of apprentices.  There are also
many Teachers who do not function as Keepers,  but nonetheless, receive apprentices based
upon the Force predominate in both their  lives.  The real key, in the selection of the
apprentice, is harmony between both the  Teacher and the student.  Let's examine the Seven
Forces of Life, and their Keepers, and  then meet a few other Teachers of the Night Realm.  You
will begin, then, with the First  Force.  

The First Force is the Will and Power of the Night Spirit.  You find it, exemplified and  exalted,
in the personage of its Keeper, Asmodeus.  The Keeper Asmodeus is a Night  Teacher in whom
flows the True Power of the Night Spirit, under the Direction of the  Magickal Will.  He is a stern
but kindly Teacher, asking only the very best from His  apprentices.  If He were to appear, in
person, to an apprentice, He would appear in an  Indian attire, that is, turban and robe
complete.  To be His apprentice will require the  strongest of will to persevere through all trials
and testings.  The apprentice, in whom the First Force dominates, is a self-ruler.  The
apprentice prefers  to have self-rule and independence over their life.  The worst thing, the
apprentice feels  could happen is to have to work for another.  This would be pure misery.  They
are the  kind of individual, who takes the initiative and sets the course.  They are of strong will
and  the ruler in life.  They will make the queen/king, statesperson, or governor of the physical 
world.  They will seek freedom through mastery over self and the world around them.  This  is
the way of the Teachers and apprentices of the First Force of Night Power and Will.  

The Second Force is the Wisdom of the Night Spirit.  It finds a special place in the Being  of its
Keeper, Kali.  In appearance, to Her apprentices, She appears as an Indian (India).   She is a very
kind and loving Teacher.  She helps bring to Her students, the perfect  example of Night
Consciousness.  As a Magickal Teacher, She tries to help Her students  grow in magick and
expand their Inner Vision, so that they can see things as She sees  them, and understand things
as She understands them, and above all, to have the  Wisdom of the Night Spirit to respond to
things as She would respond to them.  Her  expressed desire is to see Her apprentices take flight,
on their own, into the Night Realm,  and soar as the Great Magickal Owl.  

The apprentice of the Second Force is the student of life.  They are the kind of person who  will
learn by studying all of life around them.  They will gain their freedom from life and  death on
Earth, by observing and learning from all that goes on around them.  This is how  they will
gain illumination and enlightenment, and soar into the Night Realm.  They are  the
philosopher and poet.  These are the Teachers and apprentices of the Second Force  of Night
Wisdom.  

The Third Force is the Energy of the Night Spirit.  There is no one, who could better  embody
this Force, then its Keeper, Baal. As a Magickal Teacher, He seeks to impart to  His apprentices,
an Energy that is unknown in the world.  An Energy that is purely and  wholly of the Night
Spirit.  He teaches of an Energy that is totally impartial and a balm to  heal all wounds.  His
guidance sets the apprentice free of any limitations.  He teaches the  apprentice to be free of
dependance upon another's judgment, and above all, another's  will.  

The apprentice is the true disciple of the Night.  The apprentice gives their all in energy to  the
Night.  They see no differences in the races of humankind but know them all as the  Children of
the Night Spirit.  They are totally devoted to bringing all the world back under  the Night Spirit. 
To returning the world back to Yin.  This is the way of the Teachers and  apprentices in the
Third Force of Night Energy.  

The Fourth Force is the crossroad of the Night Forces of Life. You have seen that the first  Three
Forces, and the way that they are expressed in life, are wholly that of the Night  Spirit.  They
have their center of expression in the Magickal.  As you will see shortly, the  last three have
their expression and unfoldment on the material plane.  The Fourth Force  is, therefore,
referred to as the Crossroad of the Night Forces.  It is the Force of Balance,  Dignity, and Purity.  

This Force finds its expression through the Mighty Keeper, Lilith.  She is a very stern  Teacher,
but at the same time, has a very warm and loving sense of humor.  She is very  demanding of
Her apprentices to always do their best, and pushes them hard in all they  do.  Under Her
tutelage, the apprentice cannot fail but to grow magickally.  Her Presence  is very powerful and
noble, and once She visits Her apprentices, they will never forget  Her.  

The apprentice of the Fourth Force always tries to achieve balance in all they undertake.   They
are the excellent arbitrator.  They have the wonderful ability to see all the sides of  an issue. 
The only problem, here, is that the apprentice can be faced with indecision  because of this very
ability. Therefore, it is very necessary for the apprentice, no matter  the Life Force they're on, to
develop all of the Forces to the greatest degree of perfection  and balance possible.  The
apprentice seeks freedom through the perfection and purity of  their Inner Nature and the outer
world.  It is their way, to achieve perfection, through the  balance of both the magickal and
physical worlds.  This is the way of the Teachers and  apprentices in the Fourth Force of Night
Balance, Dignity, and Purity.

The Fifth Force is that of Knowledge.  The Keeper of the Fifth Force is Dagon.  This Force  finds
itself in great expression throughout the world.  The Keeper Dagon instructs the  apprentice in
the ways of knowledge that are to be found in the deep study of the ways  and laws of nature.   He
teaches that it is through the study of the Earth, and the learning  and understanding of its
concealed knowledge, that you as an apprentice can find your  Inner Freedom.  The Keeper
Dagon is a mighty Teacher and whose ways follow very  closely to those of Nature.  If you want
to know more about His Nature, then you must  study that of the Earth's.  
The apprentice of the Fifth Force seeks to find knowledge in the world.  The problem is  that
many students become lost in the seeming rigidity of Earth science.  The ordinary  person of
this Force is your scientist of today.  But, the apprentices of this Force must go  beyond what
seems the scientific knowledge of today.  They must study the ways of the  Earth and all of
nature, and from that study will come their Inner Freedom and Night  Consciousness.  This is
the way of the Fifth Force and its Teachers and apprentices.  

The Sixth Force is the return to the Way of Energy.  The Sixth Force is that of Devotion to  the
Night Spirit.  This is a very powerful Force and is embodied in its Keeper, Lucifer.  The  Keeper
Lucifer teaches the Force of Devotion to His apprentices. He brings into their  being the true and
burning feeling of Devotion to the Night Spirit.  He conveys, into their  world of feeling, the
devotion necessary to complete the journey to their Oversoul.  He  brings, to their Inner Vision,
the energy and power that is behind everything in the world of  nature and form.  He shows
them the power and energy that is behind all things, which is  the Night Spirit.  The Keeper
Lucifer is a very Radiant and Magnificent Being.  He is filled  with an Inner Yin Light and
Radiance that comes from the Exalted Devotion found within  Him. He is a very patient
Teacher as are all the Teachers of the Night.  The Keeper of the  Sixth Force has a true
understanding of all His apprentices.  

The devotion practiced by the apprentices allow them to find happiness in all that  happens to
them in life.  They except all that comes into their world knowing that, whether  it seems good
or bad at the time, that it is all for their magickal growth. They have true  belief and trust in the
Night Spirit.  They know that all their needs will be met through the  agency of the Night Spirit. 
This is the Sixth Force of Devotion to the Night Spirit and its  Teachers and apprentices.  

The Seventh Force is founded in creativeness through the Night Spirit.  The Seventh Force  is
the Beauty and Action of the Night Spirit.  This Force is found in rare and exalted form  in its
Keeper, Hecate.  The Keeper Hecate imparts to Her apprentices the Energy and  Beauty that is
found in all of the Night Spirit's Creation.  She teaches them how to create  using the Power and
Will of the Night Spirit.  She makes of them Magickal Channels for  the Creative  Power of the
Night Spirit to flow through.  She shows them that within all of  the Night Spirit's Creation,
flows Its Night Spirit, Beauty, Power, Will, and Action.  She is a  very beautiful and wise
Teacher.  She finds in all of Her apprentices the Magickal Beauty  and Action being expressed. 
She helps all Her apprentices to find within them the Touch  of the Magickal Artist.  

You see, then, the type of apprentices found under the Seventh Force of Beauty and  Action in
the Night Spirit.  The apprentices of the Seventh Force are very sensitive and  refined
individuals. They are the artists and artisans of life.  Through them flows the  Creative Power
and Will of the Night Spirit, and by the action of their steady minds,  feelings, and hands,
which are in tune to this Power, come the rare forms of creativity to  the world.  The
apprentices truly worship the Night Spirit in nature. They find in the power  and beauty of
nature, their Inner Self. There is no greater communion that can be found  by them, then that
within the Night Spirit found in nature.  The apprentices are able to  look upon the beauty and
power of a sunset over the ocean, a wooded landscape, or  mountainous scene, and feel, absorb,
and become that very power and beauty.  They can  even go further, by expressing that very
essence of the Night Spirit in painting,  sculpturing, composing, writing, or craftsmanship. 
The apprentices, through their talents,  can bring to others the power and beauty they feel
which is captured in a work of art.  The  Seventh Force has also been said to find expression in
the rite or ceremony.  

It doesn't matter whether that rite be of a magickal nature, or that of the coronation of a 
Queen/King, all rites are rooted in the Seventh Force of Beauty and Action of the Night  Spirit. 
For example, let's look at any rite that can be found in this book. What do you  see? 

In each rite, you find that all the acts in combination with each other form a true creation  of
art and beauty.  The acts, gestures, and movements of the Night Magicians officiating  and
participating are very graceful and add to the overall picture being painted.  You have  incense,
candles, altar cloth, background draperies perhaps, pictures of your favorite  Teachers, and
music in the background.  You then have the majestic and beautiful words  of the invocation
added to the whole.  The sum of all these different things add up to a  beautiful and majestic
work of creation.  Thus, you find many apprentices who are of the  Seventh Force involved in
rites.  They obtain to great magickal heights through the  instrument of the rite, whether they
are the participant or officiant.  This is the Seventh  Force of Beauty and Action of the Night
Spirit and its Teachers and apprentices. You have  now examined the Seven Forces of Life and
the Keeper of each of those Forces.  Let's  look, for a moment, at a few of the Night Teachers not
yet mentioned.  

Of the First Force we have Azazel, Leviathan, Santanas, and Amon. Of the Second Force  we
have Lucifuge Rofocale, Belial, and Azael.
Of the Third Force we have Endor, Abraxas, and Balan.  Of the Fourth Force we have  Astaroth,
Nisroch, and Bensozia.  Of the Fifth Force we have Agares, John Dee, Bifrons,  Belphegor, and
Alocer.  Of the Sixth Force we have Moloch, Astartes, and Marie Laveau.   Of the Seventh Force
we have Aleister Crowley, Armida, Cagliostro, Baphomet, and  Eliphas Levi. 
This is only a sampling of the many Night Teachers of the Seven Night Forces.  If any of  these
names happen to appeal to you in that special inner way then perhaps they are  your Teacher. 
Or you may have one who is not listed here.  Then through meditation,  Astral or Mental
Projection, or in some other manner you will come to know your Night  Teacher.  I assure you
that when the time is right you will become an apprentice of a  Night Teacher.   Remember, to
always study and work with the Night Teachers.  You must  always include them in the ways
and activities of your life.  You are a member of the  Night Guild, when you have entered upon
the Night Road and aid the Night Teachers in  the magickal evolution of life on Earth.  To aid
the Night Teachers you must learn to use  the Night Powers.     

44.  Night Powers

Inherent within you lie the dormant Powers of the Oversoul and Creation.  You can  actualize
these Powers when you have realized the Oversoul within you.  I intend to  discuss some of the
Powers of the Oversoul that are at your disposal.  Some of the  Powers that you will discover are
levitation, vibrational change, invisibility, weather  control, and the list goes on.  Some of
these Powers may already seem incredible to you,  but really they are just the outpouring of the
Oversoul's Power through you, when you live  in Its Consciousness and by Its Will.  All the
things that you have been studying and  practicing have been preparing you for this day when
you would put these Powers and  Knowledge into use.  When you use these Powers, you must
always use them under the  Direction of your Oversoul.  If you are ready to use these Powers of
the Oversoul then let's  begin with the first Power of Unlimited Thought Control.  

This may not sound like a specific Power but, indeed, it is. This is a very special concept  of
awareness that will unleash for you Powers untold.  It is virtually the key to the Universe  of
Life.  If you will stop reading for a moment, and look around the room, do you note  anything
out of the ordinary?  For most the answer would be No.  Yet, under the special  awareness you
are going to acquire the room around you is a very special place as is all  creation.  The room is
the way it is because your thoughts keep it just the way you have  always pictured it.  You have
become very conditioned in life to see material things as  concrete and solid.  The chair is a
chair and nothing will change that, you think!  But let's  stop again and see what really a chair
is.  

The chair is an aggregate or collection of molecules which are very dense and specifically 
arranged to form the chair.  The chair has wood, cloth, and metal molecules that make up  its
physical structure.  Suppose now, that a very hot fire came along and destroyed the  chair, what
has really happened to the chair? Well, the fire so accelerated the molecules  and released the
energy that binds all the molecules together, that it has transformed  some of the molecules to
ash and the others have been set free into the atmosphere.   They are now particles, so widely
scattered, that they can no longer be seen in the form of  a chair.  Is there anything else that
could do this to the chair?  Yes indeed, your very thoughts could do the same to the molecules of
the chair.  This is  that very special state of awareness that I was discussing earlier.  Your
thoughts help  chain the molecules together to form what you think of as a chair.  You see, feel,
and  know that this is a chair and that is all it is.  But if you use your Oversoul Awareness and 
Thought, you can release the energy that binds the molecules of the chair into its physical 
form, and then it will no longer be a chair.  You, then, can release the molecules back  into the
atmosphere, remold the molecules into some other form, or rebind them into its  original
form.  There is a much greater use of the First Power.   You could use this Power on your own
physical structure.  Any ideas on what would  happen?  Remember, that your physical body is
just a repository for your emotions and  consciousness.   You are not the body, but Pure
Oversoul Awareness and Thought.  If you  release the thoughts that bind the physical body into
its material form, then it would  become formless.  Yet your consciousness has complete
control of all the physical  molecules. You would be aware of your body as a million pinpoints
of light. If you desire  to go anywhere, at anytime, all you have to do is think of that time and
place and you  would be there.  To regain your material form, all you have to do is release the
thought  that unleashed the binding power of the molecules.  This is perhaps the most
important  concept you will ever learn.  It is the essence of many of the other Powers that you
will  learn.  The concept, therefore, bears repeating.  

It is your thoughts that literally bind you to limitation and the material world.  If you  unleash
the thoughts that bind your physical structure, or anything in your world, you  become
formless and free of any physical restrictions.  Through this Power, you will have  total control
over your physical form or any material thing.  If you unleash the material  thoughts that bind
you to anything, and replace it with the Oversoul Thought, then you  become unlimited and
free.  
The Second Power is like the first, and it is Vibrational Control over all that is.  Imagine for  a
moment that you have been caught in a building that is on fire and you cannot get out,  what are
you going to do?  You are going to use the Second Power of Vibrational Control  and walk
through the fire unharmed.  That's right!  You are going to walk right through the  fire, and it
will never hurt you.  It really is not so incredible as it may seem. The fire has a  high
vibrational rate and energy.  The molecules around you are in a very high state of  agitation
and are combining with oxygen, giving off heat, flame, and light.  If you can raise  the
vibrational rate of your physical body to a very high rate, higher then that of the fire,  through
the Oversoul Awareness and Thought, then you will go unharmed by the fire. You  can do this
not only for your physical body but for anything you desire to change the  vibrational rate of. 
Further, you not only can raise the vibrational rate but you can also  lower the rate of vibration
in all things.  

This leads you into the Third Power of Invisibility.  The first thing that comes to your mind, 
when you think of invisibility, is the legends of the invisible man.  It is true, though, that  you
can become invisible.  Not only can you become invisible, but you can create  invisibility in
anything.  There are two ways of doing this, and the first uses the power just  discussed of
vibrational control.  

If you raise the vibrational rate of the entity high enough, the molecules will vibrate at  such an
extremely high rate that light will simply pass through them and, so, you have  invisibility.  It
is only when light can fall on a sufficiently dense article, and be reflected off  of it, that it can be
seen.  This is the first type of invisibility.  The second revolves around  the absence of thought.  

The second type will allow you to remain physically solid, yet invisible to others.  When  you
emit thought from your mind, you have learned that this is an energy which all are  sensitive
to. It is your thoughts that make you visible to others.  So to achieve invisibility,  you must
erect a shield that completely encloses you and that will not permit any thought  energy to
escape.  You do this by visualizing the Oversoul Energy completely surrounding  and inclosing
you.  You then project, into this Oversoul Energy Screen, with Oversoul  Thought, the Power
that all your thoughts will remain enclosed within this capsule, and so  you will be invisible. 
For a moment, let's change pace and look at something that may be  causing many of you some
trouble, and that is what I mean by the Oversoul Awareness,  Thought, Energy, and other terms
used in relation to the Oversoul.  

If you are to put this topic to successful use in your life, then you must understand  something
very basic to Night Magick.  You are the Oversoul! If you can't understand this  very simple
concept, then you should go back and read topics six and seven. For it is only  when you truly
know that you are the Oversoul in Power, Energy, and Consciousness, that  you will accomplish
anything in this current topic.  When I speak of Oversoul Awareness,  you know yourself as the
Oversoul in Consciousness and Power.  You know, that you have  the full use of Its
Consciousness and Power for it is your consciousness and power.  There  is no difference, or
separation, between yourself and the Oversoul. You are One in All  Things.  Study, learn, and
know this to the Inner Depths of Your Being and you have  mastered all.  

Let's resume, now, with the Fourth Power of Multiple Being.   The concept of this may seem
difficult, but study and try to follow along.  When I speak of  multiple being, I speak of having
your physical presence in more then one place, at the  same time. The key word, here, is
physical.  You can do this in several ways.  To begin  with, you can separate your Astral Body,
from your physical form, and retain  consciousness in both.  Then, you can lower the
vibrational rate of the Astral Body till it  can be seen and touched.  To be in even more places,
you can build a copy of your  physical form, out of the Oversoul Energy, and again condense and
lower the Energy  Form until it can be seen and felt. Then, you will place your consciousness in
control of it,  and use it as you would use your own physical body.  There is no limit to the
number of  the Oversoul Energy forms you can make.  You must keep control over each form
and  sustain it with your Oversoul Energy and Consciousness.  Either you maintain complete 
Oversoul Control and Consciousness over each form, or they will return to the Eternal 
Darkness.  The Fifth Power is that of Levitation.  You know the physical law on Earth that 
"opposites attract".  You have also seen the experiment whereby you take two magnets  and
place the like ends, that is either both North or South ends of the magnets, facing  each other,
they will repel each other.  The Earth has a certain polarity, and you have a  certain polarity,
which keep you both together.  If you can reverse your polarity such that it  is the same as the
Earth, then you will be repelled by the Earth and so, levitate above it.   To accomplish this
requires a combination of Night Breathing and the drawing upon, and  application of the
Earth's Energy around and through your body.  There is an easier way  of doing levitation.  If
you use the Power of Vibrational Control and slowly raise the  vibrational rate of the molecules
of your body, the body will become like the sky.  The  body will become very light and float
above the Earth.  You can direct your movement and  height by Oversoul Thought.  Remember
though, that the body is still subject to lack of  oxygen and the cold of extreme heights.  This is
Levitation.  

The Sixth Power is that of Weather Control.  In order to understand how to control the 
weather, you must understand the Powers behind the weather.  These Powers have been  known
by some as Nature Souls, Elves, Fairies, or Elementals.  They are in almost all  legends of every
country in the world.  They are behind everything that is in Mother  Earth's Realm.  There are
Nature Souls of the Earth, ranging from small ones over the  flowers and plants to those Great
and powerful ones over the mountains.  There are  Nature Souls over the waters, again ranging
from the small ones of brooks to the great  Kings and Queens of the Oceans.  There are those who
are responsible over the Magickal  Energies of the Earth and the elements of fire.  The ones who
are responsible for your  weather can be found in charge of the air.  There are elementals who
guide the rains.   The great ones are responsible for the great winds and their directions. It is
they, in  combination with each other, that create the various weather patterns.  If you are
going to  control the weather, then you must solicit the help of the air Nature Souls. The secret
to  gaining the aid of the Air Spirits and all Spirits is to know that they obey the Oversoul.  
Thus, when you ask for a specific weather condition, you must do so as the Oversoul on  Earth. 
Remember, that you are responsible for whatever you ask for.  If you ask for sunny  and bright
days, then that is what you will get, but if rain was originally planned, then you  must
remember to set aside a period for this to occur, too.  If you want a day or two of  good weather
then fine, but then you should turn over the controls of the weather back to  Mother Earth and
the Air Spirits, or you will cause grave harm that you will be responsible  for.  

The Seventh Power is that of Knowing the essence of all things with or without form.  This  is a
very important Power, or concept, that will unfold for you many Powers that lie within  your
Oversoul Being.  The first essential key to achieving this Power is the mastery of  meditation. 
In meditation, you began learning to concentrate on a particular subject and  its true essence. 
You tried to come to know a particular subject as best as you could.   You wanted to learn its very
nature and feel that nature within you.  Now you are going to  take this concept or Power to its
Nth degree.  For example, you are going to examine a  tree.  You will begin by meditating on the
tree.  You will study its outer form and the way  it moves and behaves, but then you are going to
go much farther.  You are going to go on  and feel what it is to be a tree.  You are going to come to
know, and feel yourself as a  tree.  You will feel the wind blowing through your limbs and
leaves.  To feel the warm sun  as it shines upon you and gives you new life.  To feel the Earth
below you and your roots  sunk deep into it, pulling up water and nourishment to help you grow. 
To go back into  your memories and remember what it was like to be a seedling, and the first
feel of the  sun and rain upon your newly risen face.  You are going to become the Tree in all its 
eternal essence of life.  There will be nothing that you will not know about the Tree.  You  will
come to know its beginning and ending.  You will come to know, and be, the sum of  the Tree. 
You will go on and develop this Power not only for animate things, but  inanimate objects. 
Then, you will also develop it for things without form, such as the sky  and energy.  
If you achieve all of this, then you are ready to attempt the Eighth Power of Great Personal 
Strength.  Here, you are going to activate the Seventh Power on the great beings of  strength. 
This would include the elephant, whale, and bear.  You are going to become all  that they are,
but you will specifically come to know them for their great personal strength.   Then, you are
going to absorb that physical power within your own being.  If you have  done this correctly and
completely, you will have the physical power of these animals as  long as you remain under the
Seventh Power.  

This also gives you the Ninth Power of Great Personal Speed.  If you will use the seventh  Power
on the deer, elk, and gazelle, you will again become all they are in personal  speed.  You will be
able to move across land with their terrific speed.  There are so many  things that you can use
the Seventh Power for, that will bring to you added knowledge and  wisdom.  

If you study, intensely, the World of Form and its relation in Time and Space, you will find 
that you can move along its line of history, either forward or backward.  You know that  time is
only a relative thing.  You have experienced, in Astral and Mental Projection, that  what
seemed only a few moments in those realms actually was hours here on Earth.  If  you truly
come to know Creation, Time, and Space as the Oversoul sees them, then you  will be able to
know both the past and future.  You must become their essence.  If you  study the essence of
another person, and become all that s/he is in essence, then you will  know all there is to know
of her/him.  The very essence of any person is found in the  Oversoul.  

If you study the Essence of your own Oversoul, it would be the same as studying the  person in
question.  For in your own Oversoul, is the Oversoul of the person, and within  the Oversoul of
the person is locked all that s/he was, is, and ever will be. If you study  your own Eternal
Essence, you will come to know many things.  Your Eternal Essence can  reveal to you your past
lives. It can unfold for you why you came down here.  By studying  why you came here, and the
things that you must clear up, you can come to know the time  of your own passing from this
Earth.  By studying the Eternal Essence of your Oversoul,  with the application of the Seventh
Power, there is nothing that you will not know.  All the  Powers of the Oversoul will become
yours, when you have become the total essence of  that which you study, the Eternal Essence. 
There will be no other Powers to search for,  since you will have become the Power Itself.  Yet
there will always be the unveiling and  unfolding of the Powers of the Oversoul within you as
you climb towards the Eternal Night.   In addition to learning and using the Night Powers you
must also learn to use the Night  Flames.  

45.  Night Flames 

And the Night Flames blazed before the Living Throne of the Eternal Darkness, who are a  part
of Its Living Night Spirit, and by Its Will the Flames went forth into formless matter  and there
was Creation.  

These are the Night Flames that you are about to study and use. As the Night Flames are  a part
of the Eternal Night, so they are a part of your Oversoul.  As with the Night Powers,  when you
live in the Consciousness and Will of your Oversoul, so you too may use and  create with the
Night Flames.  You are going to study the general nature and use of the  Night Flames, and then
examine each Night Flame individually.  Finally, I will discuss  how you can invoke the Night
Flames and use them in your world.  If you are ready, let's  begin your general instruction of the
Night Flames. 

The Night Flames you will be studying are the Black, Violet, Blue, Green, Yellow, Orange,  Red,
Silver, and Rainbow Flames. You may have noticed right away that the majority of  the Night
Flames are named after a type of color.   If you will review some information  about colors, for a
moment, you will see the difference.  

You will remember that light is a type of energy.  Colors were a product of light.  The  energy of
colors was of a passive nature, and was effective by inducing a sympathetic  reaction on what
they were used.  Night Flames have their origin in the Eternal Darkness.   You will find that the
use of the Night Flames is a very active process.  The Night Flames  are very active energies,
which cause a change to take place according to the nature of  the Night Flame.  The Night
Flames are effective in changing people and the world.  There  are many other uses for the Night
Flames, and their discussion will be reserved to the  study of each individual Night Flame. 
Each Night Flame has its particular properties and  uses.  Therefore, let's begin by studying the
first Night Flame, the Black Flame.  

The Black Flame of the Oversoul brings into the world the Purity and Perfection of the  Night. 
If you wish to create the conditions of purity and perfection in a person or world  condition, you
can do so with this Flame.  For example, if you find that there is a state of  imperfection
existing in something or someone, that needs help in being erased, this  would be the Flame to
use.  If you find a Yang condition or person using the Yang energy  then this Flame will change
the balance to the Night. By using this Flame you can  maintain the Eternal Night Balance.
This is the Black Flame.  

The second is the Violet Flame of Transmutation.  The Violet Flame is the Flame of 
Transmutation or Change.  The Violet Flame transmutes Yang energy back into Pure  Night
Energy.  If you look at yourself, for example, what kind of person is it you see at the  end of the
day?  You find a person who has been saturated in the Yang energy of the  world.  People and
conditions have constantly, throughout the day, been filling your world  with harmful energy. 
You feel irritable, nervous, angry, run-down, and a host of other  Yang conditions.  The Violet
Flame can change all this.  You can apply this energy to your  own world, or to those of others,
and completely transmute the Yang energy into Yin.   You will restore your Night Self and feel a
true sense of buoyancy and upliftment.  By  using this Violet Flame, on yourself, you will be
able to have a greater flow of the Oversoul  Energy through you.  You will have eliminated the
energy which blocks the natural flow of  the Oversoul Energy into your world. It is good to use
this Violet Flame first, before using  any of the other Night Flames.  Use this Flame, always in
conjunction with the Night  Pillar.  This is the Violet Flame.

The next Night Flame is the Blue Flame.  The Blue Flame creates harmony and peace in  all
people and conditions.  If there is any lack of harmony or peace, either in a person or 
condition, then you can use the Blue Flame to change all that.  You could use the Blue  Flame on
unhappy marriages.  You could use it on unhappy business partners or between  unhappy firms. 
The uses are only limited by the extent of your imagination.  Remember  though, that the use of
the Blue Flame may not be the only Flame needed in a situation to  bring about lasting change. 
One or more Flames, used in conjunction with each other,  may be necessary to cure all the
problems and create a final and lasting change.  This is  the Blue Flame. 

The fourth Night Flame is the Green Flame.  The Green Flame is the Flame of Healing.   You will
use it extensively in the Healing Topic that soon follows.  It is the way of the  Oversoul Healing.
It brings about the healing of all people and conditions.  The healing of  people is easy for you to
understand, but what is the healing of conditions?   There are  many conditions which need the
healing power of the Green Flame.  The Green Flame  can heal the broken heart.  It doesn't
matter whether its broken through the loss of a love  one through transition into the next
world, or an unhappy love affair.  The Green Flame  can heal the pain or sorrow of a nation
over some unhappy event.  The Green Flame not  only mends the body but also the heart.  This
is the Green Flame of Healing. 

The fifth is the Yellow Flame of Wisdom and Intelligence. The Yellow Flame of Wisdom  and
Intelligence is a very powerful energy.  It can bring to you the Wisdom necessary to  see through
a decision that has to be made.  The application of the Yellow Flame can  raise your Magickal
Consciousness to the highest of heights so that you may perceive  Magickal Knowledge.  A
person cannot lie under the Power of the Yellow Flame.  The  Yellow Flame can increase the
power of your intellect and improve your memory. This is  the Yellow Flame.  

The sixth Night Flame that you will study is the Orange Flame. The Orange Flame  produces
energy into the substance it is used on.  If you need an energy pickup this is a  good Flame.  If a
situation is moving slowly in your life then use the Orange Flame.  The  Orange Flame is heavy
with Yang energy so be careful and not get burnt by using it.  

The seventh Night Flame is the Red Flame.  The Red Flame is an intense form of the  Orange
Flame.  You will have to be careful in its use for it can cause extreme  nervousness and
irritability if used too much.  The Red Flame can remove depressing  situations or emotions. 
The Red Flame can speed up the process of healing in the human  body.  

The eighth Night Flame is the Silver Flame.  The Silver Flame will purify the subconscious 
world.  It will keep the subconscious in the Yin Flow.  The Silver Flame is good for 
counteracting too much Yang Energy.  The Silver Flame is good for healing sunburn or if  your
ever burnt by Yang Energy.

The ninth and final Night Flame is the Rainbow Flame.  The Rainbow Flame does not  really
exist in Creation of its own.  It is a composite of all the Flames together.  The  Rainbow Flame is
created by you acting as the Oversoul on Earth.  It is through your  Power and Will as the
Oversoul on Earth, acting as the Creator, that you bring the  Rainbow Flame into the world. 
The use of this Flame should be obvious.  The Flame is  something of a Universal Cure-all.  If
you are in doubt about which Flame to use, or the  situation seems to require a majority of all
the Flames together, the Rainbow Flame is the  answer.  It will require your all to hold all the
Flames together in order that they act as the  Rainbow Flame.  It will require the Night
Magician, in Night Consciousness, to create,  hold, and use the Rainbow Flame on Earth.  You
must remember then, that because this  Flame does not exist of its own, that it may have less
power then the other Night Flames  depending on you.  

This is all the Night Flames that I will present in this topic. There are more but their use in  the
world is restricted.  I have discussed the Night Flames in general, and individually,  now it is
time to teach you how to invoke and wield them. 

Before you ever use the Night Flames, you should give very careful consideration as to  exactly
what is the right type of Night Flame necessary to do the job.  The Night Flames  must be
invoked through the Presence of the Oversoul.  The Oversoul is the channel  through which the
Night Flames pass.  Therefore, you must be in the highest state of  Night Consciousness possible
in order to invoke these Flames into the material world.   You should be prepared bodily,
emotionally, and mentally as you would for anything you  do in Night Magick.  You must be
prepared magickally, by reaching the greatest state of  Oneness with your Oversoul.  The
quality and quantity of the individual Night Flame you  wish to invoke into this world, is
based directly on your self-preparation.  As you are able  to reach farther and higher into Night
Consciousness, so will the quantity and strength of  the Night Flame increase.  You must
invoke and use the Night Flames often, if they are to  achieve the desired results.  Now, let's get
down to the specifics on how to invoke the  Night Flames.  

I will use the invoking of the Black Flame as an example.  The invoking of the other Night 
Flames is similar, and requires the same basic procedures as outlined here.  To begin  with, you
need to be in the highest state of Night Consciousness possible. Thus, you will  begin with a
period of meditation on your Oversoul.   When you are ready, redirect the  focus of your
meditation from your Oversoul to the Black Flame.  When you feel the  highest of heights, in
Night Consciousness, and have come to know the Black Flame of  Purity and Perfection of the
Oversoul, then you are ready to begin the invocation or  invoking of the Flame.   You should
have already prepared your Magician's Study and  your Night Altar.  Standing before the Night
Altar, you begin by seeing yourself as the  Oversoul on Earth and robed in blazing Yin Energy. 
You invoke the Great Black Flame by  saying: 

"By the Presence of the Oversoul within me I am invoking the Great Black Flame of the 
Oversoul's Purity and Perfection through me.  I AM seeing this Black Flame descending  from
above and filling my being with Its Essence and Power.  I AM then placing it here  before me on
the Altar of the Night, there to collect and concentrate into a blazing Night  Black Flame.  Now,
oh blazing Night Black Flame, I AM commanding thee by the Power of  the Presence of the
Oversoul in me, to obey my Will as the Oversoul on Earth."  

This is your invocation through which you invoke or draw into your world the Black Flame.  
Invocations for the other Night Flames are found in Appendix A.  Thus, you should have 
envisioned the blazing Black Flame, descending out of the Oversoul and into your mortal 
form.  Then, you should have directed the Black Flame through your heart Night Center  and
out onto the Night Altar. There, you collect and intensify Its Presence into a blazing  Black
Flame Star.  Once you have the sufficient amount of Black Flame to do the task at  hand (you'll
know how much by Oversoul Direction), you then must visualize the task to be  accomplished.
You then direct the Black Flame with your Oversoul Will to where you want  the action of it to
take place.  Then, you will go on to visualize the Black Flame Action  taking place and see and
know that it has happened.  Then you give thanks to your  Oversoul. This is the way you invoke
the Black Flame and all other Night Flames.  

I hope you are not ready to stop here in the unfoldment of your Oversoul Powers, Flames,  and
Causal Body.  Your next subject is directed at the unfoldment of all these, into Night 
Consciousness. 


46.  Night Rites

The Night Rites are defined as any exercises or practices which ultimately gain the  freedom of
the Soul from imperfection and the cycle of death and rebirth into the material  world.  They
are exercises in becoming the Yin Light of the Night Spirit.  They are  practices that will
eventually lead you into Magickal Perfection.  There are four Night  Rites that will be
introduced here.  They are, in order of discussion, the Dark Sun  Meditation, the Inner Cavern
of the Dark Sun, the Night Energy Beam, and the Magician's  Night Body.  I will begin this
discussion with the Dark Sun Meditation if you are ready.  

In the Dark Sun Meditation, you will review who the Great Being is in the Dark Sun; what It 
represents; and Its path.  Then, you will learn the benefits of the Dark Sun Meditation;  how to
perform the Dark Sun Meditation; and becoming One with the Blazing Dark Sun.   Where is the
Dark Sun? 

The actual physical body of the Dark Sun Goddess/God is the dark sun system itself with  all its
planets, moons, dark sun, and solar sun.  As the human body has a solar plexus so  does the
dark sun system.  This is the solar sun.  The physical dark sun is located  adjacent to the solar
sun and is akin to the human heart Night Center.  As said before,  part of the function of the
dark sun is to channel off excess solar energies from the solar  sun. The dark sun Night Center
is the heart of the dark sun system and is the focus of the  Great Night Entity who is the Living
Night Force of the dark sun system.  The planets,  moons, solar sun, and dark sun are the Night
Centers of the physical body of the Dark Sun  Goddess/God.  Who is the Dark Sun Goddess/God
?  

It is difficult to imagine an Entity who is so far ahead of you in magickal evolution, as is  the
Dark Sun Spirit.  Even though I have already discussed the Dark Sun Goddess/God  and Its
Magickal Nature, let's take the time to review again Its Eternal Nature. It will be  important to
do so in relation to the Dark Sun Meditation and Night Rites.  

The Dark Sun Goddess/God is on an even higher magickal plateau then the Planetary  Night
Spirits.  You can look on the physical dark sun, in relation to the Dark Sun  Goddess/God, as
similar to yourself and your own heart Night Center.  The Dark Sun  Goddess/God is
Omnipresent, Omniscient, and Omnipotent.  Its Radiation effects you and  all humankind.  You
are Its grandchild and a part of your Spirit is shaped by Its Living  Presence.  It is indeed very
difficult to understand a Living Entity who is multidimensional.   Its Night Spirit is very much
like the physical dark sun itself.  

The dark sun pours out life-giving yin light, warmth, and energy to all that lives and grows  on
the surrounding planets.  Its Night Spirit pours out to life: Energy, Warmth, and Night  Force. It
is the Goddess/God of the dark sun system. It watches over you and sustains the  Magickal Light
that guides you.  Yet, It, too, is advancing on the Magickal Path that leads  to the Eternal Night. 
The only thing is that It is far, far ahead on the very same path that  you have just begun to
tread.  It shows you that you, too, can become all that It is if you  but try.  You are going to find
that meditating on Its Presence, centered in the dark sun, is  going to bring you great help
magickally and physically.  

The power of the dark sun has a truly transforming effect over your physical body.  As you 
practice the Dark Sun Meditation, the power of the dark sun coursing through your body  will
transform every cell in it.  You will find every cell in your body becoming renewed  through the
Night Energy of the dark sun.  The power of the dark sun will transform every  cell into a
miniature dark sun. The power of the dark sun will bring great Healing Energies  into your
body.  The dark sun will transform every diseased part of your body back into  perfect health. 
Whether you suffer from cancer, or a cold, the power of the dark sun will  overcome their effect. 
The dark sun will bring a truly energizing effect over the body.  If  you are low on energy, you
will not be after the Dark Sun Meditation.  These are just the  physical effects of the Dark Sun,
there are still the magickal effects to consider.  

You will find that the Power of the Dark Sun Goddess/God will transport you into the  highest
of consciousness.  You will be able to draw the Power of the Dark Sun  Goddess/God into your
magickal vehicles and fill them with supercharged Night Energy.  The effect upon your more
magickal vehicles will be truly amazing.  On the Astral, Mental,  and Causal Realms, your
vehicles will glow with a Yin Light only seen in the Magickal  Dark Sun of the Universe.  Each
vehicle will become a better channel through which the  Power of the Night Spirit can flow
freely.  You become transformed into the Dark Crystal  Channel of Yin Light.  The constant use
of the Dark Sun Meditation will bring truly  amazing growth in your magickal vehicles.  They
will become like the Dark Sun  Goddess/God themselves.  Now that you see the valuable reasons
for doing the Dark Sun  Meditation, let's learn how to do it.  

Actually, the technique is very easy.  You can practice this rite at any time and any place.   If
you do it outdoors then you should do it in the shade.  You will also be able to do this  rite at
night.  This is because the physical energies of the dark sun can penetrate through  all things. 
You will prepare yourself as always by surrounding yourself in the Night Pillar.   You should be
seated on the ground in whatever manner is most comfortable to you.  You  should have your
legs crossed and your hands open on your legs with palms down during  the day and palms up
during the night.  Then, you begin the actual part of the Dark Sun  Meditation.  

With your eyes closed, direct your Night Eye so that it is facing up into the Dark Sun.   Then you
must become very relaxed and allow your thoughts to drift.  Now draw into  yourself the Power
of the Dark Sun.  This Power will come to you as a dark ray of intense  Night Force filled with
Life, Warmth, and Energy.  Feel and move this Power down through  your body slowly.  First,
consciously move it into the head and see its effect there.  Then  move it on into the upper chest
and arms.  Continue to go on through the body slowly,  allowing the total effect of the Power to
take place in each part of the body.  Then just  relax and bathe in the glow of the Power of the
Dark Sun.  Next, you will move on to the  magickal vehicles.  

Here, you are going to project yourself consciously towards the dark sun.  This is the  same
technique you used in Mental Projection.  You are going to go to the dark sun itself  in your
magickal vehicles.  As you approach the dark sun, you are going to feel the full  effects of its
Magickal Power.  You are going to keep moving towards the dark sun until  you have merged
with its Presence.  You are going to become a part of the Dark Sun in  Night Spirit.  Here again,
you are going to draw the Power through your magickal  vehicles.  Feel the Power blazing and
coursing through your magickal bodies changing  them into miniature Dark Suns..  You should
then relax your magickal presence in the  Magickal Presence of the Dark Sun.  This is where
your real Dark Sun Meditation begins.  

You are going to become One with the Blazing Dark Sun.  You are going to meditate on  Its
Magickal Presence.  The Dark Sun is like your heart Night Center.  You will remember  that in
your own heart Night center is located the miniature Oversoul.  It is here you can  meet the very
Presence of your own Oversoul.  It is your Oversoul's magickal anchor in  your own world.  In
the Heart of the dark sun, you can meet the very Presence of the Dark  Sun Spirit.  Here is the
focus of Its Oversoul Consciousness.  You can do this only when  you have risen to the highest of
consciousness.  You must know yourself as the Oversoul.   It is in the Heart of the Dark Sun,
that you can meet the Night Spirit of the Dark System.   You must meditate on Its Presence and
become all that it is.  If you can do this, then you  will become One with Its Living Night Spirit
and become the Blazing Dark Sun. Then, you  must end this meditation.  

You do so by slowly withdrawing your magickal consciousness back into your physical  body. 
Do this be concentrating on your breathing.  Then you will slowly start to move your  fingers
and toes.  Continue to slowly move all parts of the body until you feel that you are  physically
whole again.  Remember, in closing, to thank the Dark Sun Goddess/God Its  Power and
Presence in your life.  This is the Dark Sun Meditation.  The next rite covers  something I began
to discuss in the last rite.  

This is the aspect of the miniature Oversoul in the heart Night Center, or the Inner Cavern  of
the Dark Sun.  You are going to come to know, very well, the fourth Night Center and  the
Oversoul within it.  You are going to build the Inner Cavern of the Dark Sun within the  heart
Night Center, and learn to enter within it and thereby come into rapport with the  Oversoul. 
Through this, you will learn the power revealed to you in the fourth Night  Center.  Let's begin
with the fourth Night Center and the Dark Sun Spirit found within it.  

You will recall from our previous discussion of the fourth Night Center, that as it starts to 
unfold in you, you become aware of the feelings and emotions in others.  You develop  genuine
magickal empathy with those around you.  To those you are really close with, this  empathy
will extend across vast distances. Distance will make absolutely no difference in  the power of
your fourth Night Center.  I have said before that the heart is the center of  your Magickal Being. 
It is the site of your magickal anchor.  I mean, by this, that the silver  cord that proceeds out of
the heart of your Oversoul is anchored in your heart Night  Center.  This silver cord is also tied
into the sixth Night center, or your Night Eye.  In the  heart Night Center, at the end of the silver
cord, is what you would liken to a miniature  dark sun.  It is from this miniature dark sun that
the energy comes to sustain your physical  life.  It is this miniature dark sun which is the
primary focus of your Oversoul in the  material worlds. This miniature dark sun exists on the
physical, Astral, Mental, and Causal  Realms.  Your Oversoul is tied in to all these planes of life
and is aware of all that takes  place within you on these levels.  In the beginning of your
progress on Earth, the Oversoul  is not very concerned with your lives.  

This is because you are shut off from Its Presence and Will. Therefore, the power of this 
miniature dark sun is very small. The Oversoul will invest very little power and energy into 
someone who is unconcerned with doing Its Will.  But as you begin to listen to the Inner  Voice
within, and obey Its Will, then the power of the miniature dark sun begins to expand  and
increase in intensity and brilliance till the dark sun is no longer miniature, but fills the  entire
being of the Night Magician. Then you become One in the Dark Sun or Night  Consciousness.  As
you entered into the heart of the dark sun and meditated upon the  Presence of the Dark Sun
Goddess/God so you can enter into the miniature dark sun and  enter into rapport and
communion with the Oversoul.  To come into rapport with the Inner  Oversoul, you are going to
visualize and build within your heart Night Center, the Inner  Cavern of the Dark Sun.  You
will, as always, enter into your Magician's Study and place  yourself in whatever way is a
comfortable position.  Then, you will place the Night Pillar  around you, and relax as much as
possible.  Next you are going to visualize the place that  you would think is appropriate to meet
your Oversoul in.  You begin by turning your  consciousness inward and directing it towards the
heart Night Center.  You will visualize  yourself descending within your Inner Being and finally
coming to rest in the heart Night  Center.  Then envision entering a beautiful cavern.  This
cavern should be seen so real  that you can even smell it.  This place should be envisioned with
all of your magickal  talents.  It is a very real place and should be looked upon as such.  Once
you have the  Inner Cavern created, you are ready to enter into the Cavern.  As you enter into
the  Cavern, you see before you a great Night Altar.  The Night Altar is made of the purest  black
marble.  There upon the Night Altar is a great blazing Dark Sun of the Yin Light.   The
brilliance of the Dark Sun is magnificent.  From the Dark Sun, you can feel warmth  and
energy being beamed at you.  You feel a power pulling you closer to the Dark Sun.   As you
approach closer to the Dark Sun, you begin to see the Image of a Great Being  standing within
the center of the Dark Sun.  As you gaze upon Its Face, you see your face,  only it is a face set in
power and energy.  You can feel the power and glory radiating from  the Presence of the
Oversoul within the Blazing Dark Sun.  Then you will find yourself  sitting before the Presence
of your Oversoul and receiving instruction from It.  You will  find yourself bathing in the Power
and Energy that is radiating from Its Dark Presence.  You will feel knowledge and instruction
filling your entire presence.  Then, you will know  when the time has come to leave the Inner
Cavern and return to the outer world.  So  retrace your steps out of the Inner Cavern of the Dark
Sun and find yourself floating back  out into the world.  You will again, come out of this Night
Rite the same as you did the  Dark Sun Meditation. Once you have experienced this Night Rite,
you will know the Power  located within your Inner Being.  You will find, through this rite, that
whenever you have a  question, that you can take it into the Dark Heart of the Oversoul.  You
can go into the  center of the Inner Dark Sun and gain Wisdom and Energy.  You can go into the
Inner  Cavern and find Healing, Understanding, Peace, and Happiness.  You need never feel, or 
be alone in the Presence of the Oversoul.  It is here that you will find the center of your  life and
intelligence.  It is here that you will find the center of your Oversoul and the Night  Powers.  It is
this very center of the Night Power that leads you to your next Night Rite, the  Night Energy
Beam.  

You are aware that the physical dark sun, that shines over the world, is a giver of warmth  and
Yin Light.  You have also seen that no matter whether the Dark Sun is a physical or  magickal
one under discussion, that it gives off immense amounts of Radiation, Yin Light,  and Power. 
You have also found out, that there is a Magickal Dark Sun blazing within the  Inner Depths of
your Being. The Power and Light that radiates off from your Magickal  Dark Sun is very
dispersed.  The Yin Light radiates off at all angles. What if you could  take this Power and
Energy and reflect it into a narrow, concentrated beam of the Night  Energy?  Let's look at a
modern day example, the laser.  

In the laser, we have turned a normal power and light source into a very concentrated  beam of
light energy.  The laser light is many more times powerful then its origin.  This is  what you are
going to do in this Night Rite.  You are going to  take the Power and Light  that comes from your
Inner Magickal Dark Sun, and concentrate it into a very powerful  beam of Night Energy.  This
rite again calls for visualization.  You should retire to your  Magician's Study until you become
adept in the use of the Night Energy.  In your  Magician's Study, you will find peace and quiet in
which to work.  As you become adept at  its use, you will be able to put this rite into practice no
matter where you are.  You will  begin by visualizing your heart Night Center running parallel
with your body.  That is, you  should envision the Night Center as a large round disk, with a
slight curvature in it, placed  in front of you like a large shield.  Then, you are going to envision,
centered in front of the  Night Center, the miniature dark sun.  Once you have envisioned all of
this, then you are  ready to transmit the Night Energy.  As you envision the Night Center, and
the Dark Sun in  front of it, the Energy begins to build-up.  The Night Energy begins to become 
concentrated, magnified in intensity, and then, suddenly, will beam forth from your  presence. 
What are you going to do with it? 

You are not only the emitter of the Night Energy, but you are also the director of it.  Not  only
visualize the emission of this Night Energy, but you must also visualize its direction  and use.
The beam will go wherever you direct it.  You do not have to be facing in the  right direction for
it to go where you want it. All you have to do is envision where it is  going, with the
Consciousness of Oversoul, and it will do so.  Now, you must consider its  uses.  The beam itself
is of Pure Night Energy.  It is filled with the Oversoul's Energy and  Power.  The person or
situation that it is aimed at, will be filled with the Energy and Power  of Oversoul.  If the
situation or person is basically of the Night Spirit then the beam will  not harm the person or
situation in any way.  It will bring only Energy, Healing, and  Happiness to them.  But if the
person or situation is in a state of inharmony and discord,  then the beam of Night Energy will
change that.  The beam will bring about what the  emitter envisions happening.  Nothing can
resist or fight the Oversoul Energy.  It will only  magnify and increase in intensity till the
change comes about.  The beam can also be  used as a carrier wave of your Oversoul Direction. 
Whatever you project, in Night  Consciousness, into the beam, the beam will bring into
manifestation.  If someone is  trying to hurt you with harmful energy, you can direct the beam
at the harmful energy  sent, and change it into Night Energy and return it to its source, even if
you do not know  who the source is.  This is the Night Rite of the Night Energy Beam.  So far, you
have  been in the Night Presence of the Dark Sun Goddess/God, you have been in the miniature 
Dark Sun, and have learned to direct the Energy of the Night.  Now, you are going to  become a
Dark Sun.  

You are going to develop the Magician's Night Body and become a Dark Sun.  The  Magician's
Night Body is, indeed, unique.  You have meditated on the Presences of the  Dark Sun
Goddess/God and Personal Oversoul, and thus it should be well rooted in you,  the feeling of
being a Dark Sun.  In developing the Magician's Night Body, begin by  dwelling on the Eternal
Presences of the Dark Sun Goddess/God and Oversoul.  You must  become filled with Their
Energy and Substance.  The Yin Light for your Magician's Night  Body will come from your
heart Night Center.  See the Yin Light filling your entire being,  that is, physical, emotional,
mental, and magickal.  The Light that you are going to  become is exceedingly dark.  Yet it is so
intense that it glows.  You have, thus, prepared  yourself as to the Nature of a Dark Sun, the Yin
Light of a Night, and the Shape of your  Night Body.  You are ready, then, to begin visualizing
your Magician's Night Body.   You will visualize your Night Body as an intense, pulsating,
glowing Body of the Night.  As  your Body begins to take shape, you loose awareness of your
human form.  You are  becoming the Dark Sun of the Night.  You are beautiful, luminescent,
and radiant.  You  are filled with a Radiance of the Night Spirit's Energy and Power.  And so,
filled with the  very Essence of the Dark Sun, you repeat this invocation: 

"I am the Night Soul that glows in the darkness of the night.  I am Night Energy and all  those
who gaze on me become the like.  I am the Pure Essence of the Oversoul in the  form of a Dark
Sun.  I am no longer feeling the material form.  I am becoming  transcendent and translucent
and know myself as Pure Night Energy.  I am not this  physical form but a Body of Pure Night
Energy.  I am the Night Magician, Eternal in the  Light of the Night Spirit.  I AM the Night
Magician within my Night Body."  

You have become a Dark Sun of the Night Spirit.  You are Pure Energy.  Your  visualization has
become much more.  You are no longer just visualizing but have  become the Dark Sun in
Magickal Reality.  You are the Night Magician physically,  emotionally, mentally, and
magickally.  You are a Dark Sun that shines in the night of  your world.  These are the four
Night Rites.  

They were exercises in the Dark Sun of the Night Spirit.  They were Rites carried out  under
Night Consciousness.  They are presented here to give you practice in becoming  the Dark Sun of
your life.  If you use these Night Rites with dedication, perseverance, and  practice them often,
you will become the Dark Sun of the Night Spirit.  In the next subject,  you will combine your
knowledge and use of the Night Powers, Flames, and Rites into  Night Healing. 

47.  Night Healing 

Earlier I presented the subject of healing through the use of color energy.  The type of  healing I
will present here is infinitely more potent.  Night Healing involves the very  Healing Power of
the Night Spirit.  Night Healing is simple to learn but difficult to practice.   To practice Night
Healing, you are going to have to reach Night Consciousness.  Night  Consciousness is the key to
Night Healing.  Before I go much further into Night Healing,  let's discuss the subjects you will
have to learn which make up Night Healing.  

In learning Night Healing, I am going to discuss the Seventh Night Power, Invocation, 
Meditation, the Night Body, Night Energy Beam, and the Green Flame.  Therefore, since  there
are so many Magickal Tools that you will use in combination with each other, let's  start from
the beginning using Invocation, Meditation, and the Seventh Night Power.   This may seem a
review and in a way it is.  You have already covered every subject just  mentioned, but it is the
way that you put them together that brings about Night Healing.   You are going to recover each
subject lightly, and as you do so, you will be putting them  together to form Night Healing.  

You begin, as always, by entering your Magician's Study and darkening the room.  Then  either
sit or lie down just so that whatever your choice is, you are as comfortable as  possible.  You will
then relax as much as possible; put the Night Pillar around yourself;  and practice Night
Breathing for a few minutes.  When you are ready, begin with  Invocation.  

Your invocation, as always, must be directed towards your Oversoul.  You are going to  visualize
your Oversoul at the other end of the silver cord.  You are going to use the silver  cord as you
would use a telegraph line.  You are going to first envision what it is that you  are going to heal. 
Is it a person or animal? Is it something internally wrong or external?   If it is something
wrong and you're not quite sure what it is, that's alright.  The Oversoul  can heal what's wrong
whether you know what's wrong or not.  You are going to envision  your very simple message
traveling up the silver cord and being received by the Oversoul.  As you send the message, not
only should you envision it, but you should say it aloud.   You will remember from the topic on
the Power of Sound what saying your message  aloud will do.  You should say the invocation at
least three times.  You must keep the  invocation simple and concise.  A simple invocation
might be as follows: 

"I am the Night Presence of the Oversoul.  I call upon that Presence to pass through me  and to
(person's name or thing to be healed).  The (person or thing) requires the Healing  Power of the
Night Oversoul to correct the (wrong or name the specific condition).  As I am  performing the
act of Night Healing raise me into your Night Consciousness and let the  healing be done.  So be
it." 

Through the power of this invocation you have already begun the Magick of Night Healing.  
You have begun your ascent into Night Consciousness.  Next, you will enter into  Meditation.  

Your meditation is going to be upon the Healing Oversoul.  Let's picture the Healing  Oversoul as
you have always pictured the Oversoul, only you are going to add an Emerald  Green Light
around Its Presence.  This Emerald Green Light surrounds the Oversoul as  does the Yin Light. 
Feel and know the Healing Power of the Emerald Green Light wherein  is contained the Green
Flame of Night Healing.  Go on and enter directly into the  Presence of the Oversoul and become
the Oversoul and Emerald Healing Power that  surrounds It.  Then you are going to take your
meditation into the Seventh Night Power.  

You are going to do more then just meditate upon the Presence of the Oversoul.  You are  going to
know yourself as the Healing Oversoul.  Its Consciousness and yours are One.   You are the
Healing Oversoul and the Emerald Healing Power.  You know, feel, and are  the Oversoul.  All
that the Oversoul is, you are.  Its very Nature is revealed before you.  Its  Power, Energy, and
Healing Energy is yours to use for you are the Healing Oversoul.  Thus, you have invoked the
Seventh Night Power and have become the Emerald Crystal  Tool of the Magickal Master.  The
Emerald Light of the Oversoul pours through your  nature and transforms you into the Healing
Oversoul.  Now, you are ready to take on the  Night Body.  

As you have entered into Night Consciousness, your very Essence has become radiant  and
luminescent with the Magickal Yin Light. You have become, again, the Dark Sun of  the
Oversoul.  You are the Dark Goddess/God.  You know yourself as the Pure Energy of  the Night
Spirit.  You are no longer a physical being but have become etherial in nature.   Again, you
invoke the Hymn of the Night: 

"I am the Dark Sun that radiates Night Energy in the night.  I am filled with Darkness and 
Energy and all those who gaze on me become the like.  I am the Pure Essence of  Oversoul in the
form of the Dark Sun.  I am no longer feeling the material form.  I have  become transcendent
and translucent and know myself as Pure Night Energy.  I am not  this physical form but a Body
of Pure Yin Light.  I AM the Night Magician, Eternal in the  Light of the Night Spirit.  I AM the
Night Magician."   

You have become the Oversoul.  You are totally ready in Consciousness and Form to use  the
Healing Power of the Night. Thus, you turn to the use of the Night Energy Beam and  the Green
Night Flame.  

To activate and use the Night Energy Beam, you must turn within to the Heart of your  Night
Being.  You are going to envision yourself as a great Silver Night Disk.  In front of  the Night
Disk is the Blazing Sun of the Oversoul.  The Night Force begins to concentrate,  magnify, and
intensify, until you release it in a narrow Beam of Night Energy.  Again, you  will remember
that your Night Consciousness directs the Beam to the receiver.  This is the  person you are
going to heal.  Now is the time you are going to invoke the Green Night  Flame.  From out of the
Oversoul comes the Green Flame.  It is a Flame of Dazzling  Emerald Green.  It is the Power of
the Night Spirit Healing.  The Green Flame brings  Healing to all people and all conditions, and
thus you invoke:  
"By the Power of the Presence of the Oversoul within the Night Heart, I am invoking the  Green
Flame of the Oversoul Healing.  I am seeing this Green Flame of the Oversoul  Healing filling
my Night Being.  I AM seeing it before the Great Silver Night Disk  becoming concentrated,
magnified, and intensified until it glows as an Emerald Green  Night." 

Thus, by the Oversoul Will, you release the Emerald Green Flame and direct it onto the  Night
Energy Beam.  You are using the Beam as a carrier for the Green Flame of the  Night Spirit
Healing. There is a twin action taking place in the person being healed. There  is the action of
the Night Energy in the Beam and also the action of the Green Flame.   These Twin Energies of
the Oversoul will bring about the desired action of Magickal  Healing.  The action of the
Oversoul Healing is instantaneous, if the Night Healing is  carried out in Night Consciousness. 
This is Night Healing.  

You have put together the things that you have been learning and practicing into a very 
valuable technique for healing.   If you have been studying and practicing with constancy  and
perseverance, then your success at Night Healing will be excellent.  Night Healing is  the
Universal Cure for all ills. You will be able to apply a very similar technique, as used  here, in
obtaining physical Immortality.  

48.  Immortality: Transmigration and Transmutation

Immortality has been a subject discussed many, many times over the ages.  When I speak  of
Immortality there is generally two ways that it can be viewed.  The first is the  Immortality of
the physical form.  The physical body can be Eternal and live forever.  This  has perpetuated the
myths of the Fountain of Youth and the Philosopher's Stone of the  Ancient Alchemists.  The
second is the Immortality of the soul.  That is, after physical  death, the personality continues
to live on forever in the Night Realm.  It is the idea that "I  who am I will always be I, now and
forever".  I am going to discuss both types.  The  emphasis will be on the Immortality of the
physical body.  That is, I consider it to be the  most important.  Let's begin the discussion with
transmigration.  

Transmigration is the transference of the soul or personality from one physical body to 
another without the normal rest between lives associated with in reincarnation.  The body,  the
soul transfers to, may be of a newly born infant or one of more advanced age.   Transmigration
is also the entry by a disembodied Night Teacher into a body of advance  age.  The age being
determined by what is available and what is needed by the  disembodied Night Teacher.  This is
not so far-out as it may seem.   

We have discussed many times that you are not the physical body, but the emotional,  mental,
and magickal nature of being.  The physical body is only a house in which you  reside.  It is a
special vehicle created especially for you to operate through here on Earth.   As Shakespeare
said, "All the world is a stage and you are but the actor on it."  You are  acting out a certain part
while you are here and the physical body is nothing more then a  costume in which to appear
and act in.  So, transmigration is simply changing from one  costume and role, to another
costume and role.  It is simply entering a new house which  is about to be vacated by its old
occupant.  The how's of transmigration are not so difficult  to understand.  

I have spoke of the silver cord many times.  It is your life line from your Oversoul to you.   The
silver cord is anchored into your physical heart.  You know from Astral Projection that  you
can leave the body at night and travel in many other realms.  The physical body  continues to
live only because the silver cord is still attached to it in the heart.  In  transmigration, you
remove the silver cord from the old residence, which dies, and move it  to the new residence
where it is anchored into the new heart.  At the very same time, the  former occupant, who was
resident in the body that is about to be newly inhabited, is  removed and set free into the Astral
Realm.  This is a very delicate procedure.  It may be  easy to imagine, but it is difficult to
perform.  There are very special Astral Night Spirits  who are especially trained to perform
such a magickal operation.   The procedure is  basically the same for a disembodied Night
Teacher wanting a physical body.   There are  very special considerations that have to be taken,
before transmigration can take place.  

First of all, the person giving up the body that is about to be newly occupied, must  voluntarily
want to do so.  It cannot be done against their will.  There are many reasons  why s/he may
want to do so.  The person may be very tired of living on Earth. Her/His life  may have been a
very difficult one and s/he feels there is very little left for her/him in life.    This person may
even be contemplating suicide.  In another case, the person may have  almost completed what
s/he came into the world to accomplish and death may soon  happen even though the body may
be in good health.  Therefore, before letting suicide  occur in the first case, or natural death in
the other, the individual is approached, while  s/he is in the Astral, about going through
transmigration.  If s/he consents to the transfer  then it can be done.  This is not an easy way
out for the possible suicide.  It is her/his  chance for doing something very worth while in life.
There is another consideration that  must be met; the basic frequencies must be the same or
closely similar.  

Not everyone is a suitable candidate for transmigration.  The person leaving, and the  person
entering, must be closely related in basic vibration.  This does not mean that they  must be of
the same magickal level.  Everyone has a basic frequency that is akin to the  frequency of a
musical note.  It is a frequency that is set from the Nature of the Oversoul.   If the frequencies of
the two are very close, then the transfer can take place.  

There are many reasons why transmigration would be necessary. For example, if a  person had
worked all their life at a very special project that would do much towards the  advancement of
humankind, but s/he had not quite finished and the span of her/his body  was about to expire,
what would or could s/he do? By special arrangement through the  Night Guild s/he could
undergo transmigration.  This could occur before the life span of  the old body was finished or
shortly after bodily death.  The control of transmigration is in  the hands of the World
Directors.  Suppose now, that the Night Guild needed to put one of  its Emissaries in the world. 
They want her/him there now and functioning in her/his task.   This is another use of
transmigration.  Now it is time to consider another form of  Immortality.  

This is transmutation.  The definition of transmutation is "to change".  You are going to 
transmute or change the substance of your physical body into the Oversoul Body.  To  begin
with, this process is threefold.  It deals with the transmutation of your physical body  and your
emotional and mental attitudes.  The discussion will deal with all three, and  we'll start with
the physical.  
The transmutation of the physical begins with proper diet.  You must eat correctly.  You  must
have the proper diet that provides you with the best of health.  You must not overeat  anything
to excess.  The best diet is one that eliminates all meat.  You must have the  proper amounts of
exercise and rest.  You must keep your body clean.  The rule is to treat  the body with respect and
proper care.  This is the beginning of the transmutation of the  physical body and is followed by
the transmutation of your emotions.  

You must feel young, alive, and vibrant.  You must feel the eternalness of being young.   You
must feel the very Youth of the Oversoul flowing through you.  It is essential that you  manifest
only thoughts of being alive in the Oversoul.  If you feel young, you are young.  If  you feel alive
and ready for any challenge by the world, then you will remain in perpetual  youth forever.  The
only thing that causes you to grow old is the negative emotions that  you allow to enter into
your world.  You grow old through worry, tension, and anger.  If  you keep your emotions
centered in the Oversoul, then you shall become Immortal.  Not  only is feeling Immortal
important, but thinking Immortal is of the utmost importance.  

Your thoughts must be centered in the Oversoul Mind.  Not only do you feel alive and  vibrant,
but you know that you are.  Your thoughts are not troubled by the concerns of the  world, for
those concerns shall find their own solutions.  Your thoughts are centered on  the Immortal
Oversoul, and you know that you are the Immortal Oversoul.  When you know  that you are
Immortal, and feel Immortal, then there is only one thing left to do, and that is  to apply your
Night Powers and Flames to your Immortality.  

The application for the use of the Night Powers and Flames is very similar to what you  learned
in Night Healing.  You will begin with Invocation, in telling your Oversoul that you  are going to
use both the Green Flame of the Night Spirit Healing and the Night Flame to  reach
Immortality.  Then, you will move into the next phase, that of meditation and the  Seventh
Night Power. You will use the same meditation on both the subjects of Healing  and
Immortality.  You already have learned how to do it for Healing.  You then will begin  with
meditation on Immortality. You shall dwell on the Immortal Oversoul within you.   Then, you
shall take this meditation into the Seventh Night Power.  

Thus, you shall do more then just meditate on Immortality, you shall come to know the  very
essence of Immortality.  You shall absorb that essence of Immortality into your Inner 
Awareness and become Immortal.  So first, the meditation on the Healing Oversoul, then  the
meditation on the Immortal Oversoul.  You take both of these meditations into the  Seventh
Power and you are ready to continue, in Night  Consciousness, with the Night  Body. You will
use the very same procedure in acquiring the Night Body as I have  outlined in Night Healing. 
Since this is Self-healing and Immortality that you are learning,  you will omit the use of the
Night Energy Beam.  You are going to retain the Energies of  the Night Flames.  Then, you will
continue the procedure, by invoking the Emerald Green  Flame as you did in the last topic. Once
you have used the Green Flame sufficiently, as to  feel cleansed of all imperfections and
afflictions, then you are ready to invoke the Black  Flame.  The invocation for the Black Flame
in this case is as follows: 

"I am the Presence of the Oversoul  and I am invoking the powerful Black Night Flame to 
transmute the human body to an Eternal Oversoul Body.  I behold the Night Flame  entering
within my three material forms and Purifying, Transmuting, and being made  wholly into the
Night Soul of Life.  I am filled with the Transmuting Night Flame that is  changing my material
form into the Everlasting Form of the Oversoul.  I am Eternal in the  Oversoul; that which I am
shall never experience physical death again; I AM Immortal as  the Oversoul in the Oversoul
Body.  So be it." 

Then, you shall bathe in the Black Night Flame, until you have become Bodily Immortal in  the
Oversoul.  This is transmutation. You are Immortal in Soul and can be in material  form.   

Whether you are able to achieve the Immortality of your mortal form or not, you are  forever
Immortal in Soul and Night Spirit. You are very close to the end of Fire Magick.   You have
come a very long way on the road of Night Magick.  Yet, in Magickal Reality,  you have only
begun to learn a small portion of the lore of Night Magick.  You have only  just begun the trek
towards Home. Still, there must be an ending to your first studies in  Night Magick, so I will
close with the final topic on the past, present, and future of Night  Magicians. 
    

49.  Night Magicians: Past, Present, and Future 

This is the concluding topic in the lore of Night Magick.  You have gone through all the 
elements of Night Magick.  You have covered Earth, Water, Air, and Fire and have learned  the
basics of each.  Yet, in actuality, you have hardly scratched the surface.  You have  only just
begun to learn Night Magick.  There is still so much more to learn.  

There is no end to the body of knowledge that is Night Magick. You must always search  for
knowledge and wisdom wherever it may be, for this is Night Magick.  No Night  Magician ever
stops learning or comes to know it all.  You will always be unfolding the  Night Powers that lie
within you.  For your final topic, as in the beginning, I would like to  speak once more about
Night Magicians.  

I would like to present the Night Magicians of the past, giving their origin, purpose, and  names;
of the present, again speaking of their origin and purpose; the future, taking a  glimpse of what
might be.  To begin this presentation, I would like to discuss the Night  Magicians of the Past.  

In the beginning of distant civilization the Dragon Tiamat taught humankind the  knowledge
and wisdom of Night Magick. Civilizations flourished under Night Magick and  the Earth was a
beautiful and wonderful place.  Then came the invasion by the Yang and  the destruction of the
Yin civilizations.  But even among the Yang gods and goddesses  there were the Yin.

Among the gods and goddesses were Set, Isis, Nuit, Loki, Pan, Cybele, Hecate, Kali,  Bacchus,
and others who were known to give the other gods and goddesses trouble.   Among humankind
the Night Religions and Night Magick continued.

There are the worshippers and practitioners of the dark religions of the above listed gods  and
goddesses.  There are also the ancient religions of the Druids and the North and  South
American Indians.  There are the religions of Africa and other so-called dark  continents. 
There is Voodoo.  Many of these continue to remain in existence today.   There are also
individual practitioners of the past. 

There are Night Magicians such as Abra Melin, and Abraham the Jew, Cagliostro,  Althotas,
Comte de Sainte-Germain, Aleister Crowley, Baian, Jeanne Belloc, Dr. Lamb,  Marie Le
Normand, Henry Cornelius Agrippa, Paracelsus, Jacob Boehme, Eliphas Levi,  Marie Laveau,
Alexander Seton, and William Butler Yeats.

There are also Night Magicians of the present, but I cannot name them here.  This is still  very
much a Yang world with great hatred for those devoted to the world of Night Magick.   So all I
will say is that Night Magicians can be found in all walks of life.  There are no  barriers to those
of the Night World.  What all Night Magicians have in common is the  preparation for the
future. 

The future of humankind is bleak.  With the pollution and rape of this world by humankind 
the Earth will soon rid itself of much of the cancer that is causing its death.  There are  many
predictions about when this period of life is going to happen.  Prophets have been  forecasting
this event and the time of its happening for ages.  But determining the exact  date of this
happening is like trying to forecast the first snowfall of the winter.  There are a  great deal of
things that determine when it will first snow, and so with this event.  I can  say that some of the
signs of this happening have already begun to manifest.  

There has been an increasingly large number of natural disasters. There has and will  continue
to be a large number of shifts going on within the Earth.  This will give  earthquakes,
volcanoes, and the rising and lowering of land.  There will be terrible storms  that will cause
widespread destruction.  There will be flooding, extremes of heat and cold,  draughts and all
kinds of out of the ordinary weather changes.  There will be a great deal  of panic and terror
among the citizenry.  The skies will have a very unusual glow to them  and be of a reddish black
hue.  There will be great shifts in the land with some rising and  others falling. Some of the
land will be covered with water and other portions, currently  under water, will rise up into the
open air.  Not only will the land be undergoing a major  shift, but there will also be political
and social upheaval.  This is a time of the Earth's  balancing the large amounts of karma that
humankind has created. It is a time of  correcting the harm that humankind has done to the
body of the planet itself.  This is not  presented here to bring panic and fear into anyone's heart. 
It is presented in an explicit  manner so you can do something about it.  

Futures don't have to be written in stone.  They can be changed. You can help the future  to
change by practicing Night Magick. It is a way of preparing yourself for the changes  about to
take place.  There is much you have learned in Night Magick that can help you  prepare. You
could use psychometry to find a safe place to be when the trouble begins.   You can learn to give
the Earth healing energy and give back to it vitality it has lost.  You  can stop any destructive
practices which cause further harm to the Earth.  You can be part  of many voices trying to
change the way the Earth is slowly being destroyed.  You can use  Night Magick to influence
those who make decisions.  The future is an odd thing.

Sometimes you can look forward and feel what is ahead, but it is always based upon the 
probabilities, or possibilities that will open up before you.  If you could stand high upon a 
mountain and look at your future, it would seem like there are many roads that lay before  you
and all the choices that determine which road you take are yours to choose.  You  would find
that even from your lofty height, you could not see the end of the road you  chose, or its
outcome.  But one road you have already chosen will insure a bright future.    Of course this is
the Night Road of a Night Magician.  

To travel the Night Road you must have a desire to learn and a willingness to experiment.   You
must be adventurous and love excitement and the unusual.  You must be willing to  be tested and
trials will come your way.  But the outcome of traveling the Night Road  leads to victory in life. 
The Night Road leads to the Night Magician's Dream.  

A Night Magician's Dream  

Picture if you will a Land of Enchantment; a Land of Honor, Strength, and Energy.  The  Land of
the Night Magicians.  This is the Land in which your dreams evolve from within.   Reality is
seen through your Night Eye and felt through your Night Heart. You are as rich  as your Soul is
in the Eternal Night.  You are as young as the Oversoul is within you.   Search within your
heart, within the Heart of Creativity, and become the Living Oversoul.  The Night Magician is,
knows, and becomes all.  They exist within all things; such is the  Night Consciousness of the
Oversoul in them.  They are free of self-limitations and control  the world of form, and the
things found in it.  They are Pure in Night Spirit. They transcend  all things: space, time, and
the world around them.  

Believe as you will; what you are is all that is; what you will be is limited by yourself; this  is
your creed and your life as it is within you.  No longer bound by the limitations of a  Yang, past
world, you are the Progress of a New Age, an Age of the Night World.  You are  the Foundation of
Time and Space.  You are the Strength of the Night Spirit.  If only in the  hearts of all, you were
what you felt when you dream, then there could exist no wrong  ideas.  

There is potential in thought and ideas, and it is for Humanity to bring them out of the  Void. 
Only Humanity can be what they believe their selves to be.  They cannot be what  they don't
believe is possible to be.  Freedom begins in thought and when Manifest in  Action can be Truth
as the Night Spirit sees the Truth: focused on a Point in Time;  balanced on the Edge of Infinity.  

Believe in yourself and your ability to succeed in all things. Only you control you; only you  can
find happiness; only you make the destiny that lies before you.  You are a Channel for  the
Eternal Night; use this right, and bring forth into your world the Energy of the Night  and make
Humanity what They can be as the Night Spirit Wills.  You are the strength of  the Earth and
only you can open the Doorway to your Success.  Be what you Believe, and  be what you can be,
for no one can limit, another.  You can only limit Yourself.  The  challenge of life is to know
thyself; to know how one limits another, and how to be all you  can be in life and Night Magick.  

The Night Magician is the Knower, the Doer, and is the Night Spirit within all things.   There
Responsibility lies with the Night Spirit and the Oversoul.  They are the Heart of all  things,
bringing Humanity into harmony with Nature, and the world into harmony with the  Night
Spirit.  

You are the One who becomes Your Dreams; who is unlimited by Your Energy for all  things, for
Your Energy is Boundless and Eternal. No longer in this world is the Door shut  to this One; the
One who has become the Night Magician.       



APPENDIXES



APPENDIX A
 
INVOCATIONS, HYMNS, POEMS, AND PRAYERS   

1.  Invocation for the Night Magician's Pillar of Protection.  

I am a Night Magician surrounded in a Pillar of Night Energy that cannot be penetrated.  It 
repels all energy that would harm me. It repels all thoughts and emotional energy of my 
enemies. Through the Power of my Oversoul, I am protected in a Pillar of Night Energy  and
cannot be harmed.  May this Night Pillar remain around me at all times keeping me  out of
harms way.  So be it. 

2.  Ritual Invocations

Each ritual will begin by your stepping into the Night Circle and putting on your Night 
Weapons and Cape.  After this place the Night Pillar around you.  Do not leave the Circle  until
the end of the ritual and be sure and re-enforce the Night Pillar around and through  you before
leaving the Night Circle.  Go through the actions of consecrating the Night  Circle with earth,
water, air, and fire each time.  Fill the chalice, say the invocation, and  drink the wine each
time.  Then always ring the bell and summon the Night Deities.    These are the basic procedures
you will begin each ritual which takes place within the  Night Circle.

Now pick up the bell and ring it six times in each major direction, that is North, South,  East
and West.  Then repeat the following invocation, "I who am (give your Night Name)  summon
the Presence of all Deities in the Night Force to attend my ritual of Eternal Night.   We now
stand in the Eternal Night beyond time and space.  Come and witness my Ritual  of the Night".  

After this, pick up the salt container, and repeat the following: "By my sacred name, (give  your
Night Name), through the Presence of my Oversoul and the Eternal Earth Deities, I  invoke the
Earth Night Power into this container of salt and now place the salt upon the  earth to mark the
boundary of my sacred circle." Visualize the Earth Deities filling the  vessel with their power.
Pinch a little salt lightly between your fingers dropping it on the  floor over the cord going
completely around the circle.  BE CAREFUL NOT TO STEP  OUTSIDE THE CIRCLE FOR THE
REMAINDER OF THE RITUAL.  Place the salt container  back on the Night Altar and pick up
the crystal bowl of water.  

Repeat the following: "May the Presence of my Oversoul and the Eternal Water Deities fill  this
water and container and endow it with the Water Night Power."  Visualize the Water  Deities of
the Earth filling the vessel with the power.  With your left hand dip it into the  water and
sprinkle lightly the boundary you have already marked with the salt.  Place the  water bowl
back on the altar and pick up the incense burner.  Repeat the following: "Let the Presence of the
Four Winds of the Earth enter into the  incense burner filling it with Air Night Power".   Now
face each direction, rotating  counterclockwise, and see the Presence of each Wind Deity enter
into the incense burner.   Then circle four times in a counterclockwise manner around and
within the Magick Circle.   Place the incense burner back on the Night Altar and pick up the
candle.

Repeat the following:  "May the Presence of my Oversoul and the Fire Deities of the Earth  place
their sacred flame here within my candles and upon my Night Altar."   See the Fire  Deities
come and dance around the flames and upon your altar.  Place the candle back  where it came
from and pick up the chalice of wine or juice.  Repeat the following: "Let the Presence of my
Oversoul and the Eternal Darkness enter  into the liquid and fill it with the Power of the
Eternal Night.  May this elixir give me  strength, healing, and courage each day of my life."  Feel
the Power flow through you and  into the chalice.  See the energy collect and concentrate till the
chalice glows with Night  Energy.  
Now face each direction and repeat the following:  "Thank you Night Deities for your 
attendance at this sacred Night Rite.  May we ever serve the Eternal Powers of Darkness  here
on Earth and the Omniverse forever. So be it."  

At this point stop and re-enforce your Night Pillar and then take off all your Night  Weapons
and place them back upon the Night Altar.  Leave the cord in place on the floor.  

3.  Invocation to Night Magick.  

I,(give your Night Name), commit my all to the Oversoul and the Night Spirit within, and to  the
dedication of my Magickal Energies to the practice of Night Magick.  I dedicate myself  to the
Oversoul within and to my union with it in Night Consciousness.  May these Night  Tools and
Weapons serve me ever in this cause. So be it.  

4. Invocation to the Cosmic Being of the(insert-direction).  

I invoke the Great Powers of the Cosmic Being of the (insert direction) to flow into my  being. 
Fill me with the Cosmic Power of (insert element).  Renew me in the Power of  Night
Consciousness.  Make me a Being of Cosmic Yin Light.  Guide me upon the Road of  Night
Magick." 

5.  Invocation for Night Projection.  

On this day ___, I am going to Night Project.  I am going to travel in the Astral Realm and 
remember all that I see and do.  I will recall all of this after I have returned to my body.   This I
will do and won't fail."  

6.  Night Invocation on Earth.  

Let the Earth be filled with the Presence of the Night.  I honor the Presence of the Night in  all I
say and do.  By the Night all things are given, by the Night all enemies removed.  By  the Yin
Light of the Moon I shall walk the Night Road on Earth in power, and glory and  victory forever. 
So be it.   

7.  Hymn of the Nights.  

I am the Dark Sun that radiates Night Energy in the night.  I am filled with Darkness and 
Energy and all those who gaze on me become the like.  I am the Pure Essence of  Oversoul in the
form of the Dark Sun.  I am no longer feeling the material form.  I have  become transcendent
and translucent and know myself as Pure Night Energy.  I am not  this physical form but a Body
of Pure Yin Light.  I AM the Night Magician, Eternal in the  Light of the Night Spirit.  I AM the
Night Magician.   

8.  Invocation for the Night Body.

I am the Night Soul that glows in the darkness of the night.  I am Night Energy and all  those
who gaze on me become the like.  I am the Pure Essence of the Oversoul in the  form of a Dark
Sun.  I am no longer feeling the material form.  I am becoming  transcendent and translucent
and know myself as Pure Night Energy.  I am not this  physical form but a Body of Pure Night
Energy.  I am the Night Magician, Eternal in the  Light of the Night Spirit.  I AM the Night
Magician within my Night Body.  

9.  Invocation for Night Healing.

I am the Night Presence of the Oversoul.  I call upon that Presence to pass through me  and to
(person's name or thing to be healed).  The (person or thing) requires the Healing  Power of the
Night Oversoul to correct the (wrong or name the specific condition).  As I am  performing the
act of Night Healing raise me into your Night Consciousness and let the  healing be done.  So be
it.

10.  Invocation for Transmutation by the Black Night Flame.

I am the Presence of the Oversoul  and I am invoking the powerful Black Night Flame to 
transmute the human body to an Eternal Oversoul Body.  I behold the Night Flame  entering
within my three material forms and Purifying, Transmuting, and being made  wholly into the
Night Soul of Life.  I am filled with the Transmuting Night Flame that is  changing my material
form into the Everlasting Form of the Oversoul.  I am Eternal in the  Oversoul; that which I am
shall never experience physical death again; I AM Immortal as  the Oversoul in the Oversoul
Body.  So be it. 

 
11.  Invocation of the Black Night Flame.  

By the Presence of the Oversoul within me I am invoking the Great Black Flame of the 
Oversoul's Purity and Perfection through me. I AM seeing this Black Flame descending  from
above and filling my being with Its Essence and Power.  I AM then placing it here  before me on
the Altar of the Night, there to collect and concentrate into a blazing Night  Black Flame.  Now,
oh blazing Night Black Flame, I AM commanding thee by the Power of  the Presence of the
Oversoul in me, to obey my Will as the Oversoul on Earth.  

12.  Invocation of the Violet Night Flame.  

I AM the Oversoul on Earth and I AM invoking the Violet Night Flame of Transmutation.  I  AM
seeing this Violet Night Flame descending from my own Night Soul and entering  within me
transmuting all that I AM into the Night Soul.  All negation and inharmony is  removed from
by being and replaced with Pure Night Energy.  I AM the Violet Night Flame  and all who see
with me are alive with the Violet Night Flame and so Transmuted, Purified  and forever Free.  
  
13.  Invocation of the Blue Night Flame.   

I AM the Oversoul on Earth, and I AM invoking the Peace and Harmony of the Blue Night 
Flame.  I AM seeing this Blue Flame of the Night Spirit's Peace and Harmony descending  out of
my the Night Soul and into that which I AM.  I AM focusing this Blue Flame here  before me on
the Altar of the Nights.  I AM the Blue Night Flame here in Oversoul Action  giving Peace and
Harmony to all.  

14.  Invocation of the Green Night Flame.   

By the Power of the Presence of the Oversoul within the Night Heart, I am invoking the  Green
Flame of the Oversoul Healing.  I am seeing this Green Flame of the Oversoul  Healing filling
my Night Being.  I AM seeing it before the Great Silver Night Disk  becoming concentrated,
magnified, and intensified until it glows as an Emerald Green  Night.

15.  Invocation of the Yellow Night Flame.  

Through the Night Oversoul within me I AM invoking the Power of the Night Flame of  Wisdom
and Intelligence.  I AM filled with these three Magickal Qualities and know, and  see, all that
the Night Soul sees.  And I AM surrounding myself and the world around me  in the Yellow
Night Flame of Wisdom and Intelligence.    

16.  Invocation of the Orange Night Flame.  

I draw from out of the sun the Orange Night Flame.  With this Night Flame I empower the  world
around me with energy.  I Am protected from the Orange Night Flame by the Power  of the Night. 

17.  Invocation of the Red Night Flame.  

Through the Presence of the Oversoul in me and the Power of the Night Guild I AM 
commanding the Red Flame of the Night into my world and being.  I AM the Red Flame of  the
Night in Action on Earth today and forever.   

18.  Invocation of the Rainbow Night Flame.  

I AM the composite of the Night Flames in Action on Earth.  I AM the Night Soul in 
Consciousness and by the Night Consciousness I AM invoking the Total Power of the Night 
Flames embodied in the Rainbow Flame.  I AM commanding this Night Flame into  existence
by the Will of the Eternal Darkness.  And by my Oversoul Consciousness the  Rainbow Flame is
sustained and placed into Night Action by Night Direction.  I AM the  Action of the Rainbow
Flame.  I AM the Rainbow Night Flame.   

APPENDIX B   

CANDLE COLOR COMBINATION AND THE NIGHT TEACHERS 

Candle color is arranged by the basic force the Night Teachers are aligned with.   Remember
that the two front candles are always black for the second Water Rite.  So  here is the color
candles to use with the particular force and teachers.

Use midnight blue and red candles for the First Force of the Will and Power of the Night  Spirit. 
This includes the Keeper Asmodeus and Azazel, Leviathan, Santanas, and Amon.

Use two midnight blue candles for the Second Force of the Wisdom of the Night Spirit.   This
includes the Keeper Kali and Lucifuge Rofocale, Belial, and Azael.

Use two black candles for the Third Force of the Energy of the Night Spirit.  This includes  the
Keeper Baal and Endor, Abraxas, and Balan.  

Use two red candles for the Fourth Force of Balance, Dignity, and Purity.  This includes  the
Keeper Lilith and Astaroth, Nisroch, and Bensozia.  

Use two yellow candles for the Fifth Force of Knowledge.  This includes the Keeper Dagon  and
Agares, John Dee, Bifrons, Belphegor, and Alocer.  

Use red and violet candles for the Sixth Force of Devotion.  This includes the Keeper  Lucifer
and Moloch, Astartes, and Marie Laveau. 

Use two violet candles for the Seventh Force of Beauty and Action of the Night Spirit.  This 
includes the Keeper Hecate and Aleister Crowley, Armida, Cagliostro, Baphomet, and  Eliphas
Levi. 


